# Cisco AnyConnect VPN Client
# Copyright 2019 Cisco Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved
# This file is distributed under the same license as the AnyConnect package.

msgid 
msgstr 
"Project-Id-Version: AnyConnect 4.7.00000\n"
"Report-Msgid-Bugs-To: \n"
"POT-Creation-Date: 2020-03-11 2:54-0400\n"
"PO-Revision-Date: 2020-03-11 2:54-0800\n"
"Last-Translator: Jeffery Jin <jeffery.jin@it-beyond.com>\n"
"Language-Team: BeyondFuture, Inc.\n"
"Language: en_US\n"
"MIME-Version: 1.0\n"
"Content-Type: text/plain; charset=UTF-8\n"
"Content-Transfer-Encoding: 8bit\n"
"Plural-Forms: nplurals=2; plural=(n != 1);\n"
"X-Generator: Poedit 1.6.4\n"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create a required internal event objects for end-point system
#. suspend processing.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed to create an event necessary for system suspend processing."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建系统挂起处理所需的事件。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create a required internal event object for internal notification
#. processing.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed to create an event necessary for agent service notification processing."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建代理服务通知处理所需的事件。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create a required internal event object for profile and preference
#. processing.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed to create an event necessary for profile and preference processing."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建配置文件和首选项处理所需的事件。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create a required internal event object for internal termination
#. processing.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed to create an event necessary for agent termination processing."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建代理终止处理所需的事件。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to initialize the end-point system's network socket subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to initialize the system network socket support."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法初始化系统网络套接字支持。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create a required internal interprocess communication object.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create the interprocess communication depot."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建进程间通信库。"

#. Doc: The client agent was unable to communicate with the Network Component Host
#. Service
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to communicate with the Network Component Host Service."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法与网络组件主机服务通信。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create a required event object for end-point system network adapter
#. change notifications.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed to create an event necessary for network adapter change processing."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建网络适配器更改处理所需的事件。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its main execution thread.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed to create a necessary processing component and cannot continue."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建必要的处理组件，因此无法继续。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its preferences management subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create the client preferences manager."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建客户端首选项管理器。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its network environment monitoring subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create the network environment component."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建网络环境组件。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its management tunnel subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create the management tunnel component."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建管理隧道组件。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its trusted network detection subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create the trusted network detection component."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建可信网络检测组件。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create a required internal timer object.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create a necessary timer."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建必要的计时器。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its end-point system configuration management subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create the client host configuration manager."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建客户端主机配置管理器。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its VPN connection configuration management subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create the client VPN configuration manager."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建客户端VPN配置管理器。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to initialize its Federal Information Processing Standards (FIPS)
#. operation mode.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to enable FIPS Mode."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法启用FIPS模式。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its plug-in loader subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable create the plugin loader."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建插件加载器。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its execution context object.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable create the agent execution context class instance."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建代理执行上下文类实例。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to initialize its System/Network Abstraction Kit (SNAK) subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed to load the SNAK system plugin required by this version of AnyConnect."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法加载此版本的AnyConnect所需的SNAK系统插件。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to initialize CURL.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed to initialize CURL"
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法初始化CURL"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its DNS plugin management subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create the client DNS plugin manager."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建客户端DNS插件管理器。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. attempting to create its inter-module communication subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to create the inter-module communication manager."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法创建模块间通信管理器。"

#. Doc: The AlwaysOn connect failure policy (specified via the
#. ConnectFailurePolicy profile setting) will not be applied, despite
#. the connection failure. Reason: the target secure gateway was not
#. found in the profile. With AlwaysOn enabled, only connections to
#. the profile hosts are allowed, since traffic to other destinations
#. is restricted by this feature.
msgid "The Connect Failure Policy will not be applied because the Secure Gateway could not be found in the profile."
msgstr "连接失败策略将不会应用，因为在配置文件中找不到安全网关。"

#. Doc: The AlwaysOn connect failure policy (specified via the
#. ConnectFailurePolicy profile setting) will not be applied, despite
#. the connection failure. Reason: while the UI has failed to connect, the
#. vpnagent service is able to contact the target secure gateway. Thus,
#. the connection failure could not be confirmed and any existing network
#. restrictions are maintained.
msgid "The secure gateway is responding, but AnyConnect could not establish a VPN session.  Please retry."
msgstr "安全网关正在响应，但是AnyConnect无法建立VPN会话。 请重试。"

msgid "The connection must be retried manually."
msgstr "必须手动重试连接。"

msgid "You may need to use a browser to gain access."
msgstr "您可能需要使用浏览器来获得访问权限。"

msgid "The following message was received from the secure gateway: "
msgstr "从安全网关收到以下消息："

msgid "Reconnect capability is disabled."
msgstr "重新连接功能已禁用。"

msgid "Processing CRLs..."
msgstr "正在处理CRL ..."

#. Doc: When a captive portal is detected and AnyConnect is in Start Before Login (SBL) mode,
#. the user will not be able to launch a browser to remediate through the portal, which is
#. needed for AnyConnect to reach the secure gateway; therefore, the AnyConnect UI
#. will tell the user to close AnyConnect to allow the user to log into Windows and
#. perform any required authentication. Prior to 3.1 AnyConnect would exit due to a captive portal
#. in SBL mode but exiting the app prevented the user from selecting a different headend when captive
#. portal was detected incorrectly (CSCua21833 or CSCtz86282) or NAM is loaded at SBL time and
#. the network can be changed
msgid 
"AnyConnect cannot establish a VPN session because a device in the network, such as a proxy server or captive portal, is blocking Internet access.\n"
"\n"
"Close AnyConnect and proceed with logging on to your system.\n"
"\n"
"Depending on the type of device blocking access, you may be able to establish a VPN session after visiting a website with your browser and completing the steps required to obtain Internet access."
msgstr 
"由于网络中的设备（例如代理服务器或强制门户）正在阻止Internet访问，因此AnyConnect无法建立VPN会话。\n"
"\n"
"关闭AnyConnect并继续登录系统。\n"
"\n"
"根据阻止访问的设备类型，在使用浏览器访问网站并完成获取Internet访问所需的步骤之后，您也许可以建立VPN会话。"

msgid "Use the AnyConnect browser to gain access."
msgstr "使用AnyConnect浏览器获得访问权限。"

msgid "Use a browser to gain access."
msgstr "使用浏览器获得访问权限。"

msgid "Connection to the proxy server failed."
msgstr "与代理服务器的连接失败。"

msgid "None of the authentication protocols offered by the proxy server are supported."
msgstr "不支持代理服务器提供的任何身份验证协议。"

msgid "Proxy authentication failed using the supplied credentials."
msgstr "使用提供的凭据，代理身份验证失败。"

msgid "Invalid Proxy Credentials. Please re-enter."
msgstr "无效的代理凭证。"

msgid "Establishing VPN - Attempting to repair VPN adapter..."
msgstr "建立VPN-尝试修复VPN适配器..."

msgid "Establishing VPN - Repairing VPN adapter..."
msgstr "建立VPN-修复VPN适配器..."

msgid "Establishing VPN - Failed repairing VPN adapter..."
msgstr "建立VPN-无法修复VPN适配器..."

msgid "Performing unbind operations..."
msgstr "正在执行解除绑定操作..."

msgid "Establishing VPN - Initiating connection..."
msgstr "建立VPN-正在建立连线..."

msgid "Establishing VPN - Examining system..."
msgstr "正在建立VPN-审查系统..."

msgid "Establishing VPN - Activating VPN adapter..."
msgstr "建立VPN-激活VPN适配器..."

msgid "Establishing VPN - Configuring system..."
msgstr "建立VPN-配置系统..."

msgid "Establishing VPN..."
msgstr "建立VPN ..."

msgid "Restoring unbind operations..."
msgstr "恢复解除绑定操作..."

msgid "A VPN reconnect resulted in different configuration settings."
msgstr "VPN重新连接导致不同的配置设置。"

msgid "An IP address change to the VPN network interface has been detected."
msgstr "已检测到VPN网络接口的IP地址更改。"

msgid "A new MTU needs to be applied to the VPN network interface."
msgstr "需要将新的MTU应用于VPN网络接口。"

msgid "Performance may be impacted due to suboptimal MTU, see event log for details."
msgstr "由于MTU不够理想，性能可能会受到影响，有关详细信息，请参阅事件日志。"

msgid "Your VPN connection will soon exceed the session time limit.  A new connection will be necessary."
msgstr "您的VPN连接将很快超过会话时间限制。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection or AnyConnect client service was terminated without a
#. termination reason code having been set. This is due to a flaw in the
#. client software.
msgid "An unknown termination error has occurred in the client service."
msgstr "客户端服务中发生未知的终止错误。"

#. Doc: The client received a VPN connection configuration from the secure gateway
#. containing invalid or conflicting information. The network administrator
#. needs to examine and correct the VPN configuration settings on the secure
#. gateway.
msgid "The VPN configuration received from the secure gateway is invalid.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "从安全网关收到的VPN配置无效。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

#. Doc: The client received a VPN connection configuration from the secure gateway
#. containing an invalid format. The secure gateway is possibly malfunctioning.
msgid "The VPN configuration received from the secure gateway has an invalid format.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "从安全网关收到的VPN配置格式无效。"

#. Doc: The client service encountered an unrecoverable end-point system malfunction while
#. attempting to re-register with the end-point system for IP forwarding table
#. change notifications. This prevents the client from ensuring the security
#. and correct operation of the VPN connection, so the VPN connection was
#. disconnected.
msgid "Unable to re-register for IP forwarding table change notifications.  The VPN connection has been disconnected."
msgstr "无法重新注册IP转发表更改通知。 VPN连接已断开。"

#. Doc: The client service received a stop notification from the end-point system.
#. The VPN connection was disconnected and the client service was terminated
#. as a result.
msgid "The VPN client service has been stopped.  The VPN connection has been disconnected.  Close all sensitive networked applications."
msgstr "VPN客户端服务已停止。 VPN连接已断开。 关闭所有敏感的联网应用程序。"

#. Doc: The client service has encountered an unexpected and unrecoverable failure
#. while interfacing with the end-point system's service control subsystem.
msgid "The client service has encountered an error and is stopping.  Close all sensitive networked applications."
msgstr "客户端服务遇到错误，正在停止。 关闭所有敏感的联网应用程序。"

#. Doc: The client is not configured to allow multiple users and another user has
#. logged into the end-point system. The new user was not authenticated by the
#. secure gateway for access to the private network, so the VPN connection has
#. been disconnected to ensure the protection of the private network.
msgid "Another user has logged into your computer, and only one user is allowed.  The VPN connection has been disconnected.  Close all sensitive networked applications."
msgstr "另一用户登录到您的计算机，并且只允许一个用户。 VPN连接已断开。 关闭所有敏感的联网应用程序。"

#. Doc: The client is not configured to allow multiple users and there are multiple
#. users currently logged into the end-point system. The other users are not
#. authenticated by the secure gateway for access to the private network, so
#. the VPN connection has not been allowed to ensure the protection of the
#. private network.
msgid "AnyConnect profile settings mandate a single user, but multiple users are currently logged into your computer.  A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "AnyConnect配置文件设置要求一个用户，但是当前有多个用户登录到您的计算机。 无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client service has encountered an unexpected and unrecoverable
#. initialization failure.
msgid "The client agent has encountered an error."
msgstr "客户端代理遇到错误。"

#. Doc: The client service was unable to configure or start the virtual adapter
#. driver needed to perform a VPN connection. This is often the result of a
#. problem with the virtual adapter installation or registry settings.
msgid "The VPN client driver encountered an error.  Please restart your computer or device, then try again."
msgstr "VPN客户端驱动程序遇到错误。 请重新启动计算机或设备，然后重试。"

#. Doc: The client service was unable to successfully apply all the VPN configuration
#. settings to the end-point system's IP forwarding table. This could compromise
#. the security and correct operation of the VPN connection, so the VPN
#. connection has not been allowed. This is an unrecoverable error.
msgid "The VPN client was unable to modify the IP forwarding table.  A VPN connection will not be established.  Please restart your computer or device, then try again."
msgstr "VPN客户端无法修改IP转发表。 无法建立VPN连接。 请重新启动计算机或设备，然后重试。"

#. Doc: The client service was unable to successfully apply the VPN configuration
#. settings to the end-point system's IP filtering subsystem. This could
#. compromise the security of the VPN connection and the data integrity of the
#. end-point system, so the VPN connection has not been allowed. This is an
#. unrecoverable error.
msgid "The VPN client was unable to setup IP filtering.  A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "VPN客户端无法设置IP过滤。 无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client service failed to establish a secured connection to the secure
#. gateway. This may be the result of a proxy authentication failure, protocol
#. handshake failure, bad client or server certificate, layer 2 communication
#. failures, etc.
msgid "The VPN client failed to establish a connection."
msgstr "VPN客户端无法建立连接。"

#. Doc: The client service encountered an unexpected and unrecoverable
#. protocol error in an exchange with the secure gateway.
msgid "The VPN client agent encountered a secure gateway protocol failure."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理遇到安全网关协议故障。"

#. Doc: The client service encountered an unexpected and unrecoverable error in the
#. SSL protocol stack. This is possibly due to a flaw in the client
#. software.
msgid "The VPN client agent SSL engine encountered an error.  Please restart your computer or device, then try again.  If the issue persists, please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理SSL引擎遇到错误。 请重新启动计算机或设备，然后重试。 如果问题仍然存在，请联系您的网络管理员。"

#. Doc: The client service encountered an unexpected and unrecoverable error in the
#. protocol encryption engine.
msgid "The VPN client agent encryption engine encountered an error."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理加密引擎遇到错误。"

#. Doc: The client service encountered an unexpected and unrecoverable error in the
#. protocol decryption engine.
msgid "The VPN client agent decryption engine encountered an error."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理解密引擎遇到错误。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection was terminated by the secure gateway. In the case of SSL,
#. the message displayed to the user will include a text message from the
#. secure gateway of the reason for the termination.
msgid "The secure gateway has terminated the VPN connection."
msgstr "安全网关已终止VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client is configured to disconnect when the end-point system suspends,
#. and a system suspend has occurred resulting in the VPN connection being
#. disconnected.
msgid "The VPN connection has been disconnected due to the system suspending.  The reconnect capability is disabled.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "由于系统挂起，VPN连接已断开。 重新连接功能已禁用。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The client service has received a notification from the virtual adapter
#. indicating it is terminating its communication with the client service.
#. This is likely due to a virtual adapter driver failure.
msgid "The VPN client driver has encountered an error.  Close all sensitive networked applications.  Please restart your computer or device, then try again."
msgstr "VPN客户端驱动程序遇到错误。 关闭所有敏感的联网应用程序。 请重新启动计算机或设备，然后重试。"

#. Doc: The client service is unable to retrieve user logon information from the
#. end-point system and therefore cannot enforce the user logon limit settings
#. configure in the client profile. The VPN connection is not allowed to
#. ensure the protection of the private network.
msgid "Unable to retrieve logon information to verify compliance with AnyConnect logon enforcement and VPN establishment profile settings.  A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "无法检索登录信息以验证是否符合AnyConnect登录实施和VPN建立配置文件设置。 无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client is not configured to allow the establishment of a VPN connection
#. by a remote user on the end-point system.
msgid "VPN establishment capability for a remote user is disabled.  A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "远程用户的VPN建立功能已禁用。 无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client service was unable to verify the successful application of all
#. the VPN configuration settings to the end-point system's IP forwarding
#. table. Unapplied settings could compromise the security and correct
#. operation of the VPN connection, so the VPN connection has not been allowed.
#. Other software running on the end-point system may also be actively altering
#. the IP forwarding table, interfering with AnyConnect's ability to configure
#. the end-point system.
#. It is also possible that on a 3g/4g connection that the profile PPPExclusion
#. setting may need to be Automatic or User Controllable.
msgid "The VPN client was unable to successfully verify the IP forwarding table modifications.  A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "VPN客户端无法成功验证IP转发表的修改。 无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client services's VPN connection negotiation with the secure gateway
#. resulted in an error response (HTTP error code) from the secure gateway.
#. The error code and any error description text included in the error response
#. from the secure gateway has been logged.
#. Doc: The particular end-point system requires a licensed AnyConnect client. This
#. license is administered by the secure gateway. The secure gateway to which
#. the end-point system attempted to connect does not have the necessary license.
msgid "The secure gateway has rejected the connection attempt.  A new connection attempt to the same or another secure gateway is needed, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "安全网关已拒绝连接尝试。 需要与相同或另一个安全网关的新连接尝试，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The Windows "Routing and Remote Access" service enables a Windows system to
#. function as a router device, and as such it will actively monitor and modify
#. the system's IP forwarding table. This service interferes with AnyConnect's
#. ability to configure the system's IP forwarding table for VPN connections
#. and system security purposes (for Always On). For this reason, AnyConnect
#. cannot coexist with a running "Routing and Remote Access" service.
msgid "The Windows Routing and Remote Access service is not compatible with the VPN client.  The VPN client cannot operate correctly when this service is running.  You must disable this service in order to use the VPN client."
msgstr "Windows路由和远程访问服务与VPN客户端不兼容。 运行此服务时，VPN客户端无法正确运行。 您必须禁用此服务才能使用VPN客户端。"

#. Doc: A Smartcard based certificate was used to authenticate the VPN connection
#. and it has been removed from the Smartcard reader. This resulted in the
#. VPN connection being disconnected to ensure the protection of the private
#. network.
msgid "VPN connection terminated, Smartcard removed from reader."
msgstr "VPN连接已终止，智能卡已从读取器中移除。"

#. Doc: The secure gateway is configured with a VPN session lifetime limit and the
#. VPN connection has reached this limit and has been disconnected. This
#. feature aids in protecting the private network by requiring the user to
#. re-authenticate with the secure gateway after being connected for long
#. periods of time.
msgid "Your VPN connection has exceeded the session time limit.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "您的VPN连接已超过会话时间限制。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The secure gateway is configured with a VPN session idle timeout and the
#. VPN session has not been connected for longer than the timeout and has been
#. terminated. This feature aids in protecting the private network by requiring
#. the user to re-authenticate with the secure gateway after experiencing VPN
#. connectivity loss for a period of time, possibly due to the physical loss
#. of the end-point device.
msgid "Your connection to the secure gateway has been suspended longer than the allotted time limit.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "您与安全网关的连接已被暂停超过指定的时间限制。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: A generic error occured when attempting to verify the Mobile Device
#. security policy specified in the AnyConnect profile.  This error occurs
#. when attempting to monitor the Windows Mobile device registry to ensure
#. it conforms with settings in the AnyConnect profile.
#. Doc: The AnyConnect profile requires the Mobile Device to be protected
#. by a Device Lock (for example a PIN that must be entered
#. to unlock the device), but the device does not conform to the specified
#. policy.  Administrators should check the value of the DeviceLockRequired
#. element under MobilePolicy in the AnyConnect profile to ensure it is
#. correct.
#. Doc: The AnyConnect profile requires the Mobile Device to be protected
#. by a Device Lock with a minimum password length, but the
#. device is either not configured with a password, or has a password that
#. is too short.  Administrators should check the value of the MinimumPasswordLength
#. attribute of the DeviceLockRequired element under MobilePolicy in the
#. AnyConnect profile to ensure it is correct.
#. Doc: The AnyConnect profile requires the Mobile Device to be protected
#. by a Device Lock with a minimum device lock timeout, but the device is
#. configured with a timeout that is too short.  Administrators should
#. check the value of the MaximumTimeoutMinutes attribute of the
#. DeviceLockRequired element under MobilePolicy in the
#. AnyConnect profile to ensure it is correct.
#. Doc: The AnyConnect profile requires the Mobile Device to be protected
#. by a Device Lock with a specified password complexity, but the device is
#. either configured with a password of insufficient complexity, or does
#. not have a password complexity specified.  Password complexity policy
#. is usually set only after the device has synchronized with an enterprise
#. exchange server.  Administrators should
#. check the value of the PasswordComplexity attribute of the
#. DeviceLockRequired element under MobilePolicy in the
#. AnyConnect profile to ensure it is correct.
#. Doc: The AnyConnect profile requires the Mobile Device to be protected
#. by mobile device policy that is set only when the device has
#. synchronized with an enterprise exchange server.  The client has
#. determined that the device has not yet been synchronized with an Exchange
#. server configured with security policy. Administrators should
#. check the value of the MobilePolicy settings in the AnyConnect profile
#. to ensure they are correct.
msgid "Failed to verify required local security policy.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "无法验证所需的本地安全策略。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

#. Doc: The AnyConnect profile requires the Mobile Device to be protected
#. by mobile device policy, but the current operating system of the
#. mobile device cannot be determined.  Administrators should ensure
#. that they have the latest version of the AnyConnect client available
#. from Cisco installed to ensure maximum device compatibility.
msgid "Cannot verify required local security policy.  This device is not supported.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "无法验证所需的本地安全策略。 不支持该设备。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

#. Doc: The client is configured to not allow automatic reconnection of a VPN
#. connection which experences a connection failure. The VPN connection has
#. experienced a connection failure and has been disconnected as a result.
msgid "The VPN client agent encountered a connection failure and the reconnect capability is disabled.  The VPN connection has been disconnected.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理遇到连接失败，并且重新连接功能被禁用。 VPN连接已断开。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The client has experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error. The error
#. is possibly due to one of the following:
#. * Unable to access an internal data structure that is expected to always be
#. available.
#. * Unable to retrieve a profile setting for which a value, at the very least
#. a default, should always be available.
#. * A Windows Terminal Services operation failed.
msgid "The VPN client agent experienced an unexpected internal error.  The VPN connection has been disconnected.  Please restart your computer or device, then try again."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理遇到意外的内部错误。 VPN连接已断开。 请重新启动计算机或设备，然后重试。"

#. Doc: The client is configured to only allow one local console user (versus a
#. remote desktop user) and another user had logged into the local console of
#. the end-point system. The new user was not authenticated by the secure
#. gateway for access to the private network, so the VPN connection has been
#. disconnected to ensure the protection of the private network.
msgid "Another user has logged into your computer locally, and only one local user is allowed.  The VPN connection has been disconnected.  Close all sensitive networked applications."
msgstr "另一用户已在本地登录您的计算机，并且只允许一个本地用户。 VPN连接已断开。 关闭所有敏感的联网应用程序。"

#. Doc: The client is not configured to allow multiple local console users (versus
#. remote desktop users) and there are multiple local users currently logged
#. into the end-point system. The other local console users are not
#. authenticated by the secure gateway for access to the private network, so
#. the VPN connection has not been allowed to ensure the protection of the
#. private network.
msgid "AnyConnect profile settings mandate a single local user, but multiple local users are currently logged into your computer.  A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "AnyConnect配置文件设置要求一个本地用户，但是当前有多个本地用户登录到您的计算机。 无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client service detected a remote console disconnect within 90 seconds
#. of the VPN connection establishment. The client therefore presumes the VPN
#. connection's route configuration was responsible for cutting off the remote
#. console session, so the VPN connection is disconnected to restore the
#. end-point system's IP forwarding table configuration and thereby allow the
#. remote console session to be re-established. Remote console users should
#. wait more than 90 seconds following VPN connection establishment before
#. disconnecting their remote console session to avoid this condition.
msgid "The VPN connection was started by a remote desktop user whose remote console has been disconnected.  It is presumed the VPN routing configuration is responsible for the remote console disconnect.  The VPN connection has been disconnected to allow the remote console to connect again.  A remote desktop user must wait 90 seconds after VPN establishment before disconnecting the remote console to avoid this condition."
msgstr "VPN连接由远程控制台已断开连接的远程桌面用户启动。 假定VPN路由配置负责远程控制台断开连接。 VPN连接已断开，以允许远程控制台再次连接。 远程桌面用户必须在VPN建立后等待90秒钟，然后才能断开远程控制台的连接，以避免这种情况。"

#. Doc: The client's MTU configuration sent from the secure gateway is too small to
#. support IPv6 data through a VPN connection. The client requires that the MTU
#. be set to 1280 or larger when an IPv6 address is assigned by the secure gateway.
msgid "The client's MTU configuration sent from the secure gateway is too small.  A value of at least 1280 is required in order to tunnel IPv6 traffic.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "从安全网关发送的客户端MTU配置太小。 为了传送IPv6流量，至少需要1280。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

#. Doc: A rare problem was encountered with the server certificate. The secure
#. gateway administrator should check the validity of the secure gateway's
#. server certificate.
msgid "The certificate on the secure gateway is invalid. A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "安全网关上的证书无效。 无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: A security threat was detected in the received server certificate.  This is
#. likely the result of a null character prefix attack.
msgid "A security threat has been detected in the received server certificate. A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "在收到的服务器证书中检测到安全威胁。 无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client is configured to leave the VPN connection connected following
#. logoff of the local console user. It is also configured to only allow the
#. same user to log back on to the local console with the VPN connection
#. remaining connected, and a different user has logged into the local console.
#. The different user was not authenticated by the secure gateway for access
#. to the private network, so the VPN connection has been disconnected to
#. ensure the protection of the private network.
msgid "A user other than the one who started the VPN connection has logged into the computer locally. The VPN connection has been disconnected. Close all sensitive networked applications."
msgstr "除启动VPN连接的用户以外的其他用户已在本地登录计算机。 VPN连接已断开。 关闭所有敏感的联网应用程序。"

#. Doc: The client has attempted to apply system configuration settings
#. received from the Secure Gateway to the system.  The error has
#. occured in the System Network Abstraction Kit (SNAK) layer, which
#. may indicate an error with vendor-supplied plugins external to
#. AnyConnect.
msgid "System configuration settings could not be applied. A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "无法应用系统配置设置。 无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection was terminated due to the incorrect handling of a VPN
#. reconnection failure. This is due to a flaw in the client software.
msgid "The VPN client agent encountered an error."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理遇到错误。"

#. Doc: The client is configured for "Always On" with a connect failure policy of
#. "closed" and a captive portal remediation timeout setting, which has now
#. expired. Full network access, to allow the user to fulfill the captive
#. portal requirements, is only granted until the remediation timeout expires,
#. at which point network access is restricted for the protection of the
#. end-point system. A manually initiated connection attempt will restore full
#. network access and restart the remediation timeout.
msgid "Network access is restricted due to an administrator configured timer expiration. The connection must be retried manually."
msgstr "由于管理员配置的计时器到期，因此网络访问受到限制。 必须手动重试连接。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection was started via a web browser, requiring that the client
#. service start the client's user interface application. The client service's
#. attempt to launch the user interface application failed.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed to launch the client's user interface application."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法启动客户端的用户界面应用程序。"

#. Doc: The client service received a request from another client process to launch
#. a client application. The client service encountered an unexpected and
#. unrecoverable failure while attempting send a success notification back to
#. the requesting client process.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to send a success response to an IPC peer requesting the launch of an application."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法向请求启动应用程序的IPC对等方发送成功响应。"

#. Doc: The client service received a request from another client process to launch
#. a client application. The client service encountered an unexpected and
#. unrecoverable failure while attempting send an error notification back to the
#. requesting client process.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to send a failure response to an IPC peer requesting the launch of an application."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法向请求启动应用程序的IPC对等方发送失败响应。"

#. Doc: The client service received a request from another client process to
#. initiate a VPN connection. The client service encountered an unexpected and
#. unrecoverable failure while attempting send a success notification back to the
#. requesting client process.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to send a success response to an IPC peer requesting the creation of a VPN connection."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法将成功响应发送给请求建立VPN连接的IPC对等方。"

#. Doc: The client service received a request from another client process to
#. initiate a VPN connection. The client service encountered an unexpected and
#. unrecoverable failure while attempting send an error notification back to the
#. requesting client process.
msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to send a failure response to an IPC peer requesting the creation of a VPN connection."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法将失败响应发送给请求建立VPN连接的IPC对等方。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error
#. while processing a request from another client process to launch a client
#. application.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed in receiving a message from an IPC peer requesting the launch of an application."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理未能从IPC对等方收到请求启动应用程序的消息。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error
#. while processing a request from another client process to initiate a VPN
#. connection.
msgid "The VPN client agent failed in receiving a message from an IPC peer requesting the creation of a VPN connection."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理未能从IPC对等方收到请求创建VPN连接的消息。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. initializing the main thread of the AnyConnect for Apple iOS VPN
#. plugin.
msgid "The VPN client agent attempt to signal readiness to the plugin thread failed."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理尝试向插件线程发出准备就绪信号，但失败。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. initializing the trusted network detection subsystem.
msgid "The VPN client agent experienced a failure initializing trusted network detection."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理在初始化受信任的网络检测时遇到故障。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable error while
#. initializing a required internal timer object.
msgid "The VPN client agent experienced a failure initializing a required timer."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理在初始化所需的计时器时遇到故障。"

#. Doc: The end-point's network interface being used by the VPN connection has lost
#. network connectivity (the interface is disconnected or no longer has a
#. usable IP address). As a result, the VPN connection attempt failed or VPN
#. reconnect attempts have been halted due to VPN session or idle timeout
#. expiration.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to the loss of the network interface used for the VPN connection."
msgstr "由于丢失了用于VPN连接的网络接口，VPN连接被终止。"

#. Doc: The client service encountered an unexpected and unrecoverable error in the
#. IPsec protocol stack. This is possibly due to a flaw in the client
#. software.
msgid "The VPN client agent IPsec engine encountered an error."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理IPsec引擎遇到错误。"

#. Doc: The user is notified that they must login again after successfully performing
#. certificate enrollment.  This allows the newly acquired certificate to be used as
#. credentials in the new connection.
#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. Certificate enrollment through SCEP succeeded. In order to use the new
#. certificate, a new connection must be made.
msgid "Certificate enrollment succeeded. Your session will be disconnected. Please login again."
msgstr "证书注册成功。 您的会话将被断开。 请重新登录。"

#. Doc: The user is notified that they must either associate the certificate with a
#. VPN configuration or use auto cert selection and login again after successfully performing
#. certificate enrollment. This allows the newly acquired certificate to be used as credentials
#. in the new connection.
msgid "Certificate Enrollment - Certificate successfully imported. Before reconnecting, please either associate the certificate with your VPN connection or choose \"Automatic\" certificate selection."
msgstr "证书注册-证书成功导入。 重新连接之前，请将证书与您的VPN连接关联，或选择\"自动"\证书选择。"

#. Doc: The client cannot contact with the gateway.  This could be due to general
#. loss of network connectivity or a problem with the gateway.
#. Doc: An automatic reconnection has been intitiated due to loss of communication with
#. the gateway.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to a loss of communication with the secure gateway. A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接由于与安全网关的通信中断而终止。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The client has lost communication with the gateway and automatic reconnects
#. are either not supported by or are disabled on the gateway.
msgid "The VPN client Agent encountered a connection failure and the reconnect capability is not supported by the secure gateway.  The VPN connection has been disconnected.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理遇到连接故障，并且安全网关不支持重新连接功能。 VPN连接已断开。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The client and the gateway have no mutually acceptable cryptographic algorithms.
#. The client has a fixed set of cryptographic algorithms that it proposes to the
#. gateway.  Ensure that the gateway is properly configured with one or more of the
#. acceptable algorithms.
msgid "The cryptographic algorithms required by the secure gateway do not match those supported by AnyConnect.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "安全网关所需的加密算法与AnyConnect支持的算法不匹配。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

#. Doc: An authentication failure has occurred.  This could indicate that the gateway's
#. server certificate is not trusted by the client (server failed authentication) or
#. that the user credentials are wrong or unacceptable (client failed authentication).
#. In the first case, be sure that the gateway's server certificate is valid and that
#. the CA certificate is in the end-point's certificate store as a trusted CA.  In
#. latter case, verify that the user's credentials are valid.  For client certificates
#. ensure that the certificate is valid.
#. Alternatively, the authentication failure could be due to the user taking too long to
#. authenticate, in which case the user should re-enter the credentials in a more timely
#. fashion and retry the connection.
msgid "The IPsec VPN connection was terminated due to an authentication failure or timeout.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "IPsec VPN连接由于身份验证失败或超时而终止。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

#. Doc: The client service was stopped in order to perform an automatic upgrade of
#. the client software.  The client service will restart automatically.
msgid "The VPN client service has been stopped for upgrade."
msgstr "VPN客户端服务已停止升级。"

#. Doc: Certificate enrollment failed.  This could be due to network connectivity to the
#. back-end CA, gateway mis-configuration, client profile mis-configuration or bad
#. user input during certificate enrollment.
msgid "Certificate enrollment failed. Please try again or contact your IT administrator for more information."
msgstr "证书注册失败。 请重试或联系您的IT管理员以获取更多信息。"

#. Doc: AnyConnect received an authentication error while trying to reconnect to the
#. secure gateway. This usually is caused by an unexpected error on the secure
#. gateway causing the VPN session to be removed. The only solution is to
#. make a new VPN connection to the secure gateway.
msgid "The VPN client Agent encountered a connection failure and reconnect attempts have failed.  The VPN connection has been disconnected.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理遇到连接失败，并且重新连接尝试失败。 VPN连接已断开。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection attempt was not yet fully authenticated when the end-point
#. system went into a suspended mode (sleep, hibernate, etc). The user must
#. start a new connection and re-authenticate when the end-point system resumes
#. from the suspended mode.
msgid "The VPN connection attempt was aborted due to the system suspending.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "由于系统挂起，VPN连接尝试已中止。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The secure gateway terminated the VPN connection due to inactivity.  This
#. occurs when no traffic has been received at the gateway from the client
#. for the duration if the idle timeout period.  The idle timeout period is
#. configured on the secure gateway.
msgid "The VPN connection has been terminated due to inactivity.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "由于不活动，VPN连接已终止。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection was terminated by the secure gateway administrator.  This
#. occurs when the gateway administrator manually disconnects the session from
#. the gateway console.
msgid "The secure gateway administrator has terminated the VPN connection."
msgstr "安全网关管理员已终止VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection has been terminated due to the secure gateway being shutdown.
#. This occurs when the gateway administrator issues an orderly shutdown of the
#. gateway.
msgid "The VPN connection has been terminated due to the secure gateway being shutdown.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "由于安全网关关闭，VPN连接已终止。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection has been terminated due to the secure gateway being overloaded.
#. This occurs when the gateway is overloaded and running low on resources.
msgid "The VPN connection has been terminated due to the secure gateway being overloaded.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "由于安全网关过载，VPN连接已终止。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection has been terminated due to the secure gateway being rebooted.
#. This occurs when the gateway administrator issues an orderly reboot of the
#. gateway.
msgid "The VPN connection has been terminated due to the secure gateway being rebooted.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "由于重新启动了安全网关，VPN连接已终止。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The server certificate received from the secure gateway differs from the one received
#. during the initial connection attempt and the reconnect attempt is being aborted. This
#. can happen if the network administrator changes the server certificate after the user
#. has made a successfull VPN connection. A new connection attempt is required so the new
#. server certificate can be verified.
msgid "The server certificate received from the secure gateway during the reconnect attempt differs from the one received during the initial connection.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "在重新连接尝试期间从安全网关收到的服务器证书与在初始连接期间收到的服务器证书不同。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

msgid "The VPN connection has been disconnected by the secure gateway due to client certificate validation failure."
msgstr "由于客户端证书验证失败，VPN连接已被安全网关断开连接。"

#. Doc: An unrecoverable error has occurred in the DNS component that is used to control DNS behavior across
#. all network adapters for the duration of the VPN tunnel.
msgid "The VPN client agent's DNS component experienced an unexpected error.  The VPN connection has been disconnected.  Please restart your computer or device, then try again."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理的DNS组件遇到意外错误。 VPN连接已断开。 请重新启动计算机或设备，然后重试。"

#. Doc: The client service experienced an unexpected and unrecoverable failure while
#. performing event and timer control processing. This is due to a flaw in the
#. client software.
msgid "The client agent experienced an event or timer processing control failure."
msgstr "客户端代理遇到事件或计时器处理控制失败。"

#. Doc: macOS 10.13 or higher blocks kernel extensions by default. The dynamic split tunneling
#. feature requires the AnyConnect kernel extension which had not been approved by the user
#. via the Security & Privacy macOS preference.
msgid "The VPN connection cannot be established due to OS restrictions preventing full operation of AnyConnect.  Please change the Security & Privacy system pane to allow loading of Cisco System Extension."
msgstr "由于操作系统限制，无法建立VPN连接，从而阻止了AnyConnect的全面运行。 请更改“安全性和隐私”系统窗格以允许加载Cisco System Extension。"

#. Doc: The client and the gateway have no mutually acceptable cryptographic algorithms.
#. The client has a fixed set of cryptographic algorithms that it proposes to the
#. gateway.  When FIPS Mode is configured to On, this set of algorithms is further
#. limited to those approved by the FIPS specification.  Configure FIPS Mode to Off
#. or ensure that the gateway is properly configured with one or more of the
#. acceptable algorithms.
msgid "The cryptographic algorithms required by the secure gateway do not match those supported by AnyConnect when running in FIPS Mode.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "在FIPS模式下运行时，安全网关所需的加密算法与AnyConnect支持的加密算法不匹配。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

#. Doc: No TunTap driver was found and is required to run this software. Make sure that if a tun.ko is available
#. it is placed in the correct location on the filesystem for it to be insmodded.
msgid "This device does not meet minimum requirements to run this software (TunTap driver could not be located)."
msgstr "该设备不满足运行该软件的最低要求（找不到TunTap驱动程序）。"

#. Doc: iptables executable could not be found and is required to run this software. Make sure that iptables is
#. in the correct location on the filesystem.
msgid "This device does not meet minimum requirements to run this software (iptables executable could not be found)."
msgstr "该设备不满足运行该软件的最低要求（找不到iptables可执行文件）。"

#. Doc: iptables was found but could not be executed. Make sure that the iptables executable has correct permissions set
#. has the correct binary comptability.
msgid "This device does not meet minimum requirements to run this software (iptables executable could not be executed)."
msgstr "该设备不满足运行该软件的最低要求（无法执行iptables可执行文件）。"

msgid "AnyConnect does not currently support IPv6 only networks. If on a mobile network, change the APN type to IPv4. Please refer to the Release Notes for more information."
msgstr "AnyConnect当前不支持仅IPv6网络。 如果在移动网络上，请将APN类型更改为IPv4。 请参考发行说明以获取更多信息。"

msgid "The MDM configuration does not match the headend configuration. Please contact your network administrator"
msgstr "MDM配置与头端配置不匹配。 请联系您的网络管理员"

msgid "The Per-App VPN configuration received from the secure gateway is invalid.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "从安全网关收到的Per-App VPN配置无效。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

msgid "The Per-App VPN configuration received from the secure gateway is unsupported.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "不支持从安全网关收到的Per-App VPN配置。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

msgid "The VPN configuration received from the secure gateway is invalid for the Per-App connection.  Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "从安全网关收到的VPN配置对于Per-App连接无效。 请与您的网络管理员联系。"

msgid "System configuration settings could not be applied. Please disable Wi-Fi assistant and any Always-on VPN connections."
msgstr "无法应用系统配置设置。 请禁用Wi-Fi助手和所有永远在线的VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The management VPN tunnel has been disconnected due to a user controllable VPN tunnel
#. being initiated.
msgid "A user controllable VPN connection has been initiated. The management VPN connection has been disconnected."
msgstr "用户可控制的VPN连接已启动。 管理VPN连接已断开。"

msgid "The VPN client agent was unable to initialize the management tunnel component."
msgstr "VPN客户端代理无法初始化管理隧道组件。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection was terminated without a reconnect reason code having
#. been set. This is due to a flaw in the client software.
msgid "An unknown error has occurred in the VPN client service while trying to reconnect."
msgstr "尝试重新连接时，VPN客户端服务中发生未知错误。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection due to a failure to rekey the encryption protocol.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to a rekey failure and could not be automatically re-established.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接由于密钥更新失败而终止，因此无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection due to a failure to perform a DHCP renewal of the
#. client's private network IP addresses.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to an IP address renewal failure and could not be automatically re-established.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接由于IP地址更新失败而终止，因此无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection due to the secure gateway returning a different
#. private network IP address in response to an IP address renewal request.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to a different client IP address assignment by the secure gateway and could not be automatically re-established.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "由于安全网关分配了不同的客户端IP地址，因此VPN连接已终止，因此无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection because the secure gateway closed the connection.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated by the secure gateway and could not be automatically re-established.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接已由安全网关终止，无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection due to a change in the end-point system's IP
#. forwarding table change that could not be corrected by the client's host
#. configuration management subsystem.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to a system routing table modification and could not be automatically re-established.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接由于系统路由表修改而终止，因此无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection due to a connection failure or disruption. This
#. could be due to a local network failure, internet device failure, or
#. secure gateway failure.
msgid "The VPN connection to the secure gateway was disrupted and could not be automatically re-established.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "到安全网关的VPN连接已中断，无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. another automatic reconnection due to a modified VPN connection
#. configuration from the secure gateway.
msgid "The VPN connection was re-established but the secure gateway assigned a new configuration that could not be successfully applied.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接已重新建立，但是安全网关分配了无法成功应用的新配置。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection due to the loss of the physical network interface
#. being used by the VPN connection.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to the loss of the network interface.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "由于网络接口丢失，VPN连接被终止。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection due to an end-point system suspend and resume.
msgid "The VPN connection could not be automatically re-established following a system resume from standby or hibernate.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "系统从待机或休眠状态恢复后，无法自动重新建立VPN连接。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection due to a Windows connection manager failure.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to a Windows connection manager failure.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "由于Windows连接管理器故障，VPN连接被终止。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required
#. automatic reconnection due to continuation from having been paused.
msgid "The VPN connection could not be re-established when attempting to resume from the paused connection state."
msgstr "尝试从暂停的连接状态恢复时，无法重新建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client attempted to rekey the VPN conenction but the rekey attempt failed.
#. An automatic reconnect was initiated.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to a rekey failure and could not be automatically re-established. A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接由于密钥更新失败而终止，因此无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The client has detected that the current tunnel MTU was incorrect. The VPN connection was torn down,
#. but the connection could not be reestablished to enforce the correct tunnel MTU.
#. If the problem persists, the tunnel MTU may need to be overriden by configuring the secure gateway's
#. svc-mtu setting.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to incorrect tunnel MTU and could not be automatically re-established.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接由于隧道MTU错误而终止，因此无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: Automatic VPN reconnection attempts failed. The VPN connection required automatic reconnection
#. due to a new network interface.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to a new network interface and could not be automatically re-established.  A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接由于新的网络接口而终止，因此无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

#. Doc: The VPN virtual adapter needs to be restarted in order to apply a newly determined MTU.
msgid "The VPN connection was terminated to enforce a newly determined tunnel MTU and could not be automatically re-established. A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接已终止，以强制执行新确定的隧道MTU，因此无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

msgid "The VPN connection was terminated due to the detection of a routing loop and could not be automatically re-established. A new connection is necessary, which requires re-authentication."
msgstr "VPN连接由于检测到路由环路而终止，因此无法自动重新建立。 需要新的连接，这需要重新身份验证。"

msgid "Configuring IPv6 system settings. Please wait..."
msgstr "配置IPv6系统设置。 请耐心等待..."

msgid "Restoring IPv6 system settings. Please wait..."
msgstr "恢复IPv6系统设置。 请耐心等待..."

msgid "AnyConnect VPN"
msgstr "AnyConnect VPN"

msgid "Cannot create a VPN connection, missing host name."
msgstr "无法创建VPN连接，缺少主机名。"

msgid "MD5 Thumbprint"
msgstr "MD5指纹"

msgid "Pausing"
msgstr "暂停中"

msgid "Connected"
msgstr "连接的"

msgid "Advanced Settings"
msgstr "高级设置"

#, c-format
msgid "Please choose a different description, \"%1$s\" already exists."
msgstr "请选择其他描述，\"%1$s\"已经存在。"

msgid "Tunneling Mode (IPv6)"
msgstr "隧道模式（IPv6）"

msgid "Unknown incompatibility."
msgstr "未知的不兼容性。"

msgid "Waiting for authentication"
msgstr "等待认证"

msgid "Language Code"
msgstr "语言代码"

msgid "Detailed Statistics"
msgstr "详细统计"

msgid "This connection is controlled by MDM."
msgstr "此连接由MDM控制。"

msgid "An error occurred when trying to get the profile contents."
msgstr "尝试获取配置文件内容时发生错误。"

msgid "VPN"
msgstr "VPN"

msgid "URI to Certificate"
msgstr "证书的URI"

msgid "Exit"
msgstr "退出"

msgid "Import Localization..."
msgstr "导入本地化…"

msgid "Could not find valid client certificate, setting Automatic Auth mode for the vpn profile"
msgstr "找不到有效的客户端证书，为vpn配置文件设置了自动身份验证模式"

msgid "Sent"
msgstr "已发送"

msgid "Invalid URI Specified"
msgstr "指定的URI无效"

msgid "Email Address"
msgstr "电子邮件地址"

msgid "Profile import in progress. Please wait..."
msgstr "配置文件导入正在进行中。 请耐心等待..."

msgid "Connection to VPN Service failed"
msgstr "与VPN服务的连接失败"

msgid "Certificate has expired."
msgstr "证书已过期。"

msgid "IKE Identity"
msgstr "IKE身份"

msgid "Connecting"
msgstr "连接中"

msgid "This version of AnyConnect does not support x86 devices. Please uninstall this app and install AnyConnect ICS+."
msgstr "此版本的AnyConnect不支持x86设备。 请卸载此应用并安装AnyConnect ICS +。"

msgid "Purpose"
msgstr "目的"

msgid "Cannot scan QR code because the camera permission is not granted"
msgstr "由于未授予相机权限，因此无法扫描QR码"

msgid "Tunneling Mode"
msgstr "隧道模式"

msgid "Please wait while AnyConnect is initializing..."
msgstr "请稍候，AnyConnect正在初始化..."

msgid "Client (IPV6)"
msgstr "客户端（IPV6）"

msgid "Critical"
msgstr "危急"

msgid "Successfully created a new VPN connection."
msgstr "成功创建新的VPN连接。"

#, c-format
msgid "Another application has requested that AnyConnect connect to %1$s."
msgstr "另一个应用程序已请求AnyConnect连接到%1$s。"

msgid "The debug log configuration is saved successfully. Please restart the application for changes to take effect."
msgstr "调试日志配置已成功保存。 请重新启动应用程序以使更改生效。"

msgid "No tools were found for this activity."
msgstr "找不到用于此活动的工具。"

msgid "Server"
msgstr "服务器"

msgid "Certificate Options"
msgstr "证书选项"

msgid "Client Address"
msgstr "客户地址"

msgid "Unable to change active connection. You must be in the disconnected state to do this."
msgstr "无法更改活动连接。 您必须处于断开状态才能执行此操作。"

msgid "VPN Service is shutting down because a critical component cannot be initialized."
msgstr "VPN服务正在关闭，因为无法初始化关键组件。"

msgid "Successfully restored localization data."
msgstr "成功还原了本地化数据。"

msgid "AnyConnect cannot scan QR code unless the Google Play Service problem is solved."
msgstr "除非解决了Google Play服务问题，否则AnyConnect无法扫描QR码。"

msgid "State or Province"
msgstr "州或省"

msgid "View and manage the system and AnyConnect certificate stores."
msgstr "查看和管理系统和AnyConnect证书存储。"

#, c-format
msgid "Could not get file list for %1s. Un-mounting your SDcard from your computer may solve this issue."
msgstr "无法获取%1s的文件列表。 从计算机上卸载SD卡可以解决此问题。"

msgid "Error: Failed to disconnect."
msgstr "错误：无法断开连接。"

msgid "AnyConnect requires a network connection to complete setup.  Please connect to a WiFi network to complete installation."
msgstr "AnyConnect需要网络连接才能完成设置。 请连接到WiFi网络以完成安装。"

msgid "Customizing Debug Logs"
msgstr "自定义调试日志"

msgid "Device Identifiers"
msgstr "设备标识符"

msgid "Click here to resume the connection."
msgstr "单击此处恢复连接。"

msgid "Unsupported Configuration"
msgstr "不支持的配置"

msgid "Extended Key Usage"
msgstr "扩展密钥用法"

msgid "Issued to"
msgstr "发出给"

msgid "A problem occurred while completing setup."
msgstr "完成安装时出现问题。"

msgid "Please enter VPN credentials"
msgstr "请输入VPN凭证"

msgid "Localization Management"
msgstr "本地化管理"

msgid "Certificate must be chosen for Manual Certificate Authentication."
msgstr "必须为手动证书认证选择证书。"

msgid "No active connection is set. Cannot establish a connection."
msgstr "未设置活动连接。 无法建立连接。"

msgid "Please modify Advanced Settings only when instructed by your system administrator."
msgstr "请仅在系统管理员的指导下修改高级设置。"

msgid "Remember password"
msgstr "记住密码"

msgid "Message Log"
msgstr "讯息记录"

msgid "(Limited Features)"
msgstr "（有限功能）"

msgid "No certificate was passed, exiting."
msgstr "没有证书通过，正在退出。"

msgid "Unable to remove connection: "
msgstr "无法删除连接："

msgid "BarcodeDetector dependencies cannot be downloaded due to low device storage"
msgstr "由于设备存储空间不足，无法下载BarcodeDetector依赖项"

msgid "Not Valid Before:"
msgstr "之前无效："

msgid "The server you are trying to access could not be verified by the system. Do you wish to proceed?"
msgstr "系统无法验证您尝试访问的服务器。 你要继续吗？"

msgid "VPN Connection - None Selected"
msgstr "VPN连接-未选择"

msgid "Problem:"
msgstr "问题："

msgid "Disallowed Apps"
msgstr "禁止使用的应用"

msgid "Get Certificate"
msgstr "取得证书"

msgid "Prompt"
msgstr "提示"

msgid "Email Logs"
msgstr "电子邮件记录"

msgid "Tools"
msgstr "工具类"

msgid "Sending Email ..."
msgstr "正在发送电子邮件..."

msgid "Enabled - Outside applications are allowed to control AnyConnect without confirmation."
msgstr "已启用-允许外部应用程序未经确认即可控制AnyConnect。"

msgid "(Unchanged)"
msgstr "（不变）"

msgid "Allowed Apps"
msgstr "允许的应用"

msgid "Are you sure you want to clear the logs?"
msgstr "您确定要清除日志吗？"

msgid 
"AnyConnect requires access to information about your device, such as its IMEI, which will be shared with your IT administrator.\n"
"\n"
"On the following screen, you will be asked to grant permission for AnyConnect to gather this information.\n"
"\n"
"AnyConnect will not make or manage phone calls."
msgstr 
"AnyConnect要求访问有关您设备的信息，例如其IMEI，这些信息将与您的IT管理员共享。\n"
"\n"
"在以下屏幕上，系统将要求您授予AnyConnect收集此信息的权限。\n"
"\n"
"AnyConnect将不会拨打或管理电话。"

msgid "Import an AnyConnect XML profile from the filesystem or network location (URI)."
msgstr "从文件系统或网络位置（URI）导入AnyConnect XML配置文件。"

msgid "Memory Map Information"
msgstr "内存映射信息"

msgid "Delete Profile"
msgstr "删除个人资料"

msgid "The certificate import has failed."
msgstr "证书导入失败。"

msgid "Disconnecting... please wait."
msgstr "正在断开连接...请稍候。"

msgid "Invalid Host Address (too long)"
msgstr "无效的主机地址（太长）"

msgid "If you choose a standards-based EAP authentication method, please enter the client identity."
msgstr "如果您选择基于标准的EAP身份验证方法，请输入客户端身份。"

msgid "AnyConnect is running in the background"
msgstr "AnyConnect在后台运行"

msgid "The selected file was too big to be imported."
msgstr "所选文件太大，无法导入。"

msgid "Client Certificate (Device Credential Storage)"
msgstr "客户端证书（设备凭据存储）"

msgid "Blocked Apps"
msgstr "被阻止的应用"

msgid "Intermediate Certificate"
msgstr "中级证书"

msgid "Add New VPN Connection"
msgstr "添加新的VPN连接"

msgid "Security Risks Explained"
msgstr "安全风险说明"

msgid "When VPN FIPS (Federal Information Processing Standards) mode is enabled, AnyConnect provides its highest level of security. The cryptographic modules used by AnyConnect in VPN FIPS mode are validated as compliant with FIPS 140-2. Your system administrator may recommend changing this setting from the default value."
msgstr "启用VPN FIPS（联邦信息处理标准）模式后，AnyConnect将提供其最高的安全性。 经验证，AnyConnect在VPN FIPS模式下使用的加密模块符合FIPS 140-2的要求。 您的系统管理员可能建议您将此设置更改为默认值。"

msgid "Are you sure you want to delete your AnyConnect XML profile?"
msgstr "您确定要删除AnyConnect XML配置文件吗？"

msgid "The following error message was encountered:"
msgstr "遇到以下错误消息："

msgid "Active"
msgstr "活性"

msgid "Show password"
msgstr "显示密码"

msgid "Successfully deleted certificate(s)."
msgstr "成功删除证书。"

msgid "Server Address invalid."
msgstr "服务器地址无效。"

msgid "Performing cryptographic integrity check. Please wait..."
msgstr "执行加密完整性检查。 请耐心等待..."

msgid "Do you want to allow this?"
msgstr "您要允许吗？"

msgid "Are you sure you want to delete all AnyConnect certificates? This cannot be undone."
msgstr "您确定要删除所有AnyConnect证书吗？ 这不能被撤消。"

msgid "Algorithm"
msgstr "算法"

msgid "Import Certificate"
msgstr "进口证明书"

#, c-format
msgid "Could not get file list for %1s."
msgstr "无法获取%1s的文件列表。"

msgid "Unrecoverable error occurred when saving the connection."
msgstr "保存连接时发生不可恢复的错误。"

msgid "Route Information"
msgstr "路由信息"

msgid "Carrier Service Blocked"
msgstr "运营商服务被阻止"

msgid "Could not create the VPN connection. A connection with this name already exists."
msgstr "无法创建VPN连接。 具有该名称的连接已存在。"

msgid 
"***Current Profile Is Too Large*** \n"
" (Showing partial profile)\n"
msgstr 
"***当前配置文件太大*** \n"
"  （显示部分资料）\n"
msgid "Certificate Summary"
msgstr 

msgid "HTC Android 5.0 does not support this release of HTC AnyConnect. Please uninstall this HTC AnyConnect  app and install AnyConnect ICS+."
msgstr "HTC Android 5.0不支持此版本的HTC AnyConnect。 请卸载此HTC AnyConnect应用并安装AnyConnect ICS +。"

msgid "Issuer:"
msgstr "发行人："

msgid "Trusted Network Detection"
msgstr "可信网络检测"

msgid "Server Certificate"
msgstr "服务器证书"

msgid "Accept"
msgstr "接受"

msgid "Please Wait..."
msgstr "请耐心等待..."

msgid "Client Certificate (User authentication required)"
msgstr "客户端证书（需要用户认证）"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect"

msgid "Disabled"
msgstr "禁用的"

msgid "Control Frames"
msgstr "控制框"

msgid "Updating group..."
msgstr "正在更新群组..."

msgid "The VPN FIPS mode has been changed. A device reboot is required before it will take effect."
msgstr "VPN FIPS模式已更改。 需要重启设备才能生效。"

msgid "Bytes Received"
msgstr "收到的字节数"

msgid "Restore Localization"
msgstr "恢复本地化"

msgid "Street"
msgstr "街"

msgid "Do not use certificate authentication."
msgstr "不要使用证书身份验证。"

msgid "Certificate Management"
msgstr "证书管理"

msgid "Disconnect"
msgstr "断开"

msgid "Continue"
msgstr "继续"

msgid "specify a certificate to use when connecting to a tunnel group that requires a certificate."
msgstr "指定连接到需要证书的隧道组时要使用的证书。"

msgid "Another VPN program is connected. Please disconnect it and try again."
msgstr "连接了另一个VPN程序。 请断开连接，然后重试。"

msgid "Version"
msgstr "版本"

msgid "VPN FIPS Mode Modified"
msgstr "VPN FIPS模式已修改"

msgid "You must have root access to run this AnyConnect package. Root access is not available by default in Android without modification of the OS. Please see the latest release notes for details on other packages that do not require root access."
msgstr "您必须具有root用户访问权限才能运行此AnyConnect程序包。 如果不修改操作系统，默认情况下，Android中不提供根访问权限。 请参阅最新的发行说明，以获取其他不需要root访问权限的软件包的详细信息。"

#, c-format
msgid "Are you sure you want to delete \"%1$s\"? This cannot be undone."
msgstr "您确定要删除\"%1$s\"吗？ 这不能被撤消。"

msgid "Frames"
msgstr "镜框"

msgid "Completing setup. Please wait..."
msgstr "完成设置。 请耐心等待..."

msgid "Exiting at VPN user request."
msgstr "根据VPN用户请求退出。"

msgid "VPN connection is required by your Device Administrator."
msgstr "设备管理员需要VPN连接。"

msgid "System Information:"
msgstr "系统信息："

msgid "Failed to import localization data from server."
msgstr "无法从服务器导入本地化数据。"

msgid "Gathering Logs"
msgstr "收集日志"

msgid "Not Valid Before"
msgstr "之前无效"

msgid "Copy Text"
msgstr "复制文字"

msgid "This Connection has been modified by another app, closing editor."
msgstr "此连接已由另一个应用程序修改，正在关闭编辑器。"

msgid "Enable Federal Information Processing Standard for VPN"
msgstr "启用VPN的联邦信息处理标准"

msgid "Select a specific certificate"
msgstr "选择一个特定的证书"

msgid "Click to launch AnyConnect."
msgstr "单击以启动AnyConnect。"

msgid "Please describe the problem and steps to reproduce:"
msgstr "请描述问题和重现步骤："

msgid "Time Connected"
msgstr "时间连接"

msgid "Could not create the VPN connection. Invalid host name."
msgstr "无法创建VPN连接。 无效的主机名。"

msgid "Failed to Get Active Connection."
msgstr "无法获得活动连接。"

msgid "Locality"
msgstr "地区性"

msgid "Logs"
msgstr "日志"

msgid "A problem occurred while completing setup. A reboot may fix the problem."
msgstr "完成安装时出现问题。 重新启动可能会解决该问题。"

msgid "Send Logs"
msgstr "发送日志"

msgid "Connect"
msgstr "连接"

msgid "To allow AnyConnect to run in the background while battery saver is on, please change its Battery Optimization setting to \"Not optimized\". You will need to manually reconnect afterward for the setting to take effect."
msgstr 

msgid "No certificates."
msgstr "要在省电模式开启时允许AnyConnect在后台运行，请将其“电池优化”设置更改为\"

msgid "Failed to delete certificate."
msgstr "删除证书失败。"

msgid "Please choose the AnyConnect XML profile (typically ending in .xml) which you wish to import."
msgstr "请选择要导入的AnyConnect XML配置文件（通常以.xml结尾）。"

msgid "Server Address"
msgstr "服务器地址"

msgid "Successfully imported localization data from server."
msgstr "从服务器成功导入了本地化数据。"

msgid "Connection saved successfully."
msgstr "连接已成功保存。"

msgid "Not Available"
msgstr "无法使用"

msgid "Offers 3 different options for using certificate authentication:"
msgstr "提供三种使用证书身份验证的选项："

msgid "Done"
msgstr "完成"

msgid "Disconnected"
msgstr "断线"

msgid "View certificate details"
msgstr "查看证书详细信息"

msgid "Memory Information"
msgstr "内存资讯"

msgid "Root Certificate"
msgstr "根证书"

msgid "Specifies the protocol (SSL/IPsec) for connecting to the ASA. The default is SSL."
msgstr "指定用于连接到ASA的协议（SSL / IPsec）。 默认值为SSL。"

msgid "Import Certificate From URI"
msgstr "从URI导入证书"

msgid "Restoring default localization data."
msgstr "恢复默认的本地化数据。"

msgid "Successfully deleted the AnyConnect profile."
msgstr "成功删除AnyConnect配置文件。"

msgid "Please respond to VPN banner"
msgstr "请回复VPN横幅"

msgid "Clear Logs?"
msgstr "清除日志？"

msgid "Another application has requested that AnyConnect import an AnyConnect XML profile."
msgstr "另一个应用程序已请求AnyConnect导入AnyConnect XML配置文件。"

msgid "Troubleshooting"
msgstr "故障排除"

msgid "Could not get details for Certificate, please try again."
msgstr "无法获取证书的详细信息，请重试。"

msgid "Usage"
msgstr "用法"

msgid "Carrier Service Notification"
msgstr "承运人服务通知"

msgid "Per-App VPN Rules"
msgstr "每应用程式VPN规则"

msgid "Click here to create a connection."
msgstr "单击此处创建连接。"

msgid "Tap to refocus camera"
msgstr "点按即可重新对焦相机"

#, c-format
msgid "Are you sure you want to delete the connection: %1$s?"
msgstr "您确定要删除连接： %1$s吗？"

msgid "Import Profile"
msgstr "导入资料"

msgid "Preferences could not be displayed due to unexpected GUI Error."
msgstr "由于意外的GUI错误，无法显示首选项。"

msgid "External Control"
msgstr "外部控制"

msgid "App Rules"
msgstr "应用规则"

msgid "Launch at Startup"
msgstr "在启动时启动"

msgid "VPN FIPS mode"
msgstr "VPN FIPS模式"

msgid "Process Information"
msgstr "处理信息"

msgid "Exited AnyConnect application and services."
msgstr "退出AnyConnect应用程序和服务。"

msgid "Additional Information"
msgstr "附加信息"

msgid "This is the last HTC AnyConnect release from Cisco, for future software updates and HTC Android 5.0 support you will need AnyConnect ICS+."
msgstr "这是Cisco的最新HTC AnyConnect版本，对于将来的软件更新和HTC Android 5.0支持，您将需要AnyConnect ICS +。"

msgid "Enable protocol level logs for IKEv2 exchanges"
msgstr "为IKEv2交换启用协议级别的日志"

msgid "Another application has requested that AnyConnect connect to the active connection."
msgstr "另一个应用程序已请求AnyConnect连接到活动连接。"

msgid "Troubleshoot"
msgstr "疑难排解"

msgid "VPN Connections"
msgstr "VPN连接"

msgid "An error occurred when trying to delete the AnyConnect profile."
msgstr "尝试删除AnyConnect配置文件时发生错误。"

msgid "Advanced Preferences"
msgstr "高级首选项"

msgid "Off"
msgstr "关"

msgid "Enabled"
msgstr "已启用"

#, c-format
msgid "Another application has requested that AnyConnect create a new connection for %1$s and connect to it."
msgstr "另一个应用程序请求AnyConnect为%1$s创建一个新连接并连接到该连接。"

msgid "Failed to restore default localization data."
msgstr "恢复默认本地化数据失败。"

msgid "Failed to connect to: "
msgstr "无法连接到："

msgid "Hide the AnyConnect icon in status bar when idle"
msgstr "空闲时隐藏状态栏中的AnyConnect图标"

msgid "Invalid Host Name (too long)"
msgstr "无效的主机名（太长）"

msgid "Cannot find the valid AnyConnect URI in QR code"
msgstr "在QR码中找不到有效的AnyConnect URI"

msgid "Carrier services (like MMS) may not function due to VPN.  Disconnect the VPN connection if you would like to allow full network access to the service."
msgstr "由于VPN，运营商服务（如MMS）可能无法正常运行。 如果您想允许对服务的完全网络访问，请断开VPN连接。"

msgid "There are no profiles currently on your device."
msgstr "您的设备上目前没有配置文件。"

msgid "Key Usage"
msgstr "按键用法"

msgid "Issued by"
msgstr "由...发出"

msgid "Settings"
msgstr "设定值"

msgid "Not Set (Optional)"
msgstr "未设置（可选）"

msgid "Access to the camera is needed for QR code detection"
msgstr "QR码检测需要访问相机"

msgid "Feedback to Cisco"
msgstr "对思科的反馈"

msgid "IP Rules"
msgstr "IP规则"

msgid "Performing certificate enrollment."
msgstr "正在执行证书注册。"

msgid "Certificate does not match the server name."
msgstr "证书与服务器名称不匹配。"

msgid "System"
msgstr "系统"

msgid "Org Unit Name"
msgstr "组织单位名称"

msgid "Please enter a language code."
msgstr "请输入语言代码。"

msgid "Managed Configuration"
msgstr "托管配置"

msgid "Debug Log"
msgstr "调试日志"

msgid "Logging and System Information"
msgstr "记录和系统信息"

msgid "The current configuration is not supported by AnyConnect. This may result in unexpected behavior."
msgstr "AnyConnect不支持当前配置。 这可能会导致意外行为。"

msgid "Security Warning: Untrusted Certificate"
msgstr "安全警告：不受信任的证书"

msgid "Cipher"
msgstr "密码"

msgid "expired"
msgstr "已过期"

msgid "Paused (no network)"
msgstr "已暂停（无网络）"

msgid "Unrecoverable error occurred trying to retrieve certificates."
msgstr "尝试检索证书时发生不可恢复的错误。"

msgid "Org Name"
msgstr "组织名称"

msgid "Delete connection"
msgstr "删除连接"

msgid "AnyConnect is currently initializing, please try again."
msgstr "AnyConnect当前正在初始化，请重试。"

msgid "Hide VPN options from the home screen"
msgstr "从主屏幕隐藏VPN选项"

msgid "Diagnostics"
msgstr "诊断程序"

msgid " (user)"
msgstr "（用户）"

msgid "Delete certificate"
msgstr "删除证书"

msgid "Localization Files"
msgstr "本地化文件"

msgid "AnyConnect"
msgstr "AnyConnect"

msgid "Hide Device Management"
msgstr "隐藏设备管理"

msgid "SHA1 Thumbprint"
msgstr "SHA1指纹"

msgid "This version of AnyConnect has been deprecated and will no longer receive software updates from Cisco. To upgrade, uninstall this package and install AnyConnect ICS+ or AnyConnect for Samsung KNOX if you are using the KNOX Workspace."
msgstr "此版本的AnyConnect已过时，将不再从Cisco接收软件更新。 要升级，请卸载此软件包并安装AnyConnect ICS +或适用于Samsung KNOX的AnyConnect（如果您使用的是KNOX Workspace）。"

msgid "Another import is currently in progress."
msgstr "另一个导入目前正在进行中。"

msgid "File System"
msgstr "文件系统"

#, c-format
msgid "Exiting will disconnect from current connection to \"%1$s\". Disconnect and exit?"
msgstr "退出将断开当前与\"%1$s\"的连接。 断开连接并退出？"

msgid "Serial (hex)"
msgstr "串行（十六进制）"

msgid "System Properties"
msgstr "系统属性"

msgid "Unable to set changes, please try again."
msgstr "无法设置更改，请重试。"

msgid "Client Certificate"
msgstr "客户证书"

msgid "AnyConnect failed to exit cleanly. Please \Force Stop\" AnyConnect using Android Settings. Note that other software may restart AnyConnect automatically."
msgstr "AnyConnect无法干净退出。 请使用Android设置\Force Stop\" AnyConnect。请注意，其他软件可能会自动重新启动AnyConnect。"

msgid "The profile import has failed."
msgstr "配置文件导入失败。"

msgid "View logs and system information."
msgstr "查看日志和系统信息。"

msgid "Failed to connect to VPN Service."
msgstr "无法连接到VPN服务。"

msgid "Failed to register with VPN Service.  Please try restarting the device."
msgstr "无法注册VPN服务。 请尝试重新启动设备。"

msgid "The following VPN configuration(s) created by the user have been renamed to avoid a name conflict with an imported configuration:"
msgstr "用户创建的以下VPN配置已重命名，以避免与导入的配置发生名称冲突："

msgid "Could not find valid client certificate for the given keychain alias"
msgstr "找不到给定钥匙串别名的有效客户端证书"

msgid "This connection is not valid"
msgstr "此连接无效"

msgid "Connecting..."
msgstr "正在连线..."

msgid "Initializing VPN FIPS"
msgstr "初始化VPN FIPS"

msgid "Application Tunnel"
msgstr "应用隧道"

#, c-format
msgid "Could not get file list for %1s. SDcard access issues are a known limitation on certain HTC devices."
msgstr "无法获取%1s的文件列表。 SD卡访问问题是某些HTC设备上的已知限制。"

msgid "VPN FIPS Mode"
msgstr "VPN FIPS模式"

msgid "Manual"
msgstr "手册"

msgid "AnyConnect is configured to block untrusted servers by default. Most users choose to keep this setting."
msgstr "默认情况下，AnyConnect配置为阻止不受信任的服务器。 大多数用户选择保留此设置。"

msgid "Delete Connection"
msgstr "删除连接"

msgid "AnyConnect (small)"
msgstr "AnyConnect（小）"

msgid "Clear Debug Logs"
msgstr "清除调试日志"

msgid "Yes"
msgstr "是"

msgid "VPN Service is shutting down due to an unexpected internal request."
msgstr "由于意外的内部请求，VPN服务正在关闭。"

msgid "Statistics"
msgstr "统计"

msgid "Disconnecting..."
msgstr "断开连接..."

msgid "By default, the client uses the proprietary AnyConnect EAP authentication method. User also has the option to choose standards-based EAP authentication method."
msgstr "默认情况下，客户端使用专有的AnyConnect EAP身份验证方法。 用户还可以选择基于标准的EAP身份验证方法。"

msgid "Restore localization data and import localization files."
msgstr "恢复本地化数据并导入本地化文件。"

msgid "Import"
msgstr "导入"

msgid "Authentication"
msgstr "认证方式"

msgid "Postal Address"
msgstr "邮寄地址"

msgid "Please Enter Both Problem Statement And Steps to Reproduce Before Continuing"
msgstr "请输入问题陈述和重现步骤，然后再继续"

msgid "Disconnecting"
msgstr "断开连接"

msgid "Do not allow connections to servers with untrusted certificates."
msgstr "不允许使用不可信证书连接到服务器。"

msgid "Certificate import in progress. Please wait..."
msgstr "证书导入正在进行中。 请耐心等待..."

msgid "Common Name"
msgstr "通用名"

msgid "Not Set (Required)"
msgstr "未设置（必填）"

msgid "Network Location (URI)"
msgstr "网络位置（URI）"

msgid "External Control allows special hyperlinks to control AnyConnect behavior. Your system administrator may recommend changing this setting from the default value."
msgstr "外部控制允许特殊的超链接控制AnyConnect行为。 您的系统管理员可能建议您将此设置更改为默认值。"

msgid "Secured Routes"
msgstr "安全路线"

msgid "Client Certificate (Knox TIMA)"
msgstr "客户证书（诺克斯TIMA）"

msgid "Non-Secured Routes"
msgstr "非安全路线"

msgid "Confirm fingerprint to continue."
msgstr "确认指纹以继续。"

msgid "Unable to delete certificate(s) provided by an administrator"
msgstr "无法删除管理员提供的证书"

msgid "Received"
msgstr "已收到"

msgid "Transport Information"
msgstr "运输信息"

msgid "Preparing Logs"
msgstr "准备日志"

msgid "If this setting is changed, AnyConnect will no longer automatically block connections to potentially malicious network devices."
msgstr "如果更改此设置，则AnyConnect将不再自动阻止与潜在恶意网络设备的连接。"

msgid "Bytes Sent"
msgstr "发送的字节数"

msgid "Country"
msgstr "国家"

msgid "Connections"
msgstr "连接数"

msgid "AnyConnect will connect and disconnect based on administrator-configured network locations."
msgstr "AnyConnect将根据管理员配置的网络位置进行连接和断开连接。"

msgid "Virtual Private Network"
msgstr "虚拟专用网"

msgid "View Per-App VPN Rules"
msgstr "查看按应用VPN规则"

msgid "Automatic"
msgstr "自动"

msgid "Certificates"
msgstr 

msgid "Fingerprint not recognized"
msgstr "证明书"

msgid "About AnyConnect"
msgstr "关于AnyConnect"

msgid "Cancel"
msgstr "取消"

msgid "Signature"
msgstr "签名"

msgid "Import certificate failed due to timeout."
msgstr "导入证书由于超时而失败。"

msgid "Address Information"
msgstr "地址信息"

msgid "Strict Certificate Trust"
msgstr "严格证书信任"

msgid "IKEv2"
msgstr "IKEv2"

msgid "Connect with IPsec"
msgstr "与IPsec连接"

msgid "Use backup"
msgstr "使用备份"

msgid "Fingerprint recognized"
msgstr "指纹识别"

msgid "The certificate bundle has been successfully imported."
msgstr "证书捆绑包已成功导入。"

msgid "Select Action"
msgstr "选择动作"

msgid "Username:"
msgstr "用户名:"

msgid "Block Untrusted Server"
msgstr "阻止不受信任的服务器"

msgid "Certificate has an invalid date."
msgstr "证书的日期无效。"

msgid "Please enter your IKE identity"
msgstr "请输入您的IKE身份"

msgid "Start AnyConnect services at boot time"
msgstr "在启动时启动AnyConnect服务"

msgid "Feature Configuration"
msgstr "功能配置"

msgid "AnyConnect cannot access its application data. Please try clearing application data from Android Settings."
msgstr "AnyConnect无法访问其应用程序数据。 请尝试从Android设置中清除应用程序数据。"

msgid "Failed to contact remote service."
msgstr "无法联系远程服务。"

msgid "Checking if your device supports AnyConnect, please wait..."
msgstr "正在检查您的设备是否支持AnyConnect，请等待..."

msgid "Touch sensor"
msgstr "触控感应器"

msgid "Most users do not connect to untrusted servers unless the reason for the error condition is known."
msgstr "除非知道错误情况的原因，否则大多数用户不会连接到不受信任的服务器。"

msgid "Details"
msgstr "细节"

msgid "Import Profile From URI"
msgstr "从URI导入配置文件"

#, c-format
msgid "Another application has requested that AnyConnect create a new connection for %1$s."
msgstr "另一个应用程序请求AnyConnect为%1$s创建一个新连接。"

msgid "Error"
msgstr "错误"

msgid "Not Set"
msgstr "没有设置"

msgid "Hide Icon"
msgstr "隐藏图标"

msgid "Import and Continue"
msgstr "导入并继续"

msgid "No connection"
msgstr "没有关联"

msgid "AnyConnect Messages From Debug Log:"
msgstr "来自调试日志的AnyConnect消息："

msgid "Paused (Trusted Network)"
msgstr "已暂停（受信任的网络）"

msgid "Change advanced certificate and protocol settings"
msgstr "更改高级证书和协议设置"

msgid "Certificate"
msgstr "证书"

msgid "VPN Service is shutting down because a critical component cannot be initialized. A reboot may fix the problem."
msgstr "VPN服务正在关闭，因为无法初始化关键组件。 重新启动可能会解决该问题。"

msgid "Delete the current AnyConnect XML profile."
msgstr "删除当前的AnyConnect XML配置文件。"

msgid "AnyConnect does not support execution inside a container."
msgstr "AnyConnect不支持在容器内执行。"

msgid "Certificate is not yet valid."
msgstr "证书尚未生效。"

msgid "Reconnecting"
msgstr "重新连接"

msgid "This connection has been imported from an AnyConnect VPN Profile.  Not all fields can be edited."
msgstr "此连接已从AnyConnect VPN配置文件导入。 并非所有字段都可以编辑。"

msgid "All Route Tables"
msgstr "所有路由表"

msgid "Bytes"
msgstr "字节数"

msgid "The AnyConnect URI could not be parsed."
msgstr "无法解析AnyConnect URI。"

msgid "This connection has been imported by MDM.  Not all fields can be edited."
msgstr "此连接已由MDM导入。 并非所有字段都可以编辑。"

msgid "Status"
msgstr "状态"

msgid "Connection Information"
msgstr "连接信息"

msgid "Validity"
msgstr "有效期"

msgid "Tunneled Apps"
msgstr "隧道应用"

msgid "Untrusted Server!"
msgstr "不受信任的服务器！"

msgid "Expiration Date:"
msgstr "截止日期："

msgid "No profile was chosen."
msgstr "没有选择个人资料。"

msgid "Do not show this again."
msgstr "不再显示此内容。"

msgid "Enable strict certificate trust checking for VPN"
msgstr "对VPN启用严格的证书信任检查"

msgid "Another application has requested that AnyConnect import a certificate bundle to the AnyConnect certificate store."
msgstr "另一个应用程序已请求AnyConnect将证书捆绑包导入AnyConnect证书存储。"

msgid "Client"
msgstr "客户"

msgid "Untrusted VPN Server!"
msgstr "不受信任的VPN服务器！"

msgid "Hide VPN"
msgstr "隐藏VPN"

msgid "Connecting... please wait"
msgstr "正在连接...请稍候"

msgid "Protocol"
msgstr "协议"

msgid "Failed to Get All Localization Files."
msgstr "无法获取所有本地化文件。"

msgid "OCSP Revocation"
msgstr "OCSP撤销"

msgid "Certificate is from an untrusted source."
msgstr "证书来自不受信任的来源。"

msgid "Debug"
msgstr "除错"

msgid "Filter Information"
msgstr "筛选信息"

msgid "Please Confirm."
msgstr "请确认。"

msgid "Enable certificate revocation checking for VPN"
msgstr "启用VPN的证书吊销检查"

msgid "Input:"
msgstr "输入："

msgid "Current Profile Details"
msgstr "当前个人资料详细信息"

msgid "Unexpected error occurred when saving debug log configuration. Previous values will be used."
msgstr "保存调试日志配置时发生意外错误。将使用以前的值。"

msgid "Access internal AnyConnect state"
msgstr "访问内部AnyConnect状态"

msgid "AnyConnect cannot verify the identity of the server:"
msgstr "AnyConnect无法验证服务器的身份："

msgid "Paused"
msgstr "已暂停"

msgid "Edit connection"
msgstr "编辑连接"

msgid "Certificate name not available."
msgstr "证书名称不可用。"

msgid "Disabled (default) - Outside applications will not be able to control AnyConnect. Changing this setting reduces the overall security of AnyConnect."
msgstr "禁用（默认）-外部应用程序将无法控制AnyConnect。更改此设置会降低AnyConnect的整体安全性。"

msgid "Password:"
msgstr "密码："

msgid "A certificate import is already in progress. Please complete that import and try again."
msgstr "证书导入已在进行中。请完成该导入，然后重试。"

msgid "Another application has requested that AnyConnect disconnect from the current connection."
msgstr "另一个应用程序已请求AnyConnect与当前连接断开连接。"

msgid "Postal Code"
msgstr "邮政编码"

msgid "AnyConnect cannot verify the identity of the server you are connecting to. Would you like to continue anyway?"
msgstr "AnyConnect无法验证您要连接的服务器的身份。您仍然要继续吗？"

msgid "Please choose the certificate file (typically ending in .p12 or .pfx) which you wish to import into the AnyConnect certificate store."
msgstr "请选择您想要导入到AnyConnect证书存储中的证书文件（通常以.p12或.pfx结尾）。"

msgid "Default (English)"
msgstr "默认（英语）"

msgid "Connection removed: "
msgstr "连接已删除："

msgid "Report to Administrator"
msgstr "向管理员报告"

msgid "Cisco"
msgstr "思科公司"

msgid "Import Localization from Server"
msgstr "从服务器导入本地化"

msgid "Unexpected GUI Error"
msgstr "意外的GUI错误"

msgid "Failed to Get the Active Localization File."
msgstr "无法获取活动的本地化文件。"

msgid "automatically select a certificate for authentication."
msgstr "自动选择用于认证的证书。"

msgid "Home"
msgstr "首页"

msgid "&lt;a href=\"http://www.cisco.com/c/en/us/td/docs/security/vpn_client/anyconnect/anyconnect40/user/guide/b_Android_AnyConnect_User_Guide_4-0-x.html\"&gt;"
msgstr "＆lt; a href = \“ http：//www.cisco.com/c/en/us/td/docs/security/vpn_client/anyconnect/anyconnect40/user/guide/b_Android_AnyConnect_User_Guide_4-0-x.html \”＆gt;"

msgid "Another operation is currently in progress. Please wait and try again."
msgstr "当前正在进行另一项操作。请等待，然后重试。"

msgid "Steps to Reproduce:"
msgstr "重现步骤："

msgid "Exit?"
msgstr "出口？"

msgid "Access AnyConnect network state provider"
msgstr "访问AnyConnect网络状态提供程序"

msgid "AnyConnect (med)"
msgstr "AnyConnect（中）"

msgid "Recent Notices:"
msgstr "最近通知："

msgid "Online User Guide"
msgstr "在线用户指南"

msgid "Prompt - You will be prompted when outside applications attempt to control AnyConnect."
msgstr "提示-当外部应用程序尝试控制AnyConnect时，将提示您。"

msgid "Refresh"
msgstr "刷新"

msgid "Use your device screen lock (pin, pattern, or password)."
msgstr "使用设备的屏幕锁（密码，图案或密码）。"

msgid "Domain Component"
msgstr "域组件"

msgid "Connections will use IPsec instead of SSL. Information about IPsec parameters can be found in the menu under \"Additional Information\"."
msgstr "连接将使用IPsec而不是SSL。有关IPsec参数的信息，可以在“其他信息”下的菜单中找到。"

msgid "Allows access to AnyConnect network state and profile information."
msgstr "允许访问AnyConnect网络状态和配置文件信息。"

msgid "On"
msgstr "上"

msgid "About"
msgstr "关于"

msgid "OK"
msgstr "好"

msgid "Interface Information"
msgstr "接口信息"

msgid "Permissions Information"
msgstr "权限信息"

msgid "No VPN Connection Selected"
msgstr "未选择VPN连接"

msgid "Client Certificate (Cisco Device)"
msgstr "客户端证书（思科设备）"

msgid "Enable Device Admin for App Tunneling Connection"
msgstr "为应用程序隧道连接启用设备管理员"

msgid "Restore default localization data."
msgstr "恢复默认的本地化数据。"

msgid "Hide device management options from the home screen"
msgstr "从主屏幕隐藏设备管理选项"

msgid "The profile has been successfully imported."
msgstr "该配置文件已成功导入。"

msgid "Profile Management"
msgstr "个人资料管理"

msgid "Please enter a server address."
msgstr "请输入服务器地址。"

msgid "Clear All"
msgstr "全部清除"

msgid "Not Valid After"
msgstr "之后无效"

msgid "Could not read from the file system."
msgstr "无法从文件系统读取。"

msgid "System Log"
msgstr "系统日志"

msgid "Compression"
msgstr "压缩"

msgid "Scan QR code and handle AnyConnect URI"
msgstr "扫描QR码并处理AnyConnect URI"

msgid "Device Credential Storage"
msgstr "设备凭证存储"

msgid "This operation will override any downloaded data and cannot be undone. Are you sure?"
msgstr "此操作将覆盖所有下载的数据，并且无法撤消。你确定吗？"

msgid "Please Respond to Banner"
msgstr "请回复横幅"

msgid "Scanning..."
msgstr "扫描..."

msgid "Description invalid."
msgstr "说明无效。"

msgid "N/A"
msgstr "不适用"

msgid "Device ID:"
msgstr "设备编号："

msgid "Failed to import certificate."
msgstr "导入证书失败。"

msgid "File Chooser"
msgstr "文件选择器"

msgid "Customize Debug Logs"
msgstr "自定义调试日志"

msgid "Connecting to this server could result in a severe security compromise!"
msgstr "连接到该服务器可能会严重损害安全性！"

msgid "Secure Mobility Client"
msgstr "安全移动客户端"

msgid "Connection Editor"
msgstr "连接编辑器"

#, c-format
msgid "Are you sure you want to delete \"%1$s\"? This will remove AnyConnect's reference to the system certificate, but will not delete the certificate from the system."
msgstr "您确定要删除\"%1$s\"吗？这将删除AnyConnect对系统证书的引用，但不会从系统中删除该证书。"

msgid "The certificate import has failed due to AnyConnect being in an invalid state. You must be either completely connected or disconnected. Please try again."
msgstr "由于AnyConnect处于无效状态，因此证书导入失败。您必须完全连接或断开连接。请再试一遍。"

msgid "VPN State"
msgstr "VPN状态"

msgid "URI to Profile"
msgstr "设定档的URI"

msgid "The selected file could not be found."
msgstr "找不到所选的文件。"

msgid "Block Untrusted Servers"
msgstr "阻止不受信任的服务器"

msgid "Another application has requested to close AnyConnect."
msgstr "另一个应用程序已请求关闭AnyConnect。"

msgid "Keep Me Safe"
msgstr "保证我的安全"

msgid "External Control of AnyConnect is currently disabled. Tap the Change Settings button to go to the Settings screen to enable this feature. Enabling External Control reduces the overall security of AnyConnect."
msgstr "当前禁用AnyConnect的外部控制。点击更改设置按钮进入设置屏幕以启用此功能。启用外部控制会降低AnyConnect的整体安全性。"

msgid "User"
msgstr "用户"

msgid "This feature is not supported on Android 4.1. Please update your device to the latest firmware."
msgstr "Android 4.1不支持此功能。请更新您的设备到最新固件。"

msgid "No certificate file was chosen."
msgstr "未选择证书文件。"

msgid "Could not obtain the necessary permissions to run this application. This device does not support AnyConnect."
msgstr "无法获得运行此应用程序所需的权限。此设备不支持AnyConnect。"

msgid "Description"
msgstr "描述"

msgid "Scan QR Code"
msgstr "扫描二维码"

msgid "No"
msgstr "没有"

msgid "Manage the AnyConnect XML profile."
msgstr "管理AnyConnect XML配置文件。"

msgid "Unable to set VPN FIPS preference. Please exit and restart AnyConnect."
msgstr "无法设置VPN FIPS首选项。请退出并重新启动AnyConnect。"

msgid "User Id"
msgstr "用户身份"

msgid "Importing localization data from server."
msgstr "从服务器导入本地化数据。"

msgid "Delete?"
msgstr "删除？"

msgid "Allows access to internal AnyConnect state information."
msgstr "允许访问内部AnyConnect状态信息。"

msgid "Another application has requested that AnyConnect import an AnyConnect localization file."
msgstr "另一个应用程序已请求AnyConnect导入AnyConnect本地化文件。"

msgid "Failed to create a new VPN connection."
msgstr "无法创建新的VPN连接。"

msgid "Import localization data from a specified server."
msgstr "从指定的服务器导入本地化数据。"

msgid "By accepting an untrusted certificate you risk your enterprise's finances, intellectual property, your personal information such as username and password, as well as the integrity of the device you use to connect to your secure gateway."
msgstr "通过接受不受信任的证书，您将冒企业财务，知识产权，用户名和密码等个人信息以及用于连接到安全网关的设备完整性的风险。"

msgid "Change Settings"
msgstr "更改设置"

msgid "Could not obtain information about running components."
msgstr "无法获取有关正在运行的组件的信息。"

msgid "No Components installed"
msgstr "未安装组件"

msgid "Overall status: "
msgstr "总体状况："

msgid "of"
msgstr "的"

msgid "Click a component to launch the Application associated with it."
msgstr "单击一个组件以启动与其关联的应用程序。"

msgid "No Application View has been defined for this component."
msgstr "没有为此组件定义应用程序视图。"

msgid "AnyConnect Secure Mobility Client"
msgstr "AnyConnect安全移动客户端"

msgid ". Click for detailed status."
msgstr ".点击查看详细状态。"

msgid "Running"
msgstr "跑步"

msgid "Idle"
msgstr "闲"

msgid "Installed Components:"
msgstr "安装的组件："

msgid "Transition"
msgstr "过渡"

msgid "Not running"
msgstr "没有运行"

msgid "Attention"
msgstr "注意"

msgid "Authenticating"
msgstr "验证中"

msgid "Unknown"
msgstr "未知"

#. Doc: An unexpected error occured while processing the user response to proxy authentication.
#. The problem may be fixed by initiating a new connection.
msgid "Unable to process remote proxy request.  Please try again."
msgstr "无法处理远程代理请求。请再试一遍。"

msgid "The VPN GUI and Agent Process are not both in FIPS Mode. Restarting your device may fix this issue."
msgstr "VPN GUI和代理进程都不同时处于FIPS模式。重新启动设备可能会解决此问题。"

msgid "The VPN GUI and Agent Process are not both in FIPS Mode."
msgstr "VPN GUI和代理进程都不同时处于FIPS模式。"

#. Doc: A VPN connection has been established by the start before
#. logon components. The GUI will exit to allow the user to login
#. to the system.
msgid "VPN established.  Continuing with login."
msgstr "VPN已建立。继续登录。"

msgid "(missing value)"
msgstr "（缺失值）"

msgid "Exiting. Messaging problems during shutdown."
msgstr "正在退出。关闭期间的消息传递问题。"

msgid "Exiting. Unspecified reason."
msgstr "正在退出。未指明原因。"

msgid "Exiting.  System shutting down."
msgstr "正在退出。系统关闭。"

msgid "The VPN Service has failed. Contact your help desk."
msgstr "VPN服务失败。与您的服务台联系。"

msgid "Exiting.  Service was stopped."
msgstr "正在退出。服务已停止。"

msgid "The VPN service exited. Please restart this application."
msgstr "VPN服务已退出。请重新启动该应用程序。"

msgid "Exiting.  User logging off."
msgstr "正在退出。用户注销。"

msgid "Exiting.  Upgrade in progress."
msgstr "正在退出。正在进行升级。"

msgid "Exiting.  Uninstall in progress."
msgstr "正在退出。正在进行卸载。"

#. Doc: The start before logon GUI is exiting because of one of the
#. following: a captive portal has been detected and the user will not
#. be able to launch a browser to log into the portal before login, or
#. the trusted network detection feature is enabled, a trusted
#. network has been detected and a VPN connection is not required.
msgid "Exiting. Bypassing start before logon."
msgstr "正在退出。登录前绕过启动。"

msgid "Exiting. User tunnel started."
msgstr "正在退出。用户隧道已启动。"

msgid "VPN Session failed.  Unable to encrypt Proxy data."
msgstr "VPN会话失败。无法加密代理数据。"

msgid "VPN Session failed.  Cannot encrypt Proxy data."
msgstr "VPN会话失败。无法加密代理数据。"

msgid "Name: "
msgstr "名称："

msgid "Fingerprint: "
msgstr "指纹："

#. Doc:  This message indicates communication with the AnyConnect agent is not
#. available.  This is likely because the agent will not start or AnyConnect may
#. not be installed.
msgid "VPN Service not available."
msgstr "VPN服务不可用。"

msgid "Automatic Selection"
msgstr "自动选择"

#. Doc: An unexpected error occurred while reading the profiles or preferences files.
#. The files may be corrupted or other initialization failed, in which case restarting
#. the client may fix the problem.
msgid "Failed to load preferences."
msgstr "无法加载首选项。"

msgid "Failed to initialize SNAK."
msgstr "初始化SNAK失败。"

#. Doc:  This message indicates communication with the AnyConect
#. agent is not available.  This is likely because the agent will
#. not start or AnyConnect may not be installed.  Because the
#. client is running in Start Before Logon mode, the client will
#. exit to keep the user from being blocked.
#.
msgid "The VPN Service is not available.  Exiting."
msgstr "VPN服务不可用。正在退出。"

msgid "Please enter a secure gateway to connect to."
msgstr "请输入要连接的安全网关。"

#. Doc: Indicates that the client is currently connected in a
#. diminished mode without connect capabilities.  This can be the result of a specific
#. request by a custom application or due to another AnyConnect client already
#. running.
#.
msgid 
"Connect not available. Another AnyConnect application is running\n"
"or this functionality was not requested by this application."
msgstr 
"连接不可用。另一个AnyConnect应用程序正在运行\n"
"或此应用程序未请求此功能。"
msgid "Connect already in progress. Please wait."
msgstr "连接已在进行中。请耐心等待。"

msgid "Agent is processing a connect request. Please wait."
msgstr "代理正在处理连接请求。请耐心等待。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection to the selected secure gateway is not allowed
#. because the Always On feature is enabled, which restricts VPN connections
#. to only secure gateways found in the profiles.
msgid "Connections to this secure gateway are not permitted."
msgstr "不允许连接到此安全网关。"

#. Doc: The client cannot connect because the preconfigured certificate
#. intended for authentication is invalid.
msgid "Invalid client certificate"
msgstr "无效的客户证书"

msgid "Certificate Import Cancelled."
msgstr "证书导入已取消。"

msgid "VPN disconnect request failed."
msgstr "VPN断开连接请求失败。"

msgid "The management tunnel has been terminated, exiting."
msgstr "管理隧道已终止，正在退出。"

msgid "The management tunnel has been established, exiting."
msgstr "管理隧道已建立，正在退出。"

msgid "Connected (session expiring soon)"
msgstr "已连接（会话即将到期）"

#, c-format
msgid "Connected (%s)"
msgstr "已连接（%s）"

#, c-format
msgid "Connected (%s - session expiring soon)"
msgstr "已连接（%s-会话即将到期）"

msgid "Disconnected (disabled)"
msgstr "断开连接（禁用）"

msgid "Disconnected (trusted network)"
msgstr "断开连接（受信任的网络）"

msgid "Disconnected (user tunnel active)"
msgstr "断开连接（用户隧道处于活动状态）"

msgid "Disconnected (process launch failed)"
msgstr "断开连接（进程启动失败）"

msgid "Disconnected (connect failed)"
msgstr "断开连接（连接失败）"

msgid "Disconnected (invalid VPN configuration)"
msgstr "断开连接（无效的VPN配置）"

msgid "Disconnected (software update pending)"
msgstr "断开连接（等待软件更新）"

msgid "Reconnecting (waiting for a usable network interface)"
msgstr "重新连接（等待可用的网络接口）"

msgid "Reconnecting (waiting for network connectivity)"
msgstr "重新连接（等待网络连接）"

msgid "Single sign-on waiting"
msgstr "单点登录等待"

#, c-format
msgid "Connected to %1$s."
msgstr "已连接到%1$s。"

msgid "Connected to secure gateway."
msgstr "已连接到安全网关。"

msgid "Access restricted by AnyConnect protection settings."
msgstr "访问受到AnyConnect保护设置的限制。"

msgid "Network error. Unable to lookup host names."
msgstr "网络错误。无法查找主机名。"

msgid "Verify your network connection."
msgstr "验证您的网络连接。"

msgid "On a trusted network."
msgstr "在受信任的网络上。"

msgid "Ready to connect."
msgstr "准备连接。"

msgid "VPN session ended."
msgstr "VPN会话结束。"

msgid "Disconnect in progress, please wait..."
msgstr "正在断开连接，请稍候..."

msgid "Reconnecting, waiting for a usable network interface..."
msgstr "重新连接，等待可用的网络接口..."

msgid "Reconnecting, waiting for network connectivity..."
msgstr "重新连接，等待网络连接..."

#, c-format
msgid "Reconnecting to %1$s..."
msgstr "重新连接到%1$s ..."

msgid "VPN session paused."
msgstr "VPN会话已暂停。"

msgid "Pausing VPN session..."
msgstr "暂停VPN会话..."

msgid "Network Access: Restricted"
msgstr "网络访问：受限制"

msgid "Network Access: Blocked"
msgstr "网络访问：已阻止"

msgid "Network Access: Available"
msgstr "网络访问：可用"

msgid "Network Access: Unknown"
msgstr "网络访问：未知"

msgid "Trusted"
msgstr "值得信赖"

msgid "Untrusted"
msgstr "不信任"

msgid "Undefined"
msgstr "未定义"

msgid "No Network Connectivity"
msgstr "没有网络连接"

msgid "Unavailable"
msgstr "不可用"

msgid "Limited Access - DNS Failure"
msgstr "受限访问-DNS故障"

msgid "No DNS"
msgstr "没有DNS"

msgid "Web Authentication Required"
msgstr "需要Web身份验证"

msgid "Web Auth"
msgstr "网络认证"

msgid "Authenticating Proxy Detected"
msgstr "检测到身份验证代理"

msgid "Auth Proxy"
msgstr "身份验证代理"

msgid "Network Accessible"
msgstr "网络可访问"

msgid "Available"
msgstr "可用的"

msgid "Remediation Required"
msgstr "需要补救"

#. Doc: This message would appear in cases where a user attempted an
#. action such as connect and the client is not able to communicate
#. with the AnyConnect agent process.  This message would have been
#. preceeded by an alert already informing the user of this condition.
#.
msgid 
"Unable to proceed.\n"
"Cannot contact the VPN service."
msgstr 
"无法继续。\n"
"无法联系VPN服务。"
msgid "Automatically selected server: "
msgstr "自动选择的服务器："

msgid "Searching for optimal server. Please wait..."
msgstr "搜索最佳服务器。请耐心等待..."

msgid "Unable to proceed. Unexpected error occurred."
msgstr "无法继续。发生意外错误。"

msgid "Unable to proceed. Error getting preferences."
msgstr "无法继续。获取首选项时出错。"

msgid "Preferences not currently supported on this platform."
msgstr "该平台当前不支持首选项。"

msgid " - "
msgstr " --"

msgid "Limited Local Access"
msgstr "本地访问受限"

msgid "Network Access: Denied"
msgstr "网络访问：被拒绝"

msgid "Trying to Reach VPN Server"
msgstr "尝试到达VPN服务器"

msgid "VPN Connection Required"
msgstr "需要VPN连接"

msgid "Quarantined"
msgstr "隔离区"

msgid "Quarantine Remediation Messages"
msgstr "隔离补救消息"

msgid "Reconnect"
msgstr "重新连线"

msgid "To attempt a normal connection, select Reconnect."
msgstr "要尝试正常连接，请选择“重新连接”。"

msgid "To attempt a normal connection please reconnect."
msgstr "要尝试正常连接，请重新连接。"

msgid "Security policies were applied to your session, access to some resources may be blocked. Your system administrator provided the following information to help you understand and remedy the security conditions:"
msgstr "安全策略已应用于您的会话，可能无法访问某些资源。您的系统管理员提供了以下信息，以帮助您了解和纠正安全状况："

msgid "Indicates the UI was launched programmatically by another component. Disables implicit connect and starts the UI minimized, if possible. Not intended for interactive use."
msgstr "表示用户界面是由另一个组件以编程方式启动的。禁用隐式连接，并在可能的情况下最小化启动UI。不适用于交互式使用。"

msgid "No Implicit Connect.  Do not attempt to contact default host at startup."
msgstr "无隐式连接。启动时不要尝试与默认主机联系。"

msgid "Start the UI minimized if possible. Allows Implicit Connect."
msgstr "如果可能，最小化启动UI。允许隐式连接。"

msgid "Show this usage summary."
msgstr "显示此用法摘要。"

msgid "Connect to specified host or profile name."
msgstr "连接到指定的主机或配置文件名称。"

msgid "Disallow changes to \"Connect to\" profile combobox."
msgstr "禁止更改“连接到”配置文件组合框。"

msgid "Pass specified argument to VPN API.  Not intended for interactive use."
msgstr "将指定的参数传递给VPN API。不适用于交互式使用。"

msgid "Launch in Start-Before-Login mode.  Not intended for interactive use."
msgstr "以“登录前启动”模式启动。不适用于交互式使用。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating the URL for the CSD library is empty. The hostscan
#. library cannot be updated.
msgid "Download of CSD stub library failed, CSD stub URL is empty."
msgstr "CSD存根库的下载失败，CSD存根URL为空。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that the locally cached CSD library could not be
#. opened for creating or updating. Validating the local AnyConnect cache directory
#. exists and has the correct permissions for writing.
msgid "Download of HostScan library failed, cannot update cache."
msgstr "HostScan库下载失败，无法更新缓存。"

msgid "Compatible Posture Assessment package not found on the server. Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "在服务器上找不到兼容的状态评估程序包。请与您的网络管理员联系。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating the request to download the CSD stub library
#. timed out or failed. This error may be transient and may be resolved by
#. attempting a new connection.
msgid "Unable to download CSD library. Please try again"
msgstr "无法下载CSD库。请再试一遍"

#. Doc: The client was unable to connect due to a DNS resolution error.
#. Common causes can include a hostname that does not properly resolve
#. to an IP address, incorrect DNS settings on the client, or unreachable
#. or non-responsive DNS servers on the client.
msgid "The client could not connect because of a secure gateway address resolution failure.  Please verify Internet connectivity and server address."
msgstr "由于安全网关地址解析失败，客户端无法连接。请验证Internet连接和服务器地址。"

msgid "The client could not handle properly an HTTP redirect."
msgstr "客户端无法正确处理HTTP重定向。"

#. Doc: The failed connection attempt was done through a proxy. Possible causes of this failure are that the proxy could not resolve the selected host,
#. the selected host does not exist or the host is unavailable and therefore the proxy did not get a response.
msgid "Connection attempt has failed: Gateway/proxy received an invalid response from the host or was unable to contact the host. Verify the host is valid."
msgstr "连接尝试失败：网关/代理从主机接收到无效响应或无法联系主机。验证主机是否有效。"

#. Doc: Indicates that communication with the Secure Gateway has
#. failed and is due to an error in the HTTP response header that
#. was received.
msgid "Connection attempt has failed (error in response header)."
msgstr "连接尝试失败（响应头中的错误）。"

#. Doc: Indicates that communication with the Secure Gateway has
#. failed and is due to an error in the HTTP response data that
#. was received.
msgid "Connection attempt has failed (error in response data)."
msgstr "连接尝试失败（响应数据错误）。"

#. Doc: Indicates that the response from the connection attempt is
#. taking too long.  Based on internal timers, the client is
#. canceling the connection attempt.
msgid "Connection attempt has timed out.  Please verify Internet connectivity."
msgstr "连接尝试已超时。请验证互联网连接。"

#. Doc: Indicates that a file transfer required to establish the
#. connection could not be performed and the connection attempt
#. must be terminated.
msgid "Connection attempt has failed (download failed)."
msgstr "连接尝试失败（下载失败）。"

#. Doc: Indicates that a profile URL or user entered address does not
#. resolve to a valid secure gateway.
msgid "Connection attempt has failed due to invalid host entry."
msgstr "由于主机条目无效，连接尝试失败。"

#. Doc: Indicates the connection attempt was terminated for one of a
#. number of reasons.  These can include too many redirects at the
#. secure gateway, a host changed from one connection to the next,
#. etc.  There will be additional errors in the log.
msgid "Connection attempt has failed due to server communication errors. Please retry the connection."
msgstr "由于服务器通信错误，连接尝试失败。请重试连接。"

#. Doc: Indicates an error occurred using the client certificate private
#. key to sign the hash data.
msgid "An error occurred performing an operation using the client certificate."
msgstr "使用客户端证书执行操作时发生错误。"

#. Doc: Some unexpected error in the HTTP protocol has been detected.
#. This error is unlikely and indicates some error state on the PC
#. such as loss of network connectivity or secure gateway.
msgid "Connection attempt has failed due to network or PC issue."
msgstr "由于网络或PC问题，连接尝试失败。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to access a certificate store resulting
#. in the inability to verify the identity of the Secure Gateway by
#. performing verification of server certificates.  Also, the client
#. is unable to respond to certificate requests.
msgid "No certificate store has been found. VPN connection cannot be established."
msgstr "找不到证书存储。无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to access the Firefox certificate store
#. and there was no alternative store located.  This results in the
#. inability to verify the identity of the Secure Gateway by performing
#. verification of server certificates.  Also, the client is unable to
#. respond to certificate requests.
msgid "Firefox certificate libraries could not be loaded. VPN connection cannot be established."
msgstr "无法加载Firefox证书库。无法建立VPN连接。"

msgid "Internal Error (client certificate error)."
msgstr "内部错误（客户端证书错误）。"

msgid "Internal Error (missing config cookie)."
msgstr "内部错误（缺少配置Cookie）。"

msgid "Internal Error (state: not idle)."
msgstr "内部错误（状态：不空闲）。"

msgid "Internal Error (state: not connected)."
msgstr "内部错误（状态：未连接）。"

msgid "Internal Error (state: not authenticated)."
msgstr "内部错误（状态：未验证）。"

#. Doc: An error has occurred while attempting to launch Hostscan to
#. perform a system scan for posture assessment. Common causes include
#. failures to download the Hostscan components, failure to launch the
#. Hostscan components on the client, or timeouts if the system scan
#. takes too long to complete (taking greater than 10 minutes to
#. complete).
msgid "Posture Assessment: Failed"
msgstr "姿势评估：失败"

msgid "HTTPS access to the gateway is not permitted due to gateway policy."
msgstr "由于网关策略，不允许HTTPS访问网关。"

#. Doc: If a dialup connection is configured in Internet Explorer to always dial or to dial when no other connections are present,
#. when the browser is launched, a dialog is presented to the user to select a connection. If the user does not connect nor cancel
#. the dialog and then opens AnyConnect, the connection will appear 'stuck' trying to contact the secure gateway. As soon as the
#. connection dialog is dismissed, a new dialog is presented for AnyConnect and the connection continues.
msgid "Please establish an Internet connection. If a browser or other application opened a connections dialog window, please respond so that AnyConnect can proceed."
msgstr "请建立互联网连接。如果浏览器或其他应用程序打开了连接对话框窗口，请响应，以便AnyConnect可以继续。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection failed due to a potential security threat with the Secure Gateway's server certificate.
#. This may indicate that you have been the target of a Man in the Middle attack.
msgid "Potential security threat detected with Secure Gateway's server certificate. Connection attempt has been terminated."
msgstr "使用Secure Gateway的服务器证书检测到的潜在安全威胁。连接尝试已终止。"

#. Doc: AnyConnect will not connect to non-Cisco gateways.  The likely cause of this is either a
#. misconfigured AnyConnect VPN profile or the user has entered an invalid FQDN or IP address
#. in AnyConnect's user interface.
msgid "Cannot connect to this gateway. Please choose another gateway and try again"
msgstr "无法连接到该网关。请选择另一个网关，然后重试"

#. Doc: The VPN connection failed due to an unexpected initialization error.
#. The problem may be fixed by initiating a new connection.
msgid "Connection attempt failed.  Please try again."
msgstr "连接尝试失败。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Contact your IT administrator for more assistance."
msgstr "请与您的IT管理员联系以获取更多帮助。"

msgid "No error"
msgstr "没错"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that authentication has failed due to an unknown error.
msgid "Authentication failed due to unexpected error."
msgstr "由于发生意外错误，身份验证失败。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that authentication has failed because SAML is not supported during SBL.
msgid "The requested authentication type is not supported during Start Before Logon."
msgstr "登录之前启动期间不支持请求的身份验证类型。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that authentication has failed because SAML is not supported in AnyConnect CLI.
msgid "The requested authentication type is not supported in AnyConnect CLI."
msgstr "AnyConnect CLI不支持请求的身份验证类型。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that authentication has failed due to failure to verify the server certificate.
msgid "Authentication failed due to problem verifying server certificate."
msgstr "由于验证服务器证书的问题，身份验证失败。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that single sign-on authentication has failed due to failure to navigate to the configured single sign-on URL.
msgid "Authentication failed due to problem navigating to the single sign-on URL."
msgstr "由于导航到单一登录URL的问题，身份验证失败。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that single sign-on authentication has failed due to failure to retrieve the single sign-on cookie.
msgid "Authentication failed due to problem retrieving the single sign-on cookie."
msgstr "由于检索单点登录cookie的问题，身份验证失败。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that single sign-on authentication has timed out.
msgid "Authentication failed due to navigation timeout."
msgstr "验证由于导航超时而失败。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that single sign-on authentication has failed due to required libraries missing.
msgid "You are missing the required libraries for the authentication method you requested."
msgstr "您缺少所需的身份验证方法所需的库。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that single sign-on authentication is not supported on a particular OS.
msgid "Single sign-on authentication is not supported on this operating system version."
msgstr "此操作系统版本不支持单点登录身份验证。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating a client certificate was requested during SAML, but was not found
msgid "Authentication failed due to problem retrieving the client certificate."
msgstr "由于检索客户端证书的问题，身份验证失败。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that the Hostscan module could not be loaded
#. to perform the system scan. This can indicate errors loading the DLL or
#. error finding the stub executable for HostScan.
msgid "Hostscan Installation error."
msgstr "Hostscan安装错误。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that the HostScan module was unable to launch.
#. This can indicate errors running the initialization routines of Hostscan, or
#. errors launching the executable stub of Hostscan.
msgid "Hostscan Initialize error."
msgstr "Hostscan初始化错误。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that the prelogin check performed by Hostscan
#. has failed. This indicates that Hostscan has found something on the host
#. system that violates rules defined by the administrator. This can include
#. dynamic rules defined by the administrator or detection of a keylogger on
#. the system.
msgid "Hostscan CSD prelogin verification failed."
msgstr "Hostscan CSD预登录验证失败。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that there was an error in the running of the
#. system scan by Hostscan. This typically is a result of errors running the
#. Hostscan module.
msgid "Hostscan failed to complete without errors."
msgstr "Hostscan无法完成而没有错误。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that the prelogin check performed by Hostscan
#. has failed due to slow network connection or network related issues.
msgid "Posture Assessment: Connection attempt has failed due to a slow network connection or network related issue. Please retry the connection."
msgstr "姿势评估：由于网络连接缓慢或与网络相关的问题，连接尝试失败。请重试连接。"

#. Doc: An error has occurred while running HostScan and the device cannot connect
#. to the head end. This error may be transient and may be resolved by attempting a
#. new connection.
msgid "An error has occurred while running HostScan. Please attempt to connect again."
msgstr "运行HostScan时发生错误。请尝试重新连接。"

#. Doc: An error has occurred while attempting to retrieve a file from the secure
#. gateway during an IPsec connection.  The Client Services Port is not enabled on
#. the secure gateway.  This prevents AnyConnect from retreiving files (during an
#. IPsec connection) from the gateway and also prevents CSD from running.
msgid "A VPN connection is not allowed due to administrative policy.  HTTPS access to the secure gateway is not allowed during IPsec connections.  This prevents file downloads and does not allow Cisco HostScan to run."
msgstr "由于管理政策，不允许VPN连接。在IPsec连接期间，不允许HTTPS访问安全网关。这样可以防止文件下载，并且不允许Cisco HostScan运行。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating the VPN connection could not be established.
#. An additional error message is expected to explain the cause in further detail.
msgid "Connection attempt has failed."
msgstr "连接尝试失败。"

#. Doc: Failed to load client certificate keys. This may be because the certificate is no longer present, i.e. it was deleted
#. or was on a smartcard that was removed.
msgid "Failed to load client certificate keys."
msgstr "无法加载客户端证书密钥。"

#. Doc: Failed to locate client certificate. This may be because the certificate is no longer present, i.e. it was deleted
#. or was on a smartcard that was removed.
msgid "Client certificate no longer present."
msgstr "客户端证书不再存在。"

msgid "Web browser is needed for SSO logon but cannot be launched on logon screen. Please select a different tunnel group."
msgstr "SSO登录需要Web浏览器，但无法在登录屏幕上启动。请选择其他隧道组。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that an error occurred while trying to retrieve
#. the CSD version configured on the secure gateway. This is an unexpected error
#. which could be resolved by trying to connect again.
msgid "Unable to get the available CSD version from the secure gateway."
msgstr "无法从安全网关获取可用的CSD版本。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating the Hostscan module could not be unloaded
#. from the process in order to be updated. Restarting the process or the
#. system may fix the problem.
msgid "Unable to unload the CSD library for updating."
msgstr "无法卸载CSD库以进行更新。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that the signature of the library could not
#. be verified. This indicates a problem with the CSD library. Removing the
#. library from the cache and attempting a new connection, may resolve the issue.
msgid "CSD library signature verification failed."
msgstr "CSD库签名验证失败。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating the CSD library is not able to be
#. loaded into memory. This indicates a problem with the CSD library.
#. Removing the library from the cache and attempting a new connection, may
#. resolve the issue.
msgid "Unable to load the CSD library."
msgstr "无法加载CSD库。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating there was a problem initializing a required
#. function from the CSD library. This indicates that the CSD library is an
#. incompatible version or may be corrupt. Removing the library from the
#. cache and attempting a new connection, may resolve the issue.
msgid "CSD initialization incomplete, required function is unavailable."
msgstr "CSD初始化不完整，必需的功能不可用。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating a CSD ticket is unavailable for running
#. Hostscan and is required.
msgid "No CSD Ticket."
msgstr "没有CSD票。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating the SSL certificate is unavailable and
#. is required. This is unexpected and attempting a new connection, may
#. resolve the issue.
msgid "SSL certificate thumbprint unavailable."
msgstr "SSL证书指纹不可用。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating the CSD stub path from the sercure gateway
#. is empty.
msgid "Invalid CSD stub path."
msgstr "无效的CSD存根路径。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that the Hostscan module could not be
#. properly configured to run. This can indicate errors setting up the
#. commandline parameters to launch the stub executable for Hostscan.
msgid "Hostscan command line did not build."
msgstr "Hostscan命令行未生成。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating failure to launch the Hostscan CSD stub. This
#. error may be transient and may be resolved by attempting a new connection.
msgid "Failed to Launch the Hostscan CSD stub."
msgstr "无法启动Hostscan CSD存根。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating a time out waiting for the CSD stub to
#. complete. This error may be transient and may be resolved by attempting a
#. new connection.
msgid "Error while waiting for Hostscan CSD stub to complete."
msgstr "等待Hostscan CSD存根完成时出错。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that the Hostscan CSD cache directory does
#. not exist. This error indicates that the directory may not exist or
#. permissions may not be correct.
msgid "Error locating the Hostscan CSD cache directory."
msgstr "找不到Hostscan CSD缓存目录时出错。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that the Hostscan CSD temp directory does
#. not exist. This error indicates that the directory may not exist or
#. permissions may not be correct.
msgid "Error locating the Hostscan CSD temp download directory."
msgstr "找不到Hostscan CSD临时下载目录时出错。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating that there was a problem decompressing
#. the downloaded Hostscan CSD file. Removing the compressed (.gz) library from
#. the cache and attempting a new connection, may resolve the issue.
msgid "Error decompressing the Hostscan CSD library."
msgstr "解压缩Hostscan CSD库时出错。"

#. Doc: Status message displayed when the client is ready to initiate a connection.
msgid "Ready to connect"
msgstr "准备连接"

msgid "Answer:"
msgstr "回答："

msgid "Group:"
msgstr "分组:"

msgid "New Password:"
msgstr "新密码："

msgid "OTP Password:"
msgstr "OTP密码："

msgid "New PIN:"
msgstr "新密码："

msgid "Verify Password:"
msgstr "验证密码："

msgid "Verify PIN:"
msgstr "验证PIN："

msgid "PIN Option:"
msgstr "密码选项："

msgid "Second Username:"
msgstr "第二用户名："

msgid "Second Password:"
msgstr "第二用户名密码："

msgid "Reconnecting..."
msgstr "重新连接..."

#, c-format
msgid "Contacting %1$s."
msgstr "正在与%1$s联系。"

msgid "Failed to initialize connection subsystem."
msgstr "初始化连接子系统失败。"

#. Doc: Status message indicating the secure gateway could not
#. be contacted due to a DNS resolution error or an unreachable or
#. non-responsive secure gateway. An additional error message is
#. expected to explain the cause in further detail.
#, c-format
msgid "Unable to contact %1$s."
msgstr "无法联系%1$s。"

msgid "Programming error: Banner response has not been set."
msgstr "编程错误：尚未设置横幅响应。"

msgid "Programming Error: Proxy Authentication failed."
msgstr "编程错误：代理身份验证失败。"

msgid "Authentication status check failed, retrying..."
msgstr "身份验证状态检查失败，正在重试..."

msgid "Please respond to banner."
msgstr "请回复横幅。"

msgid "Connection attempt terminated."
msgstr "连接尝试已终止。"

#. Doc: An error occurred while trying to download contents from the AnyConnect package located on the secure gateway. The issue
#. could be a case where HTTP file downloads are blocked in the security settings of Internet Explorer. Changing the IE security
#. settings to allow downloads will correct this issue.
msgid 
"Failed accessing AnyConnect package.\n"
"This may be due to IE security settings that are set too high."
msgstr 
"无法访问AnyConnect程序包。\n"
"这可能是由于IE安全设置设置得太高。"
#. Doc: An error occurred while trying to download the AnyConnect profile.
msgid "Failed to download the AnyConnect profile. Please retry."
msgstr "下载AnyConnect配置文件失败。请重试。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection attempt failed after successful authentication due to an unexpected error.
#. A possible cause is problems with network connectivity, therefore a new attempt could result in a
#. successful connection.
msgid "AnyConnect was not able to establish a connection to the specified secure gateway. Please try connecting again."
msgstr "AnyConnect无法建立到指定安全网关的连接。请尝试重新连接。"

msgid "Error processing data received from secure gateway."
msgstr "处理从安全网关收到的数据时出错。"

#. Doc: Hostscan was unable to perform posture assessment of the
#. endpoint because the client is configured to use an
#. authenticating proxy and Hostscan does not have access to the
#. credentials for the authenticating proxy to be able to send the
#. results of the system scan to the server.
msgid "Posture assessment with authenticating proxy is not implemented."
msgstr "未实施带有身份验证代理的姿势评估。"

#. Doc: Cisco Secure Desktop was detected as running on the client host
#. machine. The user must use the "Launch Login Page" button inside the
#. Secure Desktop to launch the client inside the Secure Desktop in
#. order to continue using the VPN connection.
msgid "When in the Secure Vault, use the \"Launch Login Page\" button on the desktop to relaunch the client."
msgstr "在Secure Vault中时，请使用桌面上的\“启动登录页面\”按钮重新启动客户端。"

msgid "Posture Assessment: Required for access"
msgstr "姿势评估：需要进入"

msgid "Posture Assessment: Initiating..."
msgstr "姿势评估：启动中..."

msgid "Posture Assessment: Updating..."
msgstr "姿势评估：更新中..."

msgid "Waiting for posture assessment to complete..."
msgstr "等待姿势评估完成..."

msgid "Change Password"
msgstr "更改密码"

msgid "Certificate Enrollment"
msgstr "证书注册"

msgid "Connection Banner"
msgstr "连接横幅"

msgid "Authentication Message"
msgstr "认证信息"

msgid "Open Browser"
msgstr "开启浏览器"

msgid "Access Denied: Your system does not meet policy requirements (DAP)."
msgstr "拒绝访问：您的系统不符合策略要求（DAP）。"

msgid "This connection requires a client certificate, but no matching certificate could be found. Please modify the connection, choose a valid certificate or automatic certificate selection, and try again."
msgstr "此连接需要客户端证书，但找不到匹配的证书。请修改连接，选择有效的证书或自动选择证书，然后重试。"

msgid "This connection requires a client certificate, but the certificate is expired. Please modify the connection, choose a valid certificate, and try again."
msgstr "此连接需要客户端证书，但是证书已过期。请修改连接，选择有效的证书，然后重试。"

msgid "Passcode processing failure."
msgstr "密码处理失败。"

msgid "Authentication Failure (Secure Algorithm selection failure). Please contact your administrator."
msgstr "身份验证失败（安全算法选择失败）。请与您的管理员联系。"

msgid "Browser required for authentication failed to launch properly. Restart or change default browser."
msgstr "身份验证所需的浏览器无法正常启动。重新启动或更改默认浏览器。"

msgid "This is a pre-connect reminder message."
msgstr "这是连接前的提醒消息。"

msgid "Posture Assessment: Checking for updates..."
msgstr "姿势评估：正在检查更新..."

msgid "Posture Assessment: Active"
msgstr "姿势评估：有效"

msgid "Password"
msgstr "密码"

msgid "Please enter the password for certificate import."
msgstr "请输入证书导入密码。"

msgid "Please enter your Certificate store password."
msgstr "请输入您的证书存储区密码。"

msgid "Unknown request type for certificate import."
msgstr "证书导入的未知请求类型。"

msgid "Certificate successfully imported. Establishing VPN..."
msgstr "证书成功导入。建立VPN ..."

#. Doc: The client was unable to connect with a certificate recently
#. obtained via enrollment.  Common causes include misconfiguration of
#. the secure gateway such as missing trust points or validity date of
#. the certificate appears not yet valid.
msgid "Unable to establish connection with newly imported Certificate."
msgstr "无法与新导入的证书建立连接。"

msgid "Certificate successfully imported."
msgstr "证书成功导入。"

#. Doc: The client has failed to import the just enrolled certificate.  This can
#. occur if the user has declined any prompts by the certificate store provider such
#. as password or permission prompts, etc.
msgid "Certificate Enrollment - Certificate import has failed."
msgstr "证书注册-证书导入失败。"

msgid "Please respond to browser warning notice."
msgstr "请回应浏览器警告通知。"

msgid "Certificate Enrollment - To successfully store your certificate please close all web browser windows before proceeding."
msgstr "证书注册-要成功存储证书，请在继续操作之前关闭所有Web浏览器窗口。"

msgid "Passwords do not match."
msgstr "密码不匹配。"

msgid "The new password is too short."
msgstr "新密码太短。"

msgid "The PINs do not match."
msgstr "PIN码不匹配。"

msgid "The new PIN is too short."
msgstr "新的PIN太短。"

msgid "The new PIN is too long."
msgstr "新的PIN太长。"

msgid "The new PIN contains invalid characters."
msgstr "新的PIN包含无效字符。"

msgid "Failed to verify user credentials."
msgstr "无法验证用户凭据。"

msgid "Posture Assessment not supported"
msgstr "不支持姿势评估"

msgid "Posture Assessment Failed: "
msgstr "姿势评估失败："

#, c-format
msgid "Failed contacting %1$s.  Trying backup %2$s"
msgstr "无法联系 %1$s。尝试备份%2$s"

msgid "Authentication was not completed in the required time. Please try to connect again."
msgstr "认证未在要求的时间内完成。请尝试重新连接。"

msgid "Your browser authentication was not completed in the required time. Please try to connect again."
msgstr "您的浏览器身份验证未在要求的时间内完成。请尝试重新连接。"

msgid "Checking status of browser based authentication..."
msgstr "正在检查基于浏览器的身份验证状态..."

#. Doc: This message indicates the Secure Gateway did not accept any of the
#. certificates provided by the client and there are no more to try.
msgid "No valid certificates available for authentication."
msgstr "没有有效的证书可用于身份验证。"

msgid "Invalid data for Certificate Import."
msgstr "证书导入的数据无效。"

#. Doc: This message indicates to the user that certificate only
#. authentication is being employed.
#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. Instead of providing a username and password as credentials, the user's
#. certificate will be used for authentication.
msgid "Your client certificate will be used for authentication"
msgstr "您的客户证书将用于身份验证"

msgid "Disable VPN service"
msgstr "禁用VPN服务"

msgid "Overrides certificate store"
msgstr "覆盖证书存储"

msgid "Default cert store"
msgstr "默认证书存储"

msgid "All"
msgstr "所有"

msgid "Machine"
msgstr "机"

msgid "Default keychain"
msgstr "默认钥匙串"

msgid "Login"
msgstr "登录"

msgid "Show pre-connect message"
msgstr "显示预连接消息"

msgid "Start VPN when AnyConnect is started"
msgstr "启动AnyConnect时启动VPN"

msgid "Minimize AnyConnect on VPN connect"
msgstr "最小化VPN连接上的AnyConnect"

msgid "Allow local (LAN) access when using VPN (if configured)"
msgstr "使用VPN时允许本地（LAN）访问（如果已配置）"

msgid "Disable Captive Portal Detection"
msgstr "禁用强制门户检测"

msgid "Enable automatic VPN reconnect"
msgstr "启用自动VPN重新连接"

msgid "Upon waking from sleep mode:"
msgstr "从睡眠模式唤醒时："

msgid "Do not reconnect"
msgstr "不要重新连接"

msgid "Suspend AnyConnect during Connected Standby"
msgstr "在连接待机期间挂起AnyConnect"

msgid "Start VPN before user logon to computer"
msgstr "在用户登录计算机之前启动VPN"

msgid "Check for updates on VPN connect"
msgstr "检查VPN连接上的更新"

msgid "RSA SecurID Behavior:"
msgstr "RSA SecurID行为："

msgid "Software Token"
msgstr "软件令牌"

msgid "Hardware Token"
msgstr "硬件令牌"

msgid "Windows Logon Enforcement"
msgstr "Windows登录执行"

msgid "Single Logon"
msgstr "单一登录"

msgid "Single Local Logon"
msgstr "单一本地登录"

msgid "Windows VPN Establishment"
msgstr "Windows VPN建立"

msgid "Local Users Only"
msgstr "仅本地用户"

msgid "Allow Remote Users"
msgstr "允许远程用户"

msgid "Linux Logon Enforcement"
msgstr "Linux登录执行"

msgid "Linux VPN Establishment"
msgstr "Linux VPN建立"

msgid "Proxy Settings"
msgstr "代理设定"

msgid "Native"
msgstr "本机"

msgid "Ignore Proxy"
msgstr "忽略代理"

msgid "Override"
msgstr "覆写"

msgid "Allow local proxy connections"
msgstr "允许本地代理连接"

msgid "PPP Exclusion:"
msgstr "PPP排除："

msgid "Disable"
msgstr "禁用"

msgid "PPP Exclusion Server IP:"
msgstr "PPP排除服务器IP："

msgid "Automatic VPN policy"
msgstr "自动VPN策略"

msgid "Trusted network policy"
msgstr "受信任的网络策略"

msgid "Pause"
msgstr "暂停"

msgid "Do nothing"
msgstr "没做什么"

msgid "Untrusted network policy"
msgstr "不受信任的网络策略"

msgid "Trusted DNS domains"
msgstr "受信任的DNS域"

msgid "Trusted DNS Servers"
msgstr "受信任的DNS服务器"

msgid "Trusted Servers @ https://<server>[:<port>]"
msgstr "受信任的服务器@ https：// <服务器> [：<端口>]"

msgid "Always on"
msgstr "永远在线"

msgid "Connect failure policy"
msgstr "连接失败策略"

msgid "Open"
msgstr "打开"

msgid "Closed"
msgstr "关闭"

msgid "Allow captive portal remediation"
msgstr "允许强制门户修复"

msgid "Captive portal remediation timeout"
msgstr "强制门户补救措施超时"

msgid "Apply last VPN local resource rules"
msgstr "应用最后的VPN本地资源规则"

msgid "Allow VPN disconnect"
msgstr "允许VPN断开连接"

msgid "Enable scripting"
msgstr "启用脚本"

msgid "TerminateScriptOnNextEvent"
msgstr "TerminateScriptOnNextEvent"

msgid "EnablePostSBLOnConnectScript"
msgstr "EnablePostSBLOnConnectScript"

msgid "Enable automatic certificate selection"
msgstr "启用自动证书选择"

msgid "Retain VPN on logoff"
msgstr "注销时保留VPN"

msgid "User Enforcement"
msgstr "用户执行"

msgid "Same user only"
msgstr "仅限同一用户"

msgid "Any user"
msgstr "任何使用者"

msgid "Device Lock Required"
msgstr "需要设备锁定"

msgid "Maximum Timeout Minutes"
msgstr "最大超时时间"

msgid "Minimum Password Length"
msgstr "最小密码长度"

msgid "Password Complexity"
msgstr "密码复杂度"

msgid "alpha"
msgstr "α"

msgid "PIN"
msgstr "销"

msgid "strong"
msgstr "强大"

msgid "Enable automatic VPN server selection"
msgstr "启用自动VPN服务器选择"

msgid "Performance Improvement Threshold"
msgstr "性能改进阈值"

msgid "Suspension Time Threshold"
msgstr "暂停时间阈值"

msgid "Authentication Timeout"
msgstr "验证超时"

msgid "Use SafeWord SofToken PIN to get password"
msgstr "使用SafeWord SofToken PIN来获取密码"

msgid "Allow IPsec over SSL"
msgstr "允许通过SSL的IPsec"

msgid "Do not remember SmartCard PIN"
msgstr "忘记了SmartCard PIN码"

msgid "Supported IP Protocols"
msgstr "支持的IP协议"

msgid "Allow user to remediate captive portal via external browser"
msgstr "允许用户通过外部浏览器修复强制门户"

msgid "Allow user to add VPN host"
msgstr "允许用户添加VPN主机"

msgid "Block connections to untrusted servers"
msgstr "阻止与不受信任服务器的连接"

msgid "Public Proxy Server Address"
msgstr "公共代理服务器地址"

msgid "Certificate Pinning"
msgstr "证书固定"

msgid "Preferences"
msgstr "偏好"

msgid "Admin Defined"
msgstr "管理员定义"

msgid "Protocol State: "
msgstr "协议状态："

msgid "Protocol: "
msgstr "协议："

msgid "Protocol Cipher: "
msgstr "协议密码："

msgid "Protocol Compression: "
msgstr "协议压缩："

msgid "Proxy User:"
msgstr "代理用户："

msgid "Proxy Password:"
msgstr "代理密码："

msgid "Domain/Authority:"
msgstr "域/权限："

msgid "Authentication Realm:"
msgstr "身份验证领域："

msgid "Please enter the requested proxy credentials."
msgstr "请输入请求的代理凭据。"

msgid "Proxy Credentials"
msgstr "代理凭证"

msgid "Proxy Server:   "
msgstr "代理服务器："

msgid "Proxy Realm:    "
msgstr "代理领域："

msgid "Certificate Enrollment - Storing Certificate."
msgstr "证书注册-存储证书。"

msgid "Certificate Enrollment - Certificate import has failed to add biometric or device passcode protection. Please turn on device passcode and try again."
msgstr "证书注册-证书导入无法添加生物特征或设备密码保护。请打开设备密码，然后重试。"

msgid "Certificate enrollment has failed. Please enable screen lock (pattern, PIN, or password) and try again."
msgstr "证书注册失败。请启用屏幕锁定（模式，PIN或密码），然后重试。"

msgid "Certificate Enrollment - Certificate import has failed because your device does not support fingerprint authentication."
msgstr "证书注册-证书导入失败，因为您的设备不支持指纹认证。"

msgid "Certificate Enrollment - Certificate successfully imported."
msgstr "证书注册-证书成功导入。"

msgid "Store Password:"
msgstr "商店密码："

msgid "CA Password:"
msgstr "CA密码："

msgid "Please enter the required data for enrollment.  If CA Password prompt is present enter the Challenge Password required by the CA."
msgstr "请输入所需的注册数据。如果出现“ CA密码”提示，请输入CA要求的质询密码。"

msgid "Enroll"
msgstr "注册"

msgid "Certificate Enrollment - Certificate Authority auto-approval required. Request failed, contact administrator."
msgstr "证书注册-需要证书颁发机构自动批准。请求失败，请与管理员联系。"

msgid "Certificate Enrollment failed."
msgstr "证书注册失败。"

msgid "Please wait while the Certificate Authority is contacted..."
msgstr "正在与认证中心联系时，请稍候..."

msgid "Certificate Enrollment - Initiating, Please Wait."
msgstr "证书注册-正在启动，请稍候。"

msgid "Certificate Enrollment - Request forwarded."
msgstr "证书注册-转发请求。"

msgid "PIN:"
msgstr "销："

msgid "Passcode:"
msgstr "密码："

msgid "Token code:"
msgstr "令牌代码："

msgid "PIN or Passcode:"
msgstr "PIN码或密码："

msgid "Passcode or PIN:"
msgstr "密码或PIN码："

msgid "Awaiting user input."
msgstr "等待用户输入。"

msgid "Enter a username and software token PIN"
msgstr "输入用户名和软件令牌PIN"

msgid "Acquiring SofToken code. Please wait."
msgstr "获取SofToken代码。请耐心等待。"

msgid "Validating credentials."
msgstr "验证凭证。"

msgid "Acquiring passcode. Please wait."
msgstr "正在获取密码。请耐心等待。"

msgid "Passcode failure.  Please try again in 60 seconds."
msgstr "密码失败。请在60秒后重试。"

msgid "Acquiring next passcode. Please wait."
msgstr "正在获取下一个密码。请耐心等待。"

msgid "Next passcode failure.  Please try again in 60 seconds."
msgstr "下一个密码失败。请在60秒后重试。"

msgid "Acquiring next token code. Please wait."
msgstr "获取下一个令牌代码。请耐心等待。"

msgid "Next token code failure.  Please try again in 60 seconds."
msgstr "下一个令牌代码失败。请在60秒后重试。"

msgid "Unable to proceed. Unable to get preferences."
msgstr "无法继续。无法获得偏好。"

msgid "Connection State: "
msgstr "连接状态："

msgid "Time Connected: "
msgstr "连接时间："

msgid "Bytes Sent: "
msgstr "发送的字节数："

msgid "Bytes Received: "
msgstr "收到的字节数："

msgid "Packets Sent: "
msgstr "发送的数据包："

msgid "Packets Received: "
msgstr "收到的数据包："

msgid "Control Bytes Sent: "
msgstr "发送的控制字节："

msgid "Control Bytes Received: "
msgstr "收到的控制字节："

msgid "Control Packets Sent: "
msgstr "发送的控制数据包："

msgid "Control Packets Received: "
msgstr "收到的控制报文："

msgid "Encrypted Bytes Sent: "
msgstr "发送的加密字节数："

msgid "Encrypted Bytes Received: "
msgstr "收到的加密字节："

msgid "Encrypted Packets Sent: "
msgstr "发送的加密数据包："

msgid "Encrypted Packets Received: "
msgstr "收到的加密数据包："

msgid "Compressed Bytes Sent: "
msgstr "发送的压缩字节数："

msgid "Compressed Bytes Received: "
msgstr "收到的压缩字节："

msgid "Compressed Packets Sent: "
msgstr "发送的压缩数据包："

msgid "Compressed Packets Received: "
msgstr "收到的压缩数据包："

msgid "Inbound Discarded Packets: "
msgstr "入站丢弃的数据包："

msgid "Outbound Discarded Packets: "
msgstr "出站丢弃的数据包："

msgid "Inbound Bypassed Packets: "
msgstr "入站绕过数据包："

msgid "Outbound Bypassed Packets: "
msgstr "出站绕过的数据包："

msgid "Client Address (IPv4): "
msgstr "客户端地址（IPv4）："

msgid "Server Address: "
msgstr "服务器地址："

msgid "Client Address (IPv6): "
msgstr "客户端地址（IPv6）："

msgid "Connected To: "
msgstr "连接到："

msgid "Proxy Address: "
msgstr "代理地址："

msgid "Proxy Host Name: "
msgstr "代理主机名："

msgid "Proxy Port: "
msgstr "代理端口："

msgid "Connection Mode (IPv4):"
msgstr "连接模式（IPv4）："

msgid "Connection Mode (IPv6):"
msgstr "连接模式（IPv6）："

msgid "Dynamic Tunnel Exclusion:"
msgstr "动态隧道排除："

msgid "Dynamic Tunnel Inclusion:"
msgstr "动态隧道包含："

msgid "Unconfirmed"
msgstr "未确认"

msgid "FIPS Mode:"
msgstr "FIPS模式："

msgid "Trusted Network Detection:"
msgstr "可信网络检测："

msgid "Always On:"
msgstr "永远在线："

msgid "Network Status:"
msgstr "网络状态："

msgid "DAP Message:"
msgstr "DAP讯息："

msgid "Appliance:"
msgstr "适用："

msgid "SMS Status:"
msgstr "短信状态："

msgid "Administrative Domain:"
msgstr "管理域："

msgid "Profile Name:"
msgstr "个人资料名称："

msgid "Session Disconnect: "
msgstr "会话断开连接："

msgid "Management Connection State: "
msgstr "管理连接状态："

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used when 1 day is remaining until the VPN session times out.
#.
#. NOTE: At this time only two plural forms are supported
#, c-format
msgid "%u Day"
msgstr "%u天"

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used when more than 1 day is remaining until the VPN session times out.
#.
#. NOTE: At this time only two plural forms are supported
#, c-format
msgid "%u Days"
msgstr "%u天"

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used when 1 hour is remaining until the VPN session times out.
#.
#. NOTE: At this time only two plural forms are supported
#, c-format
msgid "%u Hour"
msgstr "%u小时"

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used when more than 1 hour is remaining until the VPN session times out.
#.
#. NOTE: At this time only two plural forms are supported
#, c-format
msgid "%u Hours"
msgstr "%u小时"

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used when 1 minute is remaining until the VPN session times out.
#.
#. NOTE: At this time only two plural forms are supported
#, c-format
msgid "%u Minute"
msgstr "%u分钟"

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used when more than 1 minute is remaining until the VPN session times out.
#.
#. NOTE: At this time only two plural forms are supported
#, c-format
msgid "%u Minutes"
msgstr "%u分钟"

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used when less than 1 minute is remaining until the VPN session times out.
msgid "Less Than 1 Minute"
msgstr "少于1分钟"

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used to format the time remaining until the VPN session times out.
#. It is used when only a single fragment (ex: 1 Hour) needs to be displayed.
#, c-format
msgid "%s Remaining"
msgstr "剩余%s"

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used to format the time remaining until the VPN session times out.
#. It is used when two fragments (ex: 1 Hour 5 minutes) need to be displayed.
#, c-format
msgid "%s %s Remaining"
msgstr "剩余%s %s"

#. Doc: VPN Session Timeout Remaining
#. This string is used whenthe VPN session is out to expire.
msgid "Session Expiring"
msgstr "会话即将到期"

msgid "Tunnel All Traffic"
msgstr "隧道所有交通"

msgid "Split Include"
msgstr "隧道分流"

msgid "Split Exclude"
msgstr "分割排除"

msgid "Drop All Traffic"
msgstr "丢弃所有流量"

msgid "Bypass All Traffic"
msgstr "绕过所有流量"

msgid "VPN Stats"
msgstr "VPN统计"

msgid "Protocol Info"
msgstr "协议信息"

#, c-format
msgid "Note: %u of %u routes shown"
msgstr "注意：显示的%u条路线中的%u条"

msgid "Connect using Cisco AnyConnect App at least once before using any other App."
msgstr "在使用任何其他应用程序之前，请至少使用一次Cisco AnyConnect应用程序进行连接。"

msgid "Import PKCS12 failed with error"
msgstr "导入PKCS12失败，出现错误"

msgid "User certificate required by this connection is protected by biometrics or device passcode."
msgstr "此连接所需的用户证书受生物识别或设备密码保护。"

msgid "access an authentication certificate that is protected"
msgstr "访问受保护的身份验证证书"

msgid "Save"
msgstr "保存"

msgid "Edit"
msgstr "编辑"

msgid "Enter"
msgstr "输入"

msgid "Required"
msgstr "需要"

msgid "Optional"
msgstr "可选的"

msgid "Enabling..."
msgstr "正在启用..."

msgid "Synchronizing..."
msgstr "同步中..."

msgid "Messages"
msgstr "留言内容"

msgid "Service"
msgstr "服务"

msgid "App"
msgstr "应用程式"

msgid "Error initializing. Please exit the application and restart."
msgstr "初始化时出错。请退出应用程序，然后重新启动。"

msgid "Failed to start connection."
msgstr "无法启动连接。"

msgid "Failed to stop connection."
msgstr "无法停止连接。"

msgid "Failed to delete VPN connection."
msgstr "无法删除VPN连接。"

msgid "Could not update VPN connection list."
msgstr "无法更新VPN连接列表。"

msgid "Failed to change active connection. Please restart the application and try again."
msgstr "更改活动连接失败。请重新启动应用程序，然后重试。"

msgid "Unable to delete certificate(s). Please try again."
msgstr "无法删除证书。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Connection timed out. Please try again."
msgstr "连接超时。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Unable to enable AnyConnect. Please exit the App and try again."
msgstr "无法启用AnyConnect。请退出该应用，然后重试。"

msgid "Unable to delete certificate(s). Please select a connection before attempting to delete certificate(s)."
msgstr "无法删除证书。在尝试删除证书之前，请选择一个连接。"

msgid "Unable to retrieve certificate(s). Please select a connection before attempting to retrieve certificate(s)."
msgstr "无法检索证书。在尝试检索证书之前，请选择一个连接。"

msgid "Unable to retrieve certificate(s). Please try again."
msgstr "无法检索证书。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Please select a connection before importing a certificate."
msgstr "请在导入证书之前选择一个连接。"

msgid "Unable to import a certificate. Please try again."
msgstr "无法导入证书。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Unable to import a certificate. Please check the URL."
msgstr "无法导入证书。请检查URL。"

msgid "Unable to import a certificate. Unsupported data."
msgstr "无法导入证书。不支持的数据。"

msgid "Please select a VPN configuration first."
msgstr "请首先选择一个VPN配置。"

msgid "Error updating IPCU configurations."
msgstr "更新IPCU配置时出错。"

msgid "Error updating VPN configurations."
msgstr "更新VPN配置时出错。"

msgid "Performing FIPS integrity checks..."
msgstr "执行FIPS完整性检查..."

msgid "FIPS integrity check failed - disconnecting VPN."
msgstr "FIPS完整性检查失败-断开VPN连接。"

msgid "Disabling FIPS..."
msgstr "禁用FIPS ..."

msgid "FIPS disable failed - disconnecting VPN."
msgstr "FIPS禁用失败-断开VPN连接。"

msgid "FIPS operation timed out - disconnecting VPN."
msgstr "FIPS操作超时-断开VPN连接。"

msgid "Obtaining Certificate"
msgstr "取得证书"

msgid "Failed to start connection. No network available."
msgstr "无法启动连接。没有可用的网络。"

msgid "Unable to connect the VPN connection: An unknown error has occurred."
msgstr "无法连接VPN连接：发生未知错误。"

msgid "Unable to disconnect the VPN connection: An unknown error has occurred."
msgstr "无法断开VPN连接：发生未知错误。"

msgid "Unable to create new VPN connection: An unknown error has occurred."
msgstr "无法创建新的VPN连接：发生未知错误。"

msgid "Unable to import data: An unknown error has occurred."
msgstr "无法导入数据：发生未知错误。"

msgid "Unable to process unknown command."
msgstr "无法处理未知命令。"

msgid "Unable to establish the VPN connection: Another VPN connection is already established."
msgstr "无法建立VPN连接：已建立另一个VPN连接。"

msgid "Unable to establish the VPN connection: A system error has occurred."
msgstr "无法建立VPN连接：发生系统错误。"

msgid "Unable to establish the VPN connection: No matching VPN connection was found and no host address was provided to connect to."
msgstr "无法建立VPN连接：未找到匹配的VPN连接，也未提供要连接的主机地址。"

msgid "Unable to establish the VPN connection: No matching VPN connection was found."
msgstr "无法建立VPN连接：未找到匹配的VPN连接。"

msgid "Unable to create new VPN connection: The required host address was not found."
msgstr "无法创建新的VPN连接：找不到所需的主机地址。"

msgid "Unable to create new VPN connection: The connection name is already in use."
msgstr "无法创建新的VPN连接：连接名称已在使用中。"

msgid "Unable to create new VPN connection: A system error has occurred."
msgstr "无法创建新的VPN连接：发生系统错误。"

msgid "Unable to create new VPN connection: 'ike-identity' parameter is missing."
msgstr "无法创建新的VPN连接：缺少“ ike-identity”参数。"

msgid "Unable to create new VPN connection: Invalid authentication method."
msgstr "无法创建新的VPN连接：无效的身份验证方法。"

msgid "Unable to import data: Requires a valid URI."
msgstr "无法导入数据：需要有效的URI。"

msgid "Unable to import data: Requires a valid parameter 'type'."
msgstr "无法导入数据：需要有效的参数“类型”。"

msgid "Unable to import localization file: Missing 'lang' parameter."
msgstr "无法导入本地化文件：缺少“ lang”参数。"

msgid "Unable to import localization file: Missing 'host' parameter."
msgstr "无法导入本地化文件：缺少“主机”参数。"

msgid "Received import localization command without a valid host."
msgstr "收到没有有效主机的导入本地化命令。"

msgid "The External Control feature is disabled. It can be enabled from the AnyConnect settings."
msgstr "外部控制功能被禁用。可以从AnyConnect设置中启用它。"

msgid "Invalid URI: Empty parameters are not allowed."
msgstr "无效的URI：不允许使用空参数。"

msgid "Add VPN Connection..."
msgstr "添加VPN连接..."

msgid "Pending..."
msgstr "待定..."

msgid "Back"
msgstr "背部"

msgid "Choose a connection..."
msgstr "选择一个连接..."

msgid "Please select a connection before connecting."
msgstr "连接之前，请选择一个连接。"

msgid "Create a connection before connecting."
msgstr "在连接之前创建一个连接。"

msgid "Initializing..."
msgstr "初始化中..."

msgid "VIRTUAL PRIVATE NETWORK"
msgstr "虚拟专用网"

msgid "GENERAL"
msgstr "一般"

msgid "No Connections"
msgstr "没有连接"

msgid "Select Connection"
msgstr "选择连接"

msgid "Cannot connect to the default connection. Please select a different connection."
msgstr "无法连接到默认连接。请选择其他连接。"

#, c-format
msgid "Another application has requested that AnyConnect %1$s.  Do you want to allow this?"
msgstr "另一个应用程序已请求AnyConnect%1$s。您要允许吗？"

#, c-format
msgid "create a new connection to \"%1$s\
msgstr "创建与\"%1$s\"的新连接"

#, c-format
msgid "connect to \"%1$s\
msgstr "连接到\"%1$s\

msgid "connect to the current default connection"
msgstr "连接到当前的默认连接"

msgid "disconnect the current connection"
msgstr "断开当前连接"

#, c-format
msgid "import data of type \"%1$s\
msgstr "导入类型为\"%1$s\"的数据"

msgid "perform an unknown operation"
msgstr "执行未知的操作"

msgid "close"
msgstr "关"

msgid "Don't Allow"
msgstr "不允许"

msgid "This connection is administratively generated and cannot be deleted."
msgstr "此连接是通过管理方式生成的，无法删除。"

msgid "Could not enable the Cisco AnyConnect Secure Mobility plugin.  Please reinstall this application."
msgstr "无法启用Cisco AnyConnect安全移动插件。请重新安装此应用程序。"

msgid "You must accept the First Run Agreement before using this application.  Please exit the application and launch it again to view the agreement."
msgstr "使用此应用程序之前，您必须接受“首次运行协议”。请退出该应用程序，然后再次启动以查看协议。"

msgid "Unexpected Error: Please restart the app."
msgstr "意外错误：请重新启动应用程序。"

msgid "Banner"
msgstr "旗帜"

msgid "Reject"
msgstr "拒绝"

msgid "Unknown Subject"
msgstr "未知主题"

msgid "Cannot Verify Server Identity"
msgstr "无法验证服务器身份"

msgid "An unknown error has occurred while waiting for user input. Please attempt to connect again."
msgstr "等待用户输入时发生未知错误。请尝试重新连接。"

msgid "A timeout has occurred while waiting for user input. Please attempt to connect again."
msgstr "等待用户输入时发生超时。请尝试重新连接。"

msgid "The connection has been modified externally. Changes cannot be saved."
msgstr "连接已在外部进行了修改。更改无法保存。"

msgid "Stats"
msgstr "统计资料"

msgid "Client Address (IPv4)"
msgstr "客户端地址（IPv4）"

msgid "Client Address (IPv6)"
msgstr "客户端地址（IPv6）"

msgid "Loading..."
msgstr "载入中..."

msgid "Status Overview"
msgstr "状态总览"

msgid "Delete VPN Connection"
msgstr "删除VPN连接"

msgid "Add VPN Connection"
msgstr "添加VPN连接"

msgid "VPN Connection Help"
msgstr "VPN连接帮助"

msgid "This connection is administratively generated.  Not all fields can be edited."
msgstr "此连接是通过管理方式生成的。并非所有字段都可以编辑。"

msgid "Inconsistent GUI state. Please restart app"
msgstr "GUI状态不一致。请重启应用"

msgid "Network Roaming"
msgstr "网络漫游"

msgid "No App rules configured."
msgstr "未配置任何应用规则。"

msgid "Connect On Demand"
msgstr "按需连接"

msgid "Domain List"
msgstr "域列表"

msgid "Advanced"
msgstr "高级"

msgid "Tunnel Protocol"
msgstr "隧道协议"

msgid "Select Protocol"
msgstr "选择协议"

msgid "Unable to get configuration settings."
msgstr "无法获取配置设置。"

msgid "Unable to create VPN connection. Please try again."
msgstr "无法建立VPN连线。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Error saving VPN connection. Please try again."
msgstr "保存VPN连接时出错。请再试一遍。"

#, c-format
msgid "Please choose a different description. \"%1$s\" already exists."
msgstr "请选择其他说明。 \"%1$s\"已经存在。"

msgid "Are you sure you want to delete this connection?"
msgstr "您确定要删除此连接吗？"

msgid "Please enter a valid URL for the Server Address."
msgstr "请输入服务器地址的有效URL。"

msgid "Please add domains or disable On Demand to continue."
msgstr "请添加域或禁用“按需”以继续。"

msgid "Unexpected user interface error: Please restart the app."
msgstr "意外的用户界面错误：请重新启动应用程序。"

msgid "This connection is in use and cannot be edited."
msgstr "该连接正在使用中，无法编辑。"

msgid "This is a default configuration created by AnyConnect, used for initial setup. User is not allowed to connect to this configuration. The configuration will be removed on uninstall."
msgstr "这是AnyConnect创建的默认配置，用于初始设置。不允许用户连接到此配置。卸载时将删除配置。"

msgid "Quarantine"
msgstr "隔离"

msgid "Management"
msgstr "管理"

msgid "VPN Debug Logs"
msgstr "VPN调试日志"

msgid "When logs are available, they will be displayed on this screen."
msgstr "当日志可用时，它们将显示在此屏幕上。"

msgid "Please enable \"VPN Debug Logs\" to view logs on this screen."
msgstr "请启用“ VPN调试日志”以在此屏幕上查看日志。"

msgid "Share Logs..."
msgstr "共享日志..."

msgid "Clear Logs"
msgstr "清除日志"

msgid "Clear Profile Data"
msgstr "清除个人资料数据"

msgid "Clear Localization Data"
msgstr "清除本地化数据"

msgid "View Messages"
msgstr "查看讯息"

msgid "View Service Debug Logs"
msgstr "查看服务调试日志"

msgid "View Application Debug Logs"
msgstr "查看应用程序调试日志"

msgid "System Information"
msgstr "系统信息"

msgid "Email logs to"
msgstr "电子邮件记录到"

msgid "Administrator"
msgstr "管理员"

msgid "Share with"
msgstr "分享"

msgid "An error has occurred while attempting to send the email. Please try again."
msgstr "尝试发送电子邮件时发生错误。请再试一遍。"

msgid "An unknown error has occurred while attempting to send the email. Please try again."
msgstr "尝试发送电子邮件时发生未知错误。请再试一遍。"

msgid "State or Province Name"
msgstr "州或省名称"

msgid "Country Name"
msgstr "国家的名字"

msgid "Subject Name"
msgstr "主题名称"

msgid "Issuer"
msgstr "发行人"

msgid "An unexpected error has occurred. Please retry."
msgstr "发生意外的错误。请重试。"

msgid "This certificate cannot be displayed. Please contact your system administrator if this error persists."
msgstr "该证书无法显示。如果此错误仍然存​​在，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "VPN configuration created by user will be renamed to avoid a name conflict with imported configuration when it is disconnected."
msgstr "用户创建的VPN配置将被重命名，以避免断开连接时与导入的配置发生名称冲突。"

msgid "This certificate is not trusted for the following reason(s):"
msgstr "由于以下原因，此证书不受信任："

msgid "Selecting this option will disable certificate authentication."
msgstr "选择此选项将禁用证书身份验证。"

msgid "This will automatically select a certificate for authentication."
msgstr "这将自动选择用于认证的证书。"

msgid "Please select a certificate to use for authentication."
msgstr "请选择用于身份验证的证书。"

msgid "There are no certificates available to use for authentication. Please install a certificate to use certificate authentication."
msgstr "没有可用于身份验证的证书。请安装证书以使用证书身份验证。"

msgid "There are no certificates available to manage."
msgstr "没有可用于管理的证书。"

msgid "An error has occurred while gathering certificates. Please try again."
msgstr "收集证书时发生错误。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Unable to list the certificates in the system."
msgstr "无法列出系统中的证书。"

msgid "Operation could not be completed. Please try again"
msgstr "操作无法完成。请再试一遍"

msgid "Unable to delete certificate(s), as they were provisioned by an administrator"
msgstr "由于管理员提供了证书，因此无法删除证书"

msgid "Select Certificate"
msgstr "选择证书"

#, c-format
msgid "Issuer: %1$s"
msgstr "发行人：%1$s"

#, c-format
msgid "Expiration Date: %1$s (expired!)"
msgstr "过期日期：%1$s（过期！）"

#, c-format
msgid "Expiration Date: %1$s  (in %2$s  days)"
msgstr "到期日期：%1$s（以%2$s天为单位）"

#, c-format
msgid "Expiration Date: %1$s"
msgstr "到期日期：%1$s"

msgid "Unable to select certificate."
msgstr "无法选择证书。"

msgid "Are you sure you want to delete this certificate?"
msgstr "您确定要删除此证书吗？"

msgid "Unable to delete certificate."
msgstr "无法删除证书。"

msgid "Are you sure you want to delete all the certificates?"
msgstr "您确定要删除所有证书吗？"

msgid "Import User Certificate..."
msgstr "导入用户证书..."

msgid "Delete All Server Certificates"
msgstr "删除所有服务器证书"

msgid "Enter URL"
msgstr "输入网址"

msgid "Invalid URL!"
msgstr "无效的网址！"

msgid "Pending certificate import."
msgstr "待导入证书。"

msgid "Unable to import certificate because it exceeds the 7.5KB limit."
msgstr "无法导入证书，因为它超出了7.5KB的限制。"

msgid "Always Connect"
msgstr "始终连接"

msgid "Never Connect"
msgstr "永不连接"

msgid "Connect If Needed"
msgstr "如果需要连接"

msgid "Connect On Demand Help"
msgstr "按需连接帮助"

msgid "This screen allows you to configure the Connect On Demand functionality provided by Apple iOS. This feature requires certificate-only authentication. The \"Always Connect\" behavior is dependent on the iOS release, see additional information for details."
msgstr "该屏幕允许您配置Apple iOS提供的按需连接功能。此功能需要仅证书认证。 “始终连接”行为取决于iOS版本，有关详细信息，请参见其他信息。"

msgid "Your administrator has configured the Connect On Demand functionality provided by Apple iOS for you.  These settings cannot be changed. Apple has altered the behavior of the \"Always Connect\" rule set in Apple iOS 7. It now behaves as \"Connect If Needed\"."
msgstr "您的管理员已配置了Apple iOS为您提供的按需连接功能。这些设置无法更改。 Apple已更改了Apple iOS 7中“始终连接”规则集的行为。它现在的行为为“需要时连接”。"

msgid "A duplicate domain entry has been found. Please modify or remove this domain entry to continue."
msgstr "找到重复的域条目。请修改或删除此域条目以继续。"

msgid "An invalid URL has been found. Please modify or remove this domain entry to continue."
msgstr "找到无效的URL。请修改或删除此域条目以继续。"

msgid "Add Domain..."
msgstr "添加域..."

msgid "Domains"
msgstr "域"

msgid "Service Debug Logs"
msgstr "服务调试日志"

msgid "Application Debug Logs"
msgstr "应用程序调试日志"

msgid "VPN Details"
msgstr "VPN详细信息"

msgid "State"
msgstr "状态"

msgid "Mode (IPv4)"
msgstr "模式（IPv4）"

msgid "Mode (IPv6)"
msgstr "模式（IPv6）"

msgid "Client (IPv4)"
msgstr "客户端（IPv4）"

msgid "Client (IPv6)"
msgstr "客户端（IPv6）"

msgid "Check Certificate Revocation"
msgstr "检查证书吊销"

msgid "Strict Certificate Trust Mode"
msgstr "严格证书信任模式"

msgid "Secure Routes"
msgstr "安全路线"

msgid "Non-Secure Routes"
msgstr "非安全路线"

msgid "Graphs"
msgstr "图表"

#, c-format
msgid "%1$s Bytes "
msgstr "%1$s字节"

msgid "NO DATA"
msgstr "没有数据"

msgid "Profile"
msgstr "轮廓"

msgid "Import Profile..."
msgstr "导入配置文件..."

msgid "Deleting Profile"
msgstr "删除个人资料"

msgid "Show Profile"
msgstr "显示资料"

msgid "Profile Details"
msgstr "个人资料详细信息"

msgid "There is no profile currently on your device"
msgstr "您的设备上当前没有个人资料"

msgid "Unable to delete a profile. Please try again.."
msgstr "无法删除个人资料。请再试一遍.."

msgid "This feature is only supported on iOS 5.0 and later versions."
msgstr "仅iOS 5.0和更高版本支持此功能。"

msgid "Are you sure you want to delete the profile?"
msgstr "您确定要删除个人资料吗？"

msgid "There is no localization files currently on your device"
msgstr "您的设备上目前没有本地化文件"

msgid "Enter server address and localization language"
msgstr "输入服务器地址和本地化语言"

msgid "default (English)"
msgstr "默认（英语）"

msgid "Enter server address"
msgstr "输入服务器地址"

msgid "Enter language"
msgstr "输入语言"

msgid "Invalid server address!"
msgstr "无效的服务器地址！"

msgid "Unable to import localization file. Please check server address or language."
msgstr "无法导入本地化文件。请检查服务器地址或语言。"

msgid "Max input length (512 characters) exceeded. Please try again."
msgstr "超过最大输入长度（512个字符）。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Clearing profile"
msgstr "清除个人资料"

msgid "Clearing"
msgstr "清除中"

msgid "Deleting"
msgstr "删除中"

msgid "Localization"
msgstr "本土化"

msgid "PerApp Policy"
msgstr "PerApp政策"

msgid "Clearing localization data"
msgstr "清除本地化数据"

msgid "Failed to Enable VPN Debug Logs"
msgstr "无法启用VPN调试日志"

#, c-format
msgid "Failed to %1$s VPN debug logging. Please try again."
msgstr "无法 %1$s VPN调试日志记录。请再试一遍。"

#, c-format
msgid "Unable to delete %1$s data. Please try again."
msgstr "无法删除%1$s的数据。请再试一遍。"

#, c-format
msgid "Please select a connection before attempting to delete %1$s data."
msgstr "在尝试删除%1$s数据之前，请选择一个连接。"

msgid "Please select a connection before turning on debug logging."
msgstr "请在打开调试日志记录之前选择一个连接。"

#, c-format
msgid "Could not %1$s logging"
msgstr "无法%1$s记录"

msgid "Currently processing other requests. Please try again."
msgstr "当前正在处理其他请求。请再试一遍。"

msgid "This device is not configured to send email. Please check that there is an email account configured in the MobileMail application."
msgstr "该设备未配置为发送电子邮件。请检查是否在MobileMail应用程序中配置了电子邮件帐户。"

msgid "Unable to import a profile. Please check the URL."
msgstr "无法导入配置文件。请检查URL。"

msgid "Unable to delete profile. Please try again."
msgstr "无法删除个人资料。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Pending profile import."
msgstr "等待导入配置文件。"

msgid "Unable to import a profile. Please try again.."
msgstr "无法导入配置文件。请再试一遍.."

msgid "Unable to import a profile. Invalid AnyConnect profile."
msgstr "无法导入配置文件。无效的AnyConnect配置文件。"

msgid "Please select a connection before attempting to delete profile data."
msgstr "在尝试删除个人资料数据之前，请选择一个连接。"

msgid "Please select a connection before attempting to import profile data."
msgstr "在尝试导入配置文件数据之前，请选择一个连接。"

msgid "Unable to import profile because it exceeds the 50KB limit."
msgstr "无法导入配置文件，因为它超过了50KB的限制。"

msgid "Localization file has been successfully imported."
msgstr "本地化文件已成功导入。"

msgid "Unable to import a localization file. Please try again."
msgstr "无法导入本地化文件。请再试一遍。"

msgid "Please select a connection before importing a localization file."
msgstr "请在导入本地化文件之前选择一个连接。"

msgid "Pending Localization import."
msgstr "待本地化导入。"

msgid "Please select a connection before deleting a localization file(s)."
msgstr "在删除本地化文件之前，请选择一个连接。"

msgid "Unable to delete localization data. Please try again.."
msgstr "无法删除本地化数据。请再试一遍.."

msgid "Deleting localization data"
msgstr "删除本地化数据"

#, c-format
msgid "Version %1$s"
msgstr "版本%1$s"

msgid "Get New Token"
msgstr "获取新令牌"

msgid "Select Group"
msgstr "选择组"

msgid "The following information is displayed for each VPN connection."
msgstr "将为每个VPN连接显示以下信息。"

msgid "A unique case-sensitive name for the connection."
msgstr "连接的唯一大小写敏感名称。"

msgid "The domain name, IP address, or group URL of the ASA, for example asa2.example.com."
msgstr "ASA的域名，IP地址或组URL，例如asa2.example.com。"

msgid "Switch on this option to reconnect when your network configuration changes. Network changes occur when roaming between cellular and Wi-Fi networks, or when your device wakes up. Unless this option is enabled, AnyConnect will attempt to reconnect for 20 seconds and then disconnect if the connection cannot be re-established. Enabling this option may have an adverse effect on battery life."
msgstr "当您的网络配置更改时，请打开此选项以重新连接。在蜂窝网络和Wi-Fi网络之间漫游时，或者在设备唤醒时，都会发生网络更改。除非启用此选项，否则AnyConnect将尝试重新连接20秒钟，然后在无法重新建立连接时断开连接。启用此选项可能会对电池寿命产生不利影响。"

msgid "Disabled - do not use certificate authentication."
msgstr "已禁用-不使用证书身份验证。"

msgid "Automatic - automatically select a certificate for authentication."
msgstr "自动-自动选择用于认证的证书。"

msgid "Select a specific certificate - specify a certificate to use when connecting to a tunnel group that requires a certificate."
msgstr "选择特定证书-指定连接到需要证书的隧道组时要使用的证书。"

msgid "Switch on this option to initiate a VPN connection when accessing domains in the domain list. This option requires a certificate to be installed for the connection."
msgstr "访问域列表中的域时，请启用此选项以启动VPN连接。此选项需要为连接安装证书。"

msgid "For Per-App VPN connections only, this is the list of installed applications that are allowed access to the private network."
msgstr "仅对于Per-App VPN连接，这是允许访问专用网络的已安装应用程序的列表。"

msgid "A list of domains for which Connect On Demand match rules apply."
msgstr "适用于“按需连接”匹配规则的域列表。"

msgid "Only enable 'Connect with IPsec' if instructed to do so by your administrator. If the server is not configured for IPsec, you will not be able to connect."
msgstr "仅在管理员指示下启用“使用IPsec连接”。如果未为服务器配置IPsec，则将无法连接。"

msgid "Displays the advanced settings."
msgstr "显示高级设置。"

msgid "IKE Identity cannot be empty for the specified authentication protocol."
msgstr "对于指定的身份验证协议，IKE身份不能为空。"

msgid "Enable this option to use the IPsec IKEv2 protocol for connecting to the secure gateway. The default is SSL."
msgstr "启用此选项可使用IPsec IKEv2协议连接到安全网关。默认值为SSL。"

msgid "Configure the Connect on Demand functionality by creating lists of rules that are checked when other applications initiate network connections. These rules consist of lists of host names (host.example.com), domains (.example.com), or partial domains (.internal.example.com), but cannot include IP addresses (10.0.0.1). When matched, these rules result in one of the following Connect On Demand behaviors:"
msgstr "通过创建在其他应用程序启动网络连接时要检查的规则列表来配置按需连接功能。这些规则包含主机名（host.example.com），域（.example.com）或部分域（.internal.example.com）的列表，但不能包含IP地址（10.0.0.1）。匹配后，这些规则将导致以下“按需连接”行为之一："

msgid "On Apple iOS 6, iOS will always attempt to initiate a VPN connection when rules in this list are matched. On iOS 7.x, Always Connect is not supported, when rules in this list are matched they behave as \"Connect If Needed\" rules. On later releases, \"Always Connect\" is not used, configured rules are moved to the \"Connect If Needed\" list and behave as such."
msgstr "在Apple iOS 6上，当此列表中的规则匹配时，iOS将始终尝试启动VPN连接。在iOS 7.x上，不支持始终连接，当匹配此列表中的规则时，它们的行为就像\“如果需要连接\”规则。在以后的版本中，不使用“始终连接”，已配置的规则将移动到“需要时连接”列表中，其行为与此相同。"

msgid "iOS will never attempt to initiate a VPN connection when rules in this list are matched. Rules in this list take precedence over all other rules."
msgstr "当此列表中的规则匹配时，iOS绝不会尝试启动VPN连接。此列表中的规则优先于所有其他规则。"

msgid "When Connect On Demand is enabled, AnyConnect automatically adds the server address to this list. This prevents a VPN connection from being automatically established if you access the server's clientless portal on a web browser. Remove this rule if you do not want this behavior."
msgstr "启用按需连接后，AnyConnect会自动将服务器地址添加到此列表中。如果您在Web浏览器上访问服务器的无客户端门户，这将阻止自动建立VPN连接。如果您不希望出现这种情况，请删除此规则。"

msgid "iOS will attempt to initiate a VPN connection when rules in this list are matched only if the system could not resolve the address using DNS."
msgstr "仅当系统无法使用DNS解析地址时，iOS才会尝试匹配此列表中的规则来启动VPN连接。"

msgid "IPv4 Address"
msgstr "IPv4地址"

msgid "IPv6 Address"
msgstr "IPv6地址"

msgid "IPv4 Subnet Mask"
msgstr "IPv4子网掩码"

msgid "IPv6 Subnet Mask"
msgstr "IPv6子网掩码"

msgid "DNS Server"
msgstr "DNS服务器"

msgid "DNS Servers"
msgstr "DNS服务器"

msgid "DNS Primary"
msgstr "DNS主"

msgid "DNS Secondary"
msgstr "备用DNS"

msgid "Wi-Fi"
msgstr "无线上网"

msgid "Cellular Data"
msgstr "蜂窝数据"

msgid "DNS"
msgstr "域名解析"

msgid "Device"
msgstr "设备"

msgid "Client Version"
msgstr "客户端版本"

msgid "Platform Version"
msgstr "平台版本"

msgid "Platform"
msgstr "平台"

msgid "Routing Table"
msgstr "路由表"

msgid "Routing"
msgstr "路由"

msgid "Device Type"
msgstr "设备类型"

msgid "Destination:"
msgstr "目的地："

msgid "Gateway:"
msgstr "网关："

msgid "Flags:"
msgstr "标志："

msgid "Interface:"
msgstr "接口："

msgid "Settings Help"
msgstr "设定说明"

msgid "Users have control over the following settings."
msgstr "用户可以控制以下设置。"

msgid "Theme"
msgstr "主题"

msgid "Lets you choose the theme to be applied on all the views."
msgstr "让您选择要应用于所有视图的主题。"

msgid "AnyConnect is configured to block untrusted servers by default. Most users choose to keep this setting - connecting to untrusted server could result in a severe security compromise."
msgstr "默认情况下，AnyConnect配置为阻止不受信任的服务器。大多数用户选择保留此设置-连接到不受信任的服务器可能会严重危害安全性。"

msgid "When FIPS (Federal Information Processing Standards) mode is enabled, AnyConnect provides its highest level of security. The cryptographic modules used by AnyConnect in FIPS mode are validated as compliant with FIPS 140-2. Your system administrator may recommend changing this setting from the default value."
msgstr "启用FIPS（联邦信息处理标准）模式时，AnyConnect将提供其最高的安全性。经过验证的AnyConnect在FIPS模式下使用的加密模块符合FIPS 140-2的要求。您的系统管理员可能建议您将此设置更改为默认值。"

msgid "FIPS mode will be enabled the next time AnyConnect connects."
msgstr "下次AnyConnect连接时，将启用FIPS模式。"

msgid "This settings will be enabled the next time AnyConnect connects."
msgstr "下一次AnyConnect连接时，将启用此设置。"

msgid "Please modify Settings only when instructed by your system administrator."
msgstr "请仅在系统管理员的指导下修改设置。"

msgid "Enable CRL/OCSP checking on server certificates. Your system administrator may recommend changing this setting from the default value."
msgstr "对服务器证书启用CRL / OCSP检查。您的系统管理员可能建议您将此设置更改为默认值。"

msgid "If enabled, terminate connection if any issues were encountered while verifying the server certificate. Your system administrator may recommend changing this setting from the default value."
msgstr "如果启用，则在验证服务器证书时遇到任何问题时终止连接。您的系统管理员可能建议您将此设置更改为默认值。"

msgid "Untrusted Server"
msgstr "不受信任的服务器"

msgid "Would you like to continue anyway?"
msgstr "您仍然要继续吗？"

msgid "Share Logs"
msgstr "共享日志"

msgid "Problem"
msgstr "问题"

msgid "Describe the problem"
msgstr "描述问题"

msgid "Steps to reproduce"
msgstr "重现步骤"

msgid "Describe steps to reproduce"
msgstr "描述复制步骤"

msgid "Please describe the problem and steps to reproduce in the following fields."
msgstr "请在以下字段中描述问题和重现步骤。"

msgid "For troubleshooting VPN-related issues, please turn on \"VPN Debug Logs\", reproduce the issue, and then email logs."
msgstr "要解决与VPN相关的问题，请打开\“ VPN调试日志\”，重现问题，然后发送电子邮件日志。"

msgid "Send"
msgstr "发送"

msgid "Per-App VPN"
msgstr "按应用VPN"

msgid "On Demand Rules"
msgstr "按需规则"

msgid "Rule"
msgstr "规则"

msgid "Add Rule..."
msgstr "添加规则..."

msgid "Rule Details"
msgstr "规则明细"

msgid "Action"
msgstr "行动"

msgid "SSID Match"
msgstr "SSID匹配"

msgid "Interface Match"
msgstr "接口匹配"

msgid "URL Probe"
msgstr "URL探针"

msgid "DNS Search Domain Match"
msgstr "DNS搜索域匹配"

msgid "DNS Server Address Match"
msgstr "DNS服务器地址匹配"

msgid "Ignore"
msgstr "忽视"

msgid "Evaluate Connection"
msgstr "评估连接"

msgid "Add New"
msgstr "添新"

msgid "Add New (optional)"
msgstr "添加新（可选）"

msgid "Error: cannot display evaluate connection details - the details are malformed."
msgstr "错误：无法显示评估连接详细信息-详细信息格式不正确。"

msgid "Error: an invalid URL has been found. Please modify it or remove it to continue."
msgstr "错误：发现无效的URL。请对其进行修改或将其删除以继续。"

msgid "Cellular"
msgstr "蜂窝电话"

msgid "WIFI"
msgstr "无线上网"

msgid "Any"
msgstr "任何"

msgid "Required DNS Servers"
msgstr "所需的DNS服务器"

msgid "Required URL Probe"
msgstr "必需的URL探针"

msgid "Imported Certificates"
msgstr "进口证书"

msgid "Import Certificate Help"
msgstr "导入证书帮助"

msgid "AnyConnect only has access to certificates that have been imported into AnyConnect, and certificates provisioned for AnyConnect by an Enterprise Mobile Management (EMM) system."
msgstr "AnyConnect只能访问已导入AnyConnect的证书以及企业移动管理（EMM）系统为AnyConnect设置的证书。"

msgid "You can import a user certificate from a URL by clicking <b>Import User Certificate</b> and specifying the URL."
msgstr "通过单击<b>导入用户证书</ b>并指定URL，可以从URL导入用户证书。"

msgid "Or, you can import, or share, a user certificate from another app that supports the system sharing capabilities. This can be done from the Files, Email, or Safari apps; or any other third party app that supports sharing.  Although the method to do this may be different in various apps, you generally follow this sequence:"
msgstr "或者，您可以从另一个支持系统共享功能的应用程序中导入或共享用户证书。这可以通过“文件”，“电子邮件”或Safari应用程序完成；或任何其他支持共享的第三方应用。尽管在各种应用程序中执行此操作的方法可能有所不同，但是通常请遵循以下顺序："

msgid "1. Open the other App and locate the certificate. Open the certificate's context menu. (This is typically a long press, but may be another action.)"
msgstr "1.打开另一个应用程序并找到证书。打开证书的上下文菜单。 （这通常是一个长按，但可能是另一动作。）"

msgid "2. Click <b>Share</b> and choose <b>AnyConnect</b>.  You may need to swipe to see additional icons.)  If AnyConnect is not available, it has not been enabled for sharing yet."
msgstr "2.单击<b>共享</ b>，然后选择<b> AnyConnect </ b>。您可能需要滑动才能看到其他图标。）如果AnyConnect不可用，则尚未启用共享功能。"

msgid "3. To enable AnyConnect sharing, click <b>More</b>, locate AnyConnect, and toggle it on. This is a one-time action done in any app that supports sharing."
msgstr "3.要启用AnyConnect共享，请单击<b>更多</ b>，找到AnyConnect，然后将其打开。这是在任何支持共享的应用程序中执行的一次性操作。"

msgid "4. Sharing a certificate file from one of these apps results in that certificate being imported to AnyConnect. The imported user certificate is now available in <b>AnyConnect > Diagnostics > Certificates</b>."
msgstr "4.从这些应用程序之一共享证书文件会导致将该证书导入到AnyConnect。现在可以在<b> AnyConnect>诊断>证书</ b>中使用导入的用户证书。"

msgid "Try Again"
msgstr "再试一次"

msgid "Enter certificate password"
msgstr "输入证书密码"

msgid "Unable to import certificate due to incorrect password. Do you want to try again?"
msgstr "由于密码错误，无法导入证书。您想再试一次吗？"

msgid "Start VPN"
msgstr "启动VPN"

msgid "Start AnyConnect"
msgstr "启动AnyConnect"

msgid "Stop VPN"
msgstr "停止VPN"

msgid "Do you want to launch AnyConnect to continue?"
msgstr "您是否要启动AnyConnect以继续？"

msgid "is not the selected VPN configuration."
msgstr "不是所选的VPN配置。"

msgid "Connect VPN to"
msgstr "将VPN连接到"

msgid "is connecting."
msgstr "正在连接。"

msgid "Unable to make the connection. The VPN configuration was not found."
msgstr "无法建立连接。找不到VPN配置。"

msgid "VPN has already been connected."
msgstr "VPN已连接。"

msgid "Failed to start the VPN connection."
msgstr "无法启动VPN连接。"

msgid "There is no VPN configuration available."
msgstr "没有可用的VPN配置。"

msgid "VPN is not connected."
msgstr "VPN未连接。"

msgid "There is no active VPN configuration."
msgstr "没有活动的VPN配置。"

msgid "Disconnect VPN?"
msgstr "断开VPN？"

msgid "has been successfully disconnected."
msgstr "已成功断开连接。"

msgid "The debug logs from this component will be enabled the next time AnyConnect connects."
msgstr "下一次AnyConnect连接时，将启用来自此组件的调试日志。"

msgid "Unexpected error occurred when saving debug log configuration. Previous values will be used the next time AnyConnect connects."
msgstr "保存调试日志配置时发生意外错误。下次连接AnyConnect时将使用以前的值。"

msgid "Pausing..."
msgstr "暂停中..."

msgid "Authenticating..."
msgstr "正在验证..."

msgid "SSL"
msgstr "SSL协议"

msgid "IPsec"
msgstr "安全协议"

msgid "TLSv1.0"
msgstr "TLSv1.0"

msgid "TLSv1.1"
msgstr "TLSv1.1"

msgid "TLSv1.2"
msgstr "TLSv1.2"

msgid "DTLSv1.0"
msgstr "DTLSv1.0"

msgid "DTLSv1.2"
msgstr "DTLSv1.2"

msgid "IKEv2/IPsec"
msgstr "IKEv2 / IPsec"

msgid "IKEv2/IPsec NAT-T"
msgstr "IKEv2 / IPsec NAT-T"

msgid "Deflate"
msgstr "放气"

msgid "LZS"
msgstr "LZS"

msgid "None"
msgstr "没有"

msgid "DummyMessageToForceMessageCatSetup"
msgstr "DummyMessageToForceMessageCatSetup"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect - Banner"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect-横幅"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect Secure Mobility Client"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect安全移动客户端"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect Secure Mobility Client Version "
msgstr "思科AnyConnect安全移动客户端版本"

msgid "Installed Modules:"
msgstr "安装的模块："

msgid "No Modules Loaded"
msgstr "未加载模块"

msgid "End User License Agreement"
msgstr "终止用户许可协议"

msgid "Cisco Online Privacy Statement and the AnyConnect Supplement"
msgstr "思科在线隐私声明和AnyConnect补充资料"

msgid "Error Loading End User License Agreement."
msgstr "加载最终用户许可协议时出错。"

msgid "Copyright (c) 2004 - 2019 Cisco Systems, Inc.  All Rights Reserved."
msgstr "版权所有（c）2004-2019思科系统公司。保留所有权利。"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect - Certificate Selection"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect-证书选择"

msgid "Select the certificate for authentication."
msgstr "选择用于认证的证书。"

msgid "Connect to:"
msgstr "连接至："

msgid "_Get Certificate"
msgstr "_获取证书"

msgid "AnyConnect cannot verify the identity of "
msgstr "AnyConnect无法验证身份"

msgid "Open AnyConnect"
msgstr "打开AnyConnect"

msgid "Copy All"
msgstr "全部复制"

msgid "Copy Selected"
msgstr "复制所选"

msgid "Quit"
msgstr "退出"

msgid "_Disconnect"
msgstr "_断开"

msgid "_Connect"
msgstr "_连接"

msgid "Select"
msgstr "选择"

msgid "Please enter an IP Address or hostname and hit enter."
msgstr "请输入IP地址或主机名，然后按Enter。"

msgid "Connection"
msgstr "连接"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect Secure Mobility Client Statistics"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect安全移动客户端统计信息"

msgid "Virtual Private Network (VPN)"
msgstr "虚拟专用网（VPN）"

msgid "Network Access Manager"
msgstr "网络访问管理器"

msgid "Details..."
msgstr "细节..."

msgid "_Details..."
msgstr "_细节..."

msgid "Not Applicable"
msgstr "不适用"

msgid "Per-Process Logging Settings"
msgstr "每进程日志记录设置"

msgid "Size of each logfile (kB):"
msgstr "每个日志文件的大小（kB）："

msgid "Total number of logfiles:"
msgstr "日志文件总数："

msgid "Total disk usage (kB):"
msgstr "总磁盘使用量（kB）："

msgid "Enable performance timing of tasks"
msgstr "启用任务的性能计时"

msgid "Browse Logs"
msgstr "浏览日志"

msgid "0.0.0"
msgstr "0.0.0"

msgid "Help"
msgstr "救命"

msgid "Could not launch browser!"
msgstr "无法启动浏览器！"

msgid "_Accept"
msgstr "_接受"

msgid "State:"
msgstr "状态："

msgid "Management Connection State:"
msgstr "管理连接状态："

msgid "Duration:"
msgstr "持续时间："

msgid "0"
msgstr "0"

msgid "Session Disconnect:"
msgstr "会话断开连接："

msgid "<b>Connection Information</b>"
msgstr "<b>连接信息</ b>"

msgid "Sent:"
msgstr "发送："

msgid "Received:"
msgstr "收到："

msgid "<b>Bytes</b>"
msgstr "<b>字节</ b>"

msgid "<b>Frames</b>"
msgstr "<b>框架</ b>"

msgid "<b>Control Frames</b>"
msgstr "<b>控制框</ b>"

msgid "Client Management"
msgstr "客户管理"

msgid "Client (IPv4):"
msgstr "客户端（IPv4）："

msgid "Server:"
msgstr "服务器："

msgid "Client (IPv6):"
msgstr "客户端（IPv6）："

msgid "<b>Address Information</b>"
msgstr "<b>地址信息</ b>"

msgid "Cipher:"
msgstr "密码："

msgid "Compression:"
msgstr "压缩："

msgid "Proxy Address:"
msgstr "代理地址："

msgid "No Proxy"
msgstr "没有代理"

msgid "Protocol:"
msgstr "协议："

msgid "<b>Transport Information</b>"
msgstr "<b>运输信息</ b>"

msgid "<b>Feature Configuration</b>"
msgstr "<b>功能配置</ b>"

msgid "Status:"
msgstr "状态："

msgid "Secure Mobility Solution"
msgstr "安全移动解决方案"

msgid "Searching for a Network"
msgstr "搜索网络"

msgid "Associating"
msgstr "关联"

msgid "Acquiring IP Address"
msgstr "获取IP地址"

msgid "Authentication Failed"
msgstr "验证失败"

msgid "Limited or no connectivity"
msgstr "连接受限或无连接"

msgid "Countermeasures"
msgstr "应对措施"

msgid " "
msgstr " "

msgid "No adapters available."
msgstr "没有可用的适配器。"

msgid "Posture Assessment:"
msgstr "姿势评估："

msgid "Reset"
msgstr "重启"

msgid "_Reset"
msgstr "_重启"

msgid "Troubleshoot..."
msgstr "解决问题..."

msgid "Collect diagnostic information for all installed components."
msgstr "收集所有已安装组件的诊断信息。"

msgid "Troubleshooting requires the Cisco Diagnostic and Reporting Tool (DART).  Please contact your system administrator to have this component installed."
msgstr "故障排除需要思科诊断和报告工具（DART）。请与系统管理员联系以安装此组件。"

msgid "Failed to export stats to text file."
msgstr "无法将统计信息导出到文本文件。"

msgid "Export Stats..."
msgstr "导出统计信息..."

msgid "_Export..."
msgstr "_导出..."

msgid "File operation failed while writing statistics.  Export failed."
msgstr "写入统计信息时文件操作失败。导出失败。"

msgid "No statistics have been collected.  Export failed."
msgstr "尚未收集统计信息。导出失败。"

msgid "Statistics exported to your desktop in file: "
msgstr "统计信息以文件形式导出到您的桌面："

msgid "Non-Secured Routes (IPv4)"
msgstr "非安全路由（IPv4）"

msgid "<b>Non-Secured Routes</b>"
msgstr "<b>非安全路线</ b>"

msgid "Non-Secured Routes (IPv6)"
msgstr "非安全路由（IPv6）"

msgid "Secured Routes (IPv4)"
msgstr "安全路由（IPv4）"

msgid "<b>Secured Routes</b>"
msgstr "<b>安全路线</ b>"

msgid "Secured Routes (IPv6)"
msgstr "安全路由（IPv6）"

msgid "Route Details"
msgstr "路由信息"

msgid "Statistics Details"
msgstr "统计资料"

msgid "Destination"
msgstr "目的地"

msgid "Subnet Mask"
msgstr "子网掩码"

msgid "Firewall Details"
msgstr "防火墙详细信息"

msgid "Logging"
msgstr "记录中"

msgid "The VPN agent service is not responding.  Please restart this application after a minute."
msgstr "VPN代理服务没有响应。请在一分钟后重新启动此应用程序。"

msgid "Connection Log"
msgstr "连接记录"

msgid "Hide Connection Log"
msgstr "隐藏连接日志"

msgid "login information loaded"
msgstr "登录信息已加载"

msgid "Connected to"
msgstr "连接到"

msgid "Packets"
msgstr "包数"

msgid "Inbound"
msgstr "入站"

msgid "Outbound"
msgstr "出站"

msgid "Discarded"
msgstr "舍弃"

msgid "Bypassed"
msgstr "绕过"

msgid "Close"
msgstr "关"

msgid "Quit Cisco AnyConnect"
msgstr "退出思科AnyConnect"

msgid "Bring AnyConnect to Front"
msgstr "将AnyConnect带到前面"

msgid "Interface"
msgstr "接口"

msgid "Permission"
msgstr "允许"

msgid "Src Port"
msgstr "Src端口"

msgid "Dst Port"
msgstr "Dst端口"

msgid "Destination Address"
msgstr "目的地址"

msgid "IPv4 Firewall Rules"
msgstr "IPv4防火墙规则"

msgid "IPv6 Firewall Rules"
msgstr "IPv6防火墙规则"

msgid "Tunnel Mode (IPv4):"
msgstr "隧道模式（IPv4）："

msgid "Tunnel Mode (IPv6):"
msgstr "隧道模式（IPv6）："

msgid "Secure Gateway"
msgstr "安全网关"

msgid "VPN Connectivity"
msgstr "VPN连接"

msgid "Hide"
msgstr "隐藏"

msgid "options"
msgstr "选项"

msgid "value"
msgstr "值"

msgid "AnyConnect Preferences"
msgstr "AnyConnect首选项"

#. Doc: An unexpected error occurred while saving the user or global preferences file.
#. Reattempting to store preferences may solve the issue, otherwise the client
#. must be restarted.
msgid "Error saving preferences. Please retry, or restart AnyConnect."
msgstr "保存首选项时出错。请重试，或重新启动AnyConnect。"

msgid "About Cisco AnyConnect"
msgstr "关于Cisco AnyConnect"

msgid "Preferences..."
msgstr "优先..."

msgid "Generate Diagnostics Report"
msgstr "生成诊断报告"

msgid "Show AnyConnect Window"
msgstr "显示AnyConnect窗口"

msgid "Show Statistics Window"
msgstr "显示统计窗口"

msgid "Show Connection Notices"
msgstr "显示连接通知"

msgid "Show Status Menu"
msgstr "显示状态菜单"

msgid "Hide Cisco AnyConnect"
msgstr "隐藏思科AnyConnect"

msgid "Hide Others"
msgstr "隐藏其他"

msgid "Show All"
msgstr "显示所有"

msgid "Minimize"
msgstr "最小化"

msgid "Cut"
msgstr "切"

msgid "Copy"
msgstr "复制"

msgid "Paste"
msgstr "糊"

msgid "Delete"
msgstr "删除"

msgid "Select All"
msgstr "全选"

msgid "Show Statistics"
msgstr "显示统计"

msgid "Show Firewall Information"
msgstr "显示防火墙信息"

msgid "Firewall Information"
msgstr "防火墙信息"

msgid "Network"
msgstr "网络"

msgid "Networks"
msgstr "网路"

msgid "Configuration"
msgstr "组态"

msgid "Web Security"
msgstr "网络安全"

msgid "Firewall"
msgstr "防火墙功能"

msgid "Service disabled."
msgstr "服务已禁用。"

msgid "Wired"
msgstr "有线"

msgid "Mobile Broadband"
msgstr "手机宽带"

msgid "Username/Password"
msgstr "用户名/密码用户名密码"
"用户名/密码"
msgid "No Signal"
msgstr "没信号"

msgid "Very Low"
msgstr "非常低"

msgid "Low"
msgstr "低"

msgid "Good"
msgstr "好"

msgid "Very Good"
msgstr "很好"

msgid "Excellent"
msgstr "优秀"

msgid "Advanced..."
msgstr "高级..."

msgid "Advanced Window"
msgstr "进阶视窗"

msgid "Open (unsecured)"
msgstr "打开（无抵押）"

msgid "WEP"
msgstr "WEP"

msgid "Shared WEP"
msgstr "共享的WEP"

msgid "Dynamic WEP"
msgstr "动态WEP"

msgid "WPA Personal TKIP"
msgstr "WPA个人TKIP"

msgid "WPA Personal AES"
msgstr "WPA个人AES"

msgid "WPA Enterprise TKIP"
msgstr "WPA企业TKIP"

msgid "WPA Enterprise AES"
msgstr "WPA企业AES"

msgid "WPA2 Personal TKIP"
msgstr "WPA2个人TKIP"

msgid "WPA2 Personal AES"
msgstr "WPA2个人AES"

msgid "WPA2 Enterprise TKIP"
msgstr "WPA2企业TKIP"

msgid "WPA2 Enterprise AES"
msgstr "WPA2企业AES"

msgid "CCKM Enterprise TKIP"
msgstr "CCKM企业TKIP"

msgid "CCKM Enterprise AES"
msgstr "CCKM企业AES"

msgid "unsecured"
msgstr "无抵押"

msgid "802.1X"
msgstr "802.1X"

msgid "802.1X (MACsec)"
msgstr "802.1X（MACsec）"

msgid "Authenticated"
msgstr "已认证"

msgid "Secured"
msgstr "担保的"

msgid "TKIP"
msgstr "传统知识"

msgid "AES"
msgstr "AES"

msgid "GCM(Hardware)"
msgstr "GCM（硬件）"

msgid "GCM(Software)"
msgstr "GCM（软件）"

msgid "Encryption"
msgstr "加密"

msgid "No components loaded. Quitting application."
msgstr "未加载任何组件。退出应用程序。"

msgid "Please enter an address to connect to!"
msgstr "请输入连接地址！"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect failed to start. It is already running in another user's session."
msgstr "Cisco AnyConnect无法启动。它已经在另一个用户的会话中运行。"

msgid 
"Unable to validate Cisco AnyConnect Secure Mobility components. CA Root Certificate is missing.\n"
"\n"
"AnyConnect Secure Mobility Client must verify that all loaded components have been certified by Cisco. Your system does not have the latest root certificates from Verisign, which are required to validate the authenticity of the software. Please download VeriSign Class 3 Public Primary Certification Authority - G5 from http://www.verisign.com/support/roots.html or contact your administrator."
msgstr 
"无法验证Cisco AnyConnect安全移动组件。 CA根证书丢失。\n"
"\n"
"AnyConnect安全移动客户端必须验证所有加载的组件均已通过思科认证。您的系统没有来自Verisign的最新根证书，这些证书是验证软件真实性所必需的。请从http://www.verisign.com/support/roots.html下载VeriSign 3类公共一级证书颁发机构-G5或与管理员联系。"
msgid "Failed to load Help File."
msgstr "无法加载帮助文件。"

msgid "The request is denied by administrator policy."
msgstr "该请求被管理员策略拒绝。"

msgid "Invalid group."
msgstr "无效的群组。"

msgid "Invalid network."
msgstr "无效的网络。"

msgid "Request not permitted in auto-connect mode."
msgstr "在自动连接模式下不允许请求。"

msgid "Location service not available."
msgstr "定位服务不可用。"

msgid "Location error - additional info will be available in error string."
msgstr "位置错误-其他信息将在错误字符串中提供。"

msgid "Internal error."
msgstr "内部错误。"

msgid "Invalid XML."
msgstr "无效的XML。"

msgid "Unknown request/message."
msgstr "未知的请求/消息。"

msgid "Your profile changes were not allowed. You must use Cisco AnyConnect Client to make profile changes."
msgstr "不允许更改您的个人资料。您必须使用Cisco AnyConnect客户端进行配置文件更改。"

msgid "Network Access Manager has encountered a critical error and must shut down AnyConnect.  Please restart AnyConnect after a minute."
msgstr "Network Access Manager遇到严重错误，必须关闭AnyConnect。请在一分钟后重新启动AnyConnect。"

msgid "Your system administrator does not allow adding networks."
msgstr "您的系统管理员不允许添加网络。"

msgid "Disable Wireless"
msgstr "禁用无线"

msgid "Enable Wireless"
msgstr "启用无线"

msgid "Wi-Fi Not Allowed"
msgstr "不允许使用Wi-Fi"

msgid "Service unavailable."
msgstr "暂停服务。"

msgid "Disconnected...  Configuration file is missing or invalid. Contact your administrator."
msgstr "断开连接...配置文件丢失或无效。与您的管理员联系。"

msgid "Connect only to current network"
msgstr "仅连接到当前网络"

msgid "Automatically Selected"
msgstr "自动选择"

msgid "Exclusively Connected"
msgstr "独家连接"

msgid "Your system administrator does not allow connecting to non-corporate networks when corporate networks are in range."
msgstr "当公司网络处于范围内时，系统管理员不允许连接到非公司网络。"

msgid "Network Details"
msgstr "网络详细信息"

msgid "Manage Networks..."
msgstr "管理网络..."

msgid "Add Network..."
msgstr "添加网络..."

msgid "Click button to make changes."
msgstr "单击按钮进行更改。"

msgid "Network Options Menu"
msgstr "网络选项菜单"

msgid "User credentials entered."
msgstr "输入用户凭证。"

msgid "User credentials prompt cancelled."
msgstr "用户凭据提示已取消。"

msgid "User accepted banner."
msgstr "用户接受的横幅。"

msgid "User declined banner."
msgstr "用户拒绝横幅。"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect Login"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect登录"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect Browser"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect浏览器"

msgid "Untrusted Server Blocked!"
msgstr "不受信任的服务器被阻止！"

msgid "Security Warning: Untrusted Server Certificate!"
msgstr "安全警告：不可信的服务器证书！"

msgid "AnyConnect cannot verify server:"
msgstr "AnyConnect无法验证服务器："

msgid "Connecting to this server may result in a severe security compromise!"
msgstr "连接到该服务器可能会严重损害安全性！"

msgid "AnyConnect is configured to block untrusted servers by default.  Most users choose to keep this setting."
msgstr "默认情况下，AnyConnect配置为阻止不受信任的服务器。大多数用户选择保留此设置。"

msgid "Change the setting that blocks untrusted connections?"
msgstr "更改阻止不受信任的连接的设置？"

msgid "Changing this Preference may result in a severe security compromise!"
msgstr "更改此首选项可能会严重危害安全性！"

msgid "You must retry the connection after the setting is changed."
msgstr "更改设置后，您必须重试连接。"

msgid "Always trust this server and import the certificate"
msgstr "始终信任此服务器并导入证书"

msgid "If you choose Always Connect, the certificate will be imported and the connection will continue."
msgstr "如果选择“始终连接”，则将导入证书，并且连接将继续。"

msgid "Change Setting..."
msgstr "修改设置..."

msgid "Apply Change"
msgstr "套用变更"

msgid "Cancel Connection"
msgstr "取消连接"

msgid "Connect Anyway"
msgstr "仍然连接"

msgid "Certificate is not identified for this purpose."
msgstr "为此未标识证书。"

msgid "Certificate has been revoked."
msgstr "证书已被吊销。"

msgid "Certificate is malformed."
msgstr "证书格式错误。"

msgid "Certificate is not compliant with FIPS policy."
msgstr "证书不符合FIPS策略。"

msgid "VPN Connect"
msgstr "VPN连接"

msgid "VPN Connecting"
msgstr "VPN连接"

msgid "VPN Connected"
msgstr "VPN已连接"

msgid "VPN Paused"
msgstr "VPN已暂停"

msgid "VPN Pausing"
msgstr "VPN暂停"

msgid "VPN Disconnect"
msgstr "VPN断开"

msgid "VPN Disconnecting"
msgstr "VPN断开连接"

msgid "VPN Reconnecting"
msgstr "VPN重新连接"

msgid "Network Repair"
msgstr "网络维修"

msgid "Extended Logging"
msgstr "扩展记录"

msgid "Your password has expired. Press Ctrl+Alt+Del and select Change Password."
msgstr "您的密码已过期。按Ctrl + Alt + Del并选择更改密码。"

msgid "Network Group"
msgstr "网络组"

msgid 
"VPN Credentials required to connect.\n"
"Click to open AnyConnect."
msgstr 
"连接需要VPN凭据。\n"
"单击以打开AnyConnect。"
msgid "Add..."
msgstr "加..."

msgid "Edit..."
msgstr "编辑..."

msgid "Remove"
msgstr "去掉"

msgid "Active Group:"
msgstr "活动组："

msgid "Network Service"
msgstr "网络服务"

msgid "Group"
msgstr "组"

msgid "Saved Networks"
msgstr "保存的网络"

msgid "Name"
msgstr "名称"

msgid "SSID"
msgstr "SSID"

msgid "Security"
msgstr "安全"

msgid "Type"
msgstr "类型"

msgid "Privileges"
msgstr "礼遇"

msgid "Administrator Network"
msgstr "管理员网络"

msgid "User Network"
msgstr "用户网络"

msgid "Connect Exclusively"
msgstr "独家连接"

msgid "Network Access Manager is disabled."
msgstr "网络访问管理器已禁用。"

msgid "Enable"
msgstr "启用"

msgid "Move network up"
msgstr "向上移动网络"

msgid "Move network down"
msgstr "向下移动网络"

msgid "No Wi-Fi adapters available"
msgstr "没有可用的Wi-Fi适配器"

msgid "Wi-Fi hardware switch is off"
msgstr "Wi-Fi硬件开关已关闭"

msgid "Wi-Fi disabled"
msgstr "无线网络已禁用"

msgid "No Wi-Fi networks configured"
msgstr "未配置Wi-Fi网络"

msgid "Mobile hardware switch is off"
msgstr "移动硬件开关关闭"

msgid "Mobile Broadband Network"
msgstr "移动宽带网"

msgid "APN:"
msgstr "APN："

msgid "Wireless communications disabled."
msgstr "无线通讯已禁用。"

msgid "Hardware Switch Off"
msgstr "硬件关闭"

msgid "Hidden Network"
msgstr "隐藏的网络"

msgid "Show Key"
msgstr "显示密钥"

msgid "Descriptive Name:"
msgstr "描述性名称："

msgid "802.1X Configuration"
msgstr "802.1X配置"

msgid "MACsec Ciphers"
msgstr "MACsec密码"

msgid "Key:"
msgstr "键："

msgid "Enter information for the connection."
msgstr "输入连接信息。"

msgid "Wireless"
msgstr "无线"

msgid "Media:"
msgstr "媒体："

msgid "No EAP credential types are allowed by the administrator."
msgstr "管理员不允许使用EAP凭据类型。"

msgid "password"
msgstr "密码"

msgid "certificate"
msgstr "证书"

msgid "token"
msgstr "代币"

msgid "Please re-enter your key.  It is the wrong length."
msgstr "请重新输入您的密钥。长度错误。"

msgid "Please re-enter your key.  Hex key is invalid."
msgstr "请重新输入您的密钥。十六进制键无效。"

msgid "Key cannot be blank."
msgstr "密钥不能为空。"

msgid 
"You cannot connect to this network. \n"
"All applicable security methods for this network have been disabled by your administrator."
msgstr 
"您无法连接到该网络。 \n"
"您的管理员已禁用了该网络的所有适用安全方法。"
msgid "Descriptive name cannot be blank."
msgstr "描述性名称不能为空。"

msgid "Descriptive name already exists."
msgstr "描述性名称已存在。"

msgid "SSID cannot be blank."
msgstr "SSID不能为空。"

msgid "Unable to launch the connection script."
msgstr "无法启动连接脚本。"

msgid "Script or executable file doesn't exist."
msgstr "脚本或可执行文件不存在。"

msgid "File extension must be .exe, .bat or .cmd."
msgstr "文件扩展名必须是.exe，.bat或.cmd。"

msgid "Run this script on connection (optional):"
msgstr "在连接上运行此脚本（可选）："

msgid "Please enter your username and password for the network:"
msgstr "请输入您的网络用户名和密码:请输入您的网络用户名和密码："
"请输入您的网络用户名和密码："
msgid "Please enter your username for the network:"
msgstr "请输入您的网络用户名："

msgid "Please enter your password for the network:"
msgstr "请输入您的网络密码："

msgid "Please change your password for the network:"
msgstr "请更改您的网络密码："

msgid "Password was incorrect for the network:"
msgstr "网络密码不正确："

msgid "Username is empty."
msgstr "用户名是空的。"

msgid "Password is empty."
msgstr "密码为空。"

msgid "Passwords do not match. Please re-enter."
msgstr "密码不匹配。请重新输入。"

msgid "Old Password:"
msgstr "旧密码："

msgid "Show Password"
msgstr "显示密码"

msgid "Response:"
msgstr "响应："

msgid "Response was incorrect for the network:"
msgstr "对于网络的响应不正确："

msgid "Response is empty."
msgstr "响应为空。"

msgid "Show Response"
msgstr "显示回应"

msgid "You must select a network first."
msgstr "您必须先选择一个网络。"

msgid "None of your previously configured networks are available in this area."
msgstr "您先前配置的网络在该区域均不可用。"

msgid "Would you like to connect to one of these networks?"
msgstr "您想连接到这些网络之一吗？"

msgid "Choose certificate for the connection"
msgstr "选择连接证书"

msgid "Issued To:"
msgstr "发给："

msgid "Issued By:"
msgstr "由...发出："

msgid "Serial Number:"
msgstr "序列号："

msgid "Smart Card Name:"
msgstr "智能卡名称："

msgid "Smart Card PIN:"
msgstr "智能卡PIN："

msgid "Please enter your smart card PIN for:"
msgstr "请输入您的智能卡PIN："

msgid "Trust"
msgstr "信任"

msgid "Do Not Trust"
msgstr "不要相信"

msgid "The server certificate for the network"
msgstr "网络的服务器证书"

msgid "has failed validation. Do you want to trust it?"
msgstr "验证失败。你想相信吗？"

msgid "Certificate Name:"
msgstr "证书名称："

msgid "Adapter:"
msgstr "适配器："

msgid "Local MAC Address:"
msgstr "本地MAC地址："

msgid "Remote MAC Address:"
msgstr "远端MAC地址："

msgid "IP Address:"
msgstr "IP地址："

msgid "Speed (Mbps):"
msgstr "速度（Mbps）："

msgid "EAP Method:"
msgstr "EAP方法："

msgid "Credential Type:"
msgstr "凭证类型："

msgid "Signal Strength:"
msgstr "信号强度："

msgid "Channel:"
msgstr "渠道："

msgid "Security Information"
msgstr "安全资讯"

msgid "Broadband Wireless Interface"
msgstr "宽带无线接口"

msgid "Wi-Fi Information"
msgstr "Wi-Fi资讯"

msgid "AP Name:"
msgstr "AP名称："

msgid "AP IP Address:"
msgstr "AP IP地址："

msgid "Encryption:"
msgstr "加密："

msgid "Configuration:"
msgstr "组态："

msgid "Name:"
msgstr "名称："

msgid "Service Provider:"
msgstr "服务提供者："

msgid "Network Type:"
msgstr "网络类型："

msgid "Mobile Number:"
msgstr "手机号码："

msgid "Pin Security:"
msgstr "密码安全性："

msgid "IP Addresses"
msgstr "IP地址"

msgid "Connection Details"
msgstr "连接细节"

msgid "Autoconfiguration Address"
msgstr "自动配置地址"

msgid "Address"
msgstr "地址"

msgid "Temporary Address"
msgstr "临时地址"

msgid "Link-local Address"
msgstr "链接本地地址"

msgid "Default Gateway"
msgstr "默认网关"

msgid "Password change succeeded."
msgstr "密码更改成功。"

msgid "Password change failed."
msgstr "密码更改失败。"

msgid "Password change authentication channel setup failed."
msgstr "密码更改身份验证通道设置失败。"

msgid "Password change has not been requested from the server."
msgstr "尚未从服务器请求更改密码。"

msgid "Incorrect smart card PIN."
msgstr "智能卡PIN码不正确。"

msgid "Smart card blocked."
msgstr "智能卡被阻止。"

msgid "No valid certificates available. Please insert a smart card."
msgstr "没有有效的证书。请插入智能卡。"

msgid "No valid certificates available. Please install a valid certificate."
msgstr "没有有效的证书。请安装有效的证书。"

msgid "No valid certificates available. Please insert a smart card or install a valid certificate."
msgstr "没有有效的证书。请插入智能卡或安装有效证书。"

msgid "Message History"
msgstr "信息记录"

msgid "Clear"
msgstr "清除"

msgid "Client IP:"
msgstr "客户端IP："

msgid "Valid"
msgstr "有效"

msgid "Not Defined"
msgstr "没有定义的"

msgid "No License Key."
msgstr "没有许可证密钥。"

msgid "Invalid License Key."
msgstr "无效的许可证密钥。"

msgid "Waiting to contact the Web Security server."
msgstr "等待联系网络安全服务器。"

msgid "WebSecurityCert.cfg file missing or invalid."
msgstr "WebSecurityCert.cfg文件丢失或无效。"

msgid "Cisco System Extension blocked."
msgstr "思科系统扩展被阻止。"

msgid "Invalid"
msgstr "无效"

msgid "License Key Error"
msgstr "许可证密钥错误"

msgid "Agent Error."
msgstr "座席错误。"

msgid "Configuration updated."
msgstr "配置已更新。"

msgid "Current Proxy:"
msgstr "当前代理："

msgid "Current Scanning Proxy:"
msgstr "当前扫描代理："

msgid "Proxies ordered by response time"
msgstr "按响应时间排序的代理"

msgid "Proxy selection updating.  This may take a few minutes..."
msgstr "代理选择更新。这可能需要几分钟的时间..."

msgid "You must select a proxy first."
msgstr "您必须先选择一个代理。"

msgid "Automatic Scanning Proxy Selection"
msgstr "自动扫描代理选择"

msgid "Order Proxies by Response Time"
msgstr "按响应时间订购代理"

msgid "Last Proxy Switch:"
msgstr "最后的代理交换机："

msgid "Filtered:"
msgstr "已过滤："

msgid "Bypassed (host or proxy):"
msgstr "绕过（主机或代理）："

msgid "Selection Mode:"
msgstr "选择方式："

msgid "Active Connections"
msgstr "活动连接"

msgid "Scanning Proxy Information"
msgstr "扫描代理信息"

msgid "Total Connections"
msgstr "总连接数"

msgid "License Key:"
msgstr "注册码："

msgid "Enabled Since:"
msgstr "已启用，因为："

msgid "Service Information"
msgstr "服务资讯"

msgid "On Trusted Network:"
msgstr "在受信任的网络上："

msgid "Settings change failed."
msgstr "设置更改失败。"

msgid "Proxy selection failed."
msgstr "代理选择失败。"

msgid "Proxy Selection"
msgstr "代理选择"

msgid "Scanning Proxies:"
msgstr "扫描代理："

msgid "Ordered by response time"
msgstr "按响应时间排序"

msgid "Displayed in default order"
msgstr "以默认顺序显示"

msgid "Customer Experience Feedback"
msgstr "客户体验反馈"

msgid "Customer Experience Feedback with crash dump collection"
msgstr "崩溃转储收集的客户体验反馈"

msgid "Network selection needed."
msgstr "需要选择网络。"

msgid "Network credentials needed."
msgstr "需要网络凭证。"

msgid "VPN credentials needed."
msgstr "需要VPN凭证。"

msgid "VPN Security Warning"
msgstr "VPN安全警告"

msgid "Administrator Message"
msgstr "管理员留言"

msgid "Click to respond."
msgstr "单击以回复。"

msgid "System Scan"
msgstr "系统扫描"

msgid "Ready"
msgstr "准备"

msgid "Network Access Control"
msgstr "网络访问控制"

msgid "Updates are needed on your computer before you can join the network."
msgstr "您必须先在计算机上进行更新，然后才能加入网络。"

msgid "Action Required to Enable Access"
msgstr "启用访问权限所需的操作"

msgid "Updates are needed on your device before you can join the network."
msgstr "您需要先在设备上进行更新，然后才能加入网络。"

msgid "You should fix this problem to continue with full access to the network.  After the problem is fixed, use the Continue button below to further check the security of the device."
msgstr "您应解决此问题，以继续完全访问网络。解决问题后，请使用下面的“继续”按钮进一步检查设备的安全性。"

msgid "Time Allowed:"
msgstr "时间允许："

msgid "Time Remaining:"
msgstr "剩余时间："

msgid "Less than 5 minutes left to make updates!"
msgstr "不到5分钟即可进行更新！"

msgid "System Scan Progress"
msgstr "系统扫描进度"

msgid "Requirements"
msgstr "要求"

msgid "Optional Updates"
msgstr "可选更新"

msgid "Requirement"
msgstr "需求"

msgid "Update Details"
msgstr "更新详情"

msgid "Update(s) Required"
msgstr "需要更新"

msgid "Required update(s) are complete."
msgstr "所需的更新已完成。"

msgid "More Details"
msgstr "更多细节"

msgid "Scan Again"
msgstr "重新扫描"

msgid "Perform selected updates."
msgstr "执行选定的更新。"

msgid "Start"
msgstr "开始"

msgid "Launch Browser"
msgstr "启动浏览器"

msgid "Skip"
msgstr "跳跃"

msgid "Skip All"
msgstr "全部跳过"

msgid "Updates"
msgstr "更新"

msgid "Pending"
msgstr "待定"

msgid "Click Start to begin"
msgstr "单击开始开始"

msgid "Working"
msgstr "工作中"

msgid "Initializing."
msgstr "正在初始化。"

msgid "Please wait..."
msgstr "请耐心等待..."

msgid "Service is unavailable."
msgstr "服务不可用。"

msgid "Contact your system administrator."
msgstr "请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "Waiting to establish a connection"
msgstr "等待建立连接"

msgid "Skipped"
msgstr "跳过"

msgid "The save operation has completed successfully."
msgstr "保存操作已成功完成。"

msgid "To open the folder location, click"
msgstr "要打开文件夹位置，请单击"

msgid "Clicking Cancel may change your network connectivity and interrupt download or required updates.  Are you sure you want to cancel the current operation?"
msgstr "单击取消可能会更改您的网络连接并中断下载或所需的更新。您确定要取消当前操作吗？"

msgid "On clicking cancel, this temporal agent will be removed from the system and if your system is not compliant, network access could be impacted."
msgstr "单击“取消”后，该临时代理将从系统中删除，如果您的系统不兼容，则可能会影响网络访问。"

msgid "Compliance Information"
msgstr "合规信息"

msgid "Current Status:"
msgstr "当前状态："

msgid "Last System Check:"
msgstr "上次系统检查："

msgid "Missing Requirements:"
msgstr "缺少要求："

msgid "Remaining Optional Updates:"
msgstr "其余可选更新："

msgid "Compliance Module Version:"
msgstr "合规模块版本："

msgid "Policy Server:"
msgstr "策略服务器："

msgid "Latest Scan Start Time:"
msgstr "最新扫描开始时间："

msgid "Compliant"
msgstr "合规"

msgid "Not Compliant"
msgstr "不合规"

msgid "In Progress"
msgstr "进行中"

msgid "Compliance Unknown"
msgstr "合规性未知"

msgid "Security Products"
msgstr "安全产品"

msgid "Product Name"
msgstr "产品名称"

msgid "Product Type"
msgstr "产品类别"

msgid "Product Vendor"
msgstr "产品供应商"

msgid "Product Version"
msgstr "产品版本"

msgid "Definition Version"
msgstr "定义版本"

msgid "Definition Date"
msgstr "定义日期"

msgid "Scan Summary"
msgstr "扫描摘要"

msgid "Update"
msgstr "更新资料"

msgid "Acceptable Use Policy"
msgstr "可接受的使用政策"

msgid "Access to the network requires that you view and accept the following Acceptable Use Policy."
msgstr "访问网络要求您查看并接受以下可接受的使用策略。"

msgid "Declining the Acceptable Use Policy could result in limited network access."
msgstr "拒绝接受使用策略可能会导致网络访问受到限制。"

msgid "Accepted"
msgstr "公认"

msgid "Declined"
msgstr "拒绝"

msgid "Awaiting user input..."
msgstr "等待用户输入..."

msgid "Requires your attention."
msgstr "需要您的注意。"

msgid "In Grace Period."
msgstr "在宽限期。"

msgid "Re-scan"
msgstr "重新扫描"

msgid "Collect Diagnostics"
msgstr "收集诊断"

msgid "Cisco Temporal Agent"
msgstr "思科临时代理"

msgid "Less than a minute"
msgstr "不到一分钟"

msgid "Ok"
msgstr "好"

msgid "AMP Enabler"
msgstr "AMP启动器"

msgid "Waiting for configuration..."
msgstr "正在等待配置..."

msgid "Downloading AMP for Endpoints..."
msgstr "正在下载AMP for Endpoints ..."

msgid "Downloaded AMP for Endpoints."
msgstr "下载了AMP for Endpoints。"

msgid "Downloading AMP for Endpoints failed."
msgstr "下载AMP for Endpoints失败。"

msgid "Waiting for connectivity to server..."
msgstr "正在等待与服务器的连接..."

msgid "Installing AMP for Endpoints..."
msgstr "安装AMP for Endpoints ..."

msgid "AMP for Endpoints installed."
msgstr "已安装AMP for Endpoints。"

msgid "AMP for Endpoints already installed."
msgstr "AMP for Endpoints已安装。"

msgid "Installation of AMP for Endpoints failed."
msgstr "AMP for Endpoints安装失败。"

msgid "Reboot required to proceed with installation."
msgstr "需要重新启动才能继续安装。"

msgid "Reboot required to complete AMP for Endpoints upgrade."
msgstr "需要重新启动才能完成AMP for Endpoints升级。"

msgid "Uninstalling AMP for Endpoints..."
msgstr "卸载AMP for Endpoints ..."

msgid "AMP for Endpoints uninstalled."
msgstr "AMP for Endpoints已卸载。"

msgid "Uninstalling AMP for Endpoints failed."
msgstr "卸载AMP for Endpoints失败。"

msgid "Waiting..."
msgstr "等候..."

msgid "Roaming Security"
msgstr "漫游安全"

msgid "Checking connection state."
msgstr "检查连接状态。"

msgid "Please wait as this may take up to 30 seconds."
msgstr "请等待，因为这可能最多需要30秒。"

msgid "Service Unavailable."
msgstr "暂停服务。"

msgid "You are protected by Umbrella."
msgstr "您受到伞的保护。"

msgid "You are protected by an Umbrella virtual appliance."
msgstr "您受到Umbrella虚拟设备的保护。"

msgid "You are not currently protected by Umbrella."
msgstr "您目前不受伞保护。"

msgid "You are on a network protected by Umbrella."
msgstr "您位于受伞保护的网络上。"

msgid "DNS queries are encrypted."
msgstr "DNS查询已加密。"

msgid "DNS queries are not encrypted."
msgstr "DNS查询未加密。"

msgid "Protected"
msgstr "受保护的"

msgid "Unprotected"
msgstr "未受保护"

msgid "Encrypted"
msgstr "加密的"

msgid "Unencrypted"
msgstr "未加密"

msgid "Protected by network"
msgstr "受网络保护"

msgid "Protected by VA"
msgstr "受VA保护"

msgid "and"
msgstr "和"

msgid "Disabled while you are on a trusted network."
msgstr "在受信任的网络上时被禁用。"

msgid "Disabled while your VPN is active."
msgstr "VPN处于活动状态时已禁用。"

msgid "Profile is missing."
msgstr "个人资料丢失。"

msgid "Microsoft .NET Framework 4.0 is not installed."
msgstr "未安装Microsoft .NET Framework 4.0。"

msgid "DNS/IP Security Information"
msgstr "DNS / IP安全信息"

msgid "Client Name:"
msgstr "客户端名称："

msgid "User Name:"
msgstr "用户名："

msgid "DNS Protection Status:"
msgstr "DNS保护状态："

msgid "IPv4 Enforcement Status:"
msgstr "IPv4强制执行状态："

msgid "Last Connected:"
msgstr "上次连接："

msgid "Today"
msgstr "今天"

msgid "IPv6 Enforcement Status:"
msgstr "IPv6实施状态："

msgid "(connection issue)"
msgstr "（连接问题）"

msgid "Setup in progress"
msgstr "设定进行中"

msgid "Partially protected"
msgstr "部分保护"

msgid "DNS Encryption:"
msgstr "DNS加密："

msgid "Logging:"
msgstr "正在记录："

msgid "DNS Security IPv4"
msgstr "DNS安全IPv4"

msgid "DNS Security IPv6"
msgstr "DNS安全IPv6"

msgid "TCP Requests:"
msgstr "TCP请求："

msgid "TCP Responses:"
msgstr "TCP响应："

msgid "UDP Requests:"
msgstr "UDP请求："

msgid "UDP Responses:"
msgstr "UDP响应："

msgid "Web Protection Status:"
msgstr "Web保护状态："

msgid "Unlicensed"
msgstr "无牌"

msgid "Configuration Error"
msgstr "配置错误"

msgid "Cloud Service Unavailable"
msgstr "云服务不可用"

msgid "You are not currently protected by Web Security."
msgstr "您目前不受网络安全保护。"

msgid "You are protected by Web Security."
msgstr "您受网络安全保护。"

msgid "A configuration issue has occured."
msgstr "发生配置问题。"

msgid "The Web Security Service is unavailable."
msgstr "Web安全服务不可用。"

msgid "Web Security Information:"
msgstr "网络安全信息："

msgid "HTTP Requests:"
msgstr "HTTP请求："

msgid "HTTPS Requests:"
msgstr "HTTPS请求："

msgid "Bypassed Requests:"
msgstr "绕过的请求："

msgid "Umbrella Proxy:"
msgstr "雨伞代理："

msgid "The browser cannot be launched since you are connected to an untrusted server. Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "由于您已连接到不受信任的服务器，因此无法启动浏览器。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "Certificate is explicitly distrusted."
msgstr "证书被明确不信任。"

msgid "Certificate pin verification failed."
msgstr "证书图钉验证失败。"

msgid "Certificate cannot be verified, unable to retrieve revocation information for certificate."
msgstr "无法验证证书，无法检索证书的吊销信息。"

msgid "Certificate cannot be verified, OCSP service is unavailable."
msgstr "证书无法验证，OCSP服务不可用。"

msgid "Certificate cannot be verified, invalid OCSP request."
msgstr "无法验证证书，无效的OCSP请求。"

msgid "Certificate cannot be verified, source responder is invalid."
msgstr "证书无法验证，源响应者无效。"

msgid "Certificate cannot be verified, signer or issuer CA not found."
msgstr "无法验证证书，找不到签名者或发行者CA。"

msgid "Certificate cannot be verified, OCSP response was untrusted."
msgstr "无法验证证书，OCSP响应不受信任。"

msgid "Certificate cannot be verified, currently OCSP client cannot validate the certificate for revocation."
msgstr "无法验证证书，当前OCSP客户端无法验证证书以进行吊销。"

msgid "FIPS is not currently supported on this platform."
msgstr "该平台当前不支持FIPS。"

#. Doc: The AnyConnect client was unable access the registry keys needed
#. to verify FIPS complaince of the end-point system.
msgid "Unable to verify the necessary registry keys for FIPS."
msgstr "无法验证FIPS所需的注册表项。"

#. Doc: As part of the AnyConnect FIPS verification process, the Windows operating system's FIPS registry key
#. is checked to ensure that the system is in a FIPS compliant mode. This error is seen because the registry
#. key value to enable FIPS is not set.
msgid "FIPS compliant algorithms for encryption, hashing, and signing have not been enabled on this system."
msgstr "在该系统上尚未启用用于加密，哈希和签名的FIPS兼容算法。"

#. Doc: AnyConnect has failed to configure OpenSSL into FIPS mode. This error can occur if the OpenSSL
#. shared libraries that are installed with AnyConnect has been tampered with or have become corrupt.
#. Reinstalling AnyConnect can fix this issue.
msgid "The FIPS verification of the OpenSSL libraries have failed. Reinstalling AnyConnect might fix this issue."
msgstr "OpenSSL库的FIPS验证失败。重新安装AnyConnect可能会解决此问题。"

#. Doc: An unexpected error occurred during the AnyConnect FIPS verification process.
#. This is most likely due to a flaw in the client software.
msgid "Failed to verify FIPS mode."
msgstr "无法验证FIPS模式。"

#, c-format
msgid "Downloading %1$s - %2$s"
msgstr "正在下载%1$s - %2$s"

msgid "Checking for profile updates..."
msgstr "正在检查个人资料更新..."

msgid "Checking for product updates..."
msgstr "正在检查产品更新..."

msgid "Checking for customization updates..."
msgstr "正在检查自定义更新..."

msgid "Performing any required updates..."
msgstr "执行任何必需的更新..."

msgid "Could not find menu bar."
msgstr "找不到菜单栏。"

msgid "Could not get menu handle."
msgstr "无法获得菜单句柄。"

msgid "Could not get menu item check state."
msgstr "无法获得菜单项检查状态。"

msgid "Could not delete startup link."
msgstr "无法删除启动链接。"

msgid "Error creating startup link."
msgstr "创建启动链接时出错。"

msgid "An error occurred while changing startup behavior: "
msgstr "更改启动行为时发生错误："

msgid "Please enter your username and password."
msgstr "请输入您的用户名和密码。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The VPN connection could not be established. The most likely cause of
#. this error is invalid credentials.
msgid "Login failed."
msgstr "登录失败。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. A password change is required to log in.  This is most likely due to an
#. expired password.
msgid "Password change required."
msgstr "需要更改密码。"

msgid "Server certificate details:"
msgstr "服务器证书详细信息："

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. This error was encountered on the secure gateway. The exact cause of
#. this error is not known. Contact your administrator.
msgid "Unknown error."
msgstr "未知错误。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. This error message may contain any error string.
#, c-format
msgid "%s"
msgstr "%s"

msgid "Cannot find system PIN!"
msgstr "找不到系统PIN！"

msgid "New PIN not entered."
msgstr "未输入新的PIN码。"

msgid "Verify PIN not entered."
msgstr "确认未输入PIN。"

msgid "New PIN and Verify PIN do not match."
msgstr "新PIN码和验证PIN码不匹配。"

msgid "No state for new PIN required."
msgstr "不需要新PIN的状态。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. In order to log into the secure gateway, cookies must be enabled. This
#. message is seen when the secure gateway detects that it is unable to
#. correctly set a cookie.
msgid "Cookies must be enabled to log in."
msgstr "必须启用Cookies才能登录。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. A dynamic access policy has been enforced which prevents login to the VPN.
#, c-format
msgid "Login denied.  %s"
msgstr "登录被拒绝。 %s"

msgid "Login denied.  Your environment does not meet the access criteria defined by your administrator."
msgstr "登录被拒绝。您的环境不符合管理员定义的访问条件。"

msgid "Unable to perform DNS resolution."
msgstr "无法执行DNS解析。"

msgid "Unable to create session directory."
msgstr "无法创建会话目录。"

msgid "User not authorized for AnyConnect Client access, contact your administrator."
msgstr "无权访问AnyConnect客户端的用户，请与管理员联系。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. A login was attempted but no CSD data was sent for the connection.
#. There may have been an error installing or running CSD.
msgid "Unable to complete connection: Cisco Secure Desktop not installed on the client"
msgstr "无法完成连接：客户端上未安装Cisco Secure Desktop"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The secure gateway encountered an error when attempting to add the VPN
#. connection to the session database.
msgid "Unable to update the session management database."
msgstr "无法更新会话管理数据库。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The secure gateway detected an error during login.
msgid "Login error."
msgstr "登录错误。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. A login code was encountered that the secure gateway cannot process.
msgid "Unknown login status."
msgstr "未知的登录状态。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. There was an error communicating with the authentication server.
msgid "Unable to send authentication message."
msgstr "无法发送身份验证消息。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. There was an error communicating with the authorization server.
msgid "Unable to send authorization message."
msgstr "无法发送授权消息。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The secure gateway is being restarted.
msgid "Server reboot pending, new logins disabled. Try again later."
msgstr "服务器等待重启，新的登录被禁用。稍后再试。"

msgid "Login attempted outside authorized hours."
msgstr "在授权时间以外尝试登录。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The user's account has been disabled and cannot be used to access the VPN.
msgid "Your account is disabled."
msgstr "您的帐户已被禁用。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The user's account does not have permission to access the network remotely.
msgid "You have no dial-in permission."
msgstr "您没有拨入权限。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The VPN connection could not be established. The most likely cause of
#. this error is invalid credentials.
msgid "Authentication failed."
msgstr "验证失败。"

msgid "Cannot complete password change because the password does not meet the password policy requirements.  Check the minimum password length, password complexity, and password history requirements."
msgstr "由于密码不符合密码策略要求，因此无法完成密码更改。检查最小密码长度，密码复杂性和密码历史记录要求。"

msgid "Password expired."
msgstr "密码已过期。"

msgid "Password expiring."
msgstr "密码即将过期。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. A password change is required to log in. This is most likely due to an
#. expired password. Unfortunately the user does not have permission to change
#. his/her own password. An administrator will need to reset the password.
msgid "New Password Required but user not allowed to change."
msgstr "需要新密码，但不允许用户更改。"

msgid "Password change required, but password management not enabled."
msgstr "需要更改密码，但未启用密码管理。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The user's account has expired and cannot be used to access the VPN.
msgid "Account expired."
msgstr "帐户已过期。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The authentication server returned an unrecognized challenge code.
msgid "Unknown challenge."
msgstr "未知的挑战。"

msgid "PIN type not selected."
msgstr "未选择PIN类型。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The length of the pin entered exceeds the maximum length allowed.
msgid "New PIN way too big."
msgstr "新PIN码太大。"

#, c-format
msgid "PIN length must be from %s through %s."
msgstr "PIN码长度必须在%s到%s之间。"

msgid "PIN must consist of alphanumeric characters only."
msgstr "PIN码只能包含字母数字字符。"

msgid "PIN must consist of numeric digits only."
msgstr "PIN码只能包含数字。"

msgid "Unable to generate new PIN."
msgstr "无法生成新的PIN码。"

msgid "Missing system generated PIN."
msgstr "缺少系统生成的PIN。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The authentication ticket was removed before the user responded. Try
#. logging on again.
msgid "Session terminated."
msgstr "会话已终止。"

msgid "Missing username."
msgstr "用户名丢失。"

msgid "New password not entered."
msgstr "未输入新密码。"

msgid "Verify password not entered."
msgstr "确认未输入密码。"

msgid "New password and Verify password do not match."
msgstr "新密码和验证密码不匹配。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The length of the password entered exceeds the maximum length allowed.
msgid "New password way too big."
msgstr "新密码的方式太大。"

msgid "New password not entered, password expiring."
msgstr "未输入新密码，密码即将到期。"

msgid "Verify password not entered, password expiring."
msgstr "验证密码未输入，密码到期。"

msgid "New password and Verify password do not match, password expiring."
msgstr "新密码和验证密码不匹配，密码即将过期。"

msgid "New password way too big, password expiring."
msgstr "新密码太大，密码即将过期。"

msgid "Enter new PIN with the next card code to complete authentication."
msgstr "输入新的PIN码和下一个卡号以完成身份验证。"

msgid "Enter the next card code to complete authentication."
msgstr "输入下一个卡代码以完成身份验证。"

#, c-format
msgid "You must enter a new alphanumeric PIN from %s to %s characters to continue."
msgstr "您必须从%s到%s个字符输入新的字母数字PIN才能继续。"

#, c-format
msgid "You must enter a new numeric PIN from %s to %s digits to continue."
msgstr "您必须输入%s到%s位之间的新数字PIN才能继续。"

msgid "You must enter a new PIN to continue."
msgstr "您必须输入新的PIN才能继续。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. This message indicates that the server has generated a new PIN for use
#. with SDI authentication token.
#, c-format
msgid "A new PIN has been generated for you: %s."
msgstr "为您生成了一个新的PIN：%s。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password error, you must enter a new password with minimum length of %s to continue."
msgstr "密码错误，您必须输入最小长度为%s的新密码才能继续。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password expired, you must enter a new password with minimum length of %s to continue."
msgstr "密码已过期，您必须输入最小长度为%s的新密码才能继续。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password expiring, you must enter a new password with minimum length of %s to continue."
msgstr "密码即将过期，您必须输入新密码，密码长度不得超过%s才能继续。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password change required, you must enter a new password with minimum length of %s to continue."
msgstr "需要更改密码，您必须输入最小长度为%s的新密码才能继续。"

msgid "Password expired, you must enter a new password to continue."
msgstr "密码已过期，您必须输入新密码才能继续。"

msgid "Password expiring, you must enter a new password to continue."
msgstr "密码即将过期，您必须输入新密码才能继续。"

msgid "Password change required, you must enter a new password to continue."
msgstr "需要更改密码，您必须输入新密码才能继续。"

msgid "Password error, you must enter a new password to continue."
msgstr "密码错误，您必须输入新密码才能继续。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password expires in %s day(s). If you wish to change it now, enter a new password with a minimum length of %s characters."
msgstr "密码将于%s天后过期。如果您想立即更改它，请输入一个新密码，该密码的最小长度为%s个字符。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password expired in %s day(s), if you wish to change now enter a new password with minimum length of %s."
msgstr "密码已在%s天后过期，如果您想更改，请输入一个新密码，密码的最小长度为%s。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password expiring in %s day(s), if you wish to change now enter a new password with minimum length of %s."
msgstr "密码将于%s天后过期，如果您想更改，请立即输入一个新密码，密码的最小长度为%s。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password change required in %s day(s), if you wish to change now enter a new password with minimum length of %s."
msgstr "必须在%s天之内更改密码，如果您想更改，请输入一个最小长度为%s的新密码。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password error in %s day(s), if you wish to change now enter a new password with minimum length of %s."
msgstr "如果您想更改%s天的密码错误，请立即输入一个最小长度为%s的新密码。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password expired, if you wish to change now enter a new password with minimum length of %s."
msgstr "密码已过期，如果您想更改密码，请输入新密码，密码的最小长度为%s。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password expiring, if you wish to change now enter a new password with minimum length of %s."
msgstr "密码即将到期，如果您想更改，请输入一个新密码，密码的最小长度为%s。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password change required, if you wish to change now enter a new password with minimum length of %s."
msgstr "需要更改密码，如果您现在想更改，请输入新密码，密码的最小长度为%s。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password error, if you wish to change now enter a new password with minimum length of %s."
msgstr "密码错误，如果您想更改，请输入一个最小长度为%s的新密码。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password expired in %s day(s), if you wish to change now enter a new password."
msgstr "密码已在%s天后过期，如果您想更改，请输入新密码。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password expiring in %s day(s), if you wish to change now enter a new password."
msgstr "密码将于%s天后过期，如果您想更改，请立即输入新密码。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password change required in %s day(s), if you wish to change now enter a new password."
msgstr "必须在%s天之内更改密码，如果您希望现在更改，请输入一个新密码。"

#, c-format
msgid "Password error in %s day(s), if you wish to change now enter a new password."
msgstr "如果您想更改密码，请在%s天之内输入新密码。"

msgid "Password expired, if you wish to change now enter a new password."
msgstr "密码已过期，如果您想更改，请输入新密码。"

msgid "Password expiring, if you wish to change now enter a new password."
msgstr "密码即将过期，如果您想更改，请输入一个新密码。"

msgid "Password change required, if you wish to change now enter a new password."
msgstr "需要更改密码，如果要更改，请输入新密码。"

msgid "Password error, if you wish to change now enter a new password."
msgstr "密码错误，如果您想更改，请输入新密码。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The client or browser used to access to the secure gateway is not allowed.
msgid "Login denied, unauthorized connection mechanism, contact your administrator."
msgstr "登录被拒绝，未授权的连接机制，请与管理员联系。"

msgid "You must create a new PIN. Select whether you want to create your own PIN or have the system generate one for you."
msgstr "您必须创建一个新的PIN。选择是要创建自己的PIN还是让系统为您生成一个。"

msgid "Local CA Authentication Failed"
msgstr "本地CA身份验证失败"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. This error indicates an authentication failure. The secure gateway has
#. declined to accept the certificate provided by the client because it could
#. not be validated. Please verify that the correct certificate is available in
#. the certificate store.
msgid "Certificate Validation Failure"
msgstr "证书验证失败"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The user's password will expire soon and he/she has the opportunity to
#. change the password now. Leaving both password boxes blank and continuing
#. will defer the password change until later.
msgid "Leave both boxes blank to continue using current password"
msgstr "将两个框都留空以继续使用当前密码"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The VPN connection could not be established. If there is any message
#. following "Login failed:" it may indicate the reason why.
#, c-format
msgid "Login failed: %s"
msgstr "登录失败：%s"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. Access to the secure gateway through AnyConnect is not allowed.
msgid "AnyConnect is not enabled on the VPN server"
msgstr "VPN服务器上未启用AnyConnect"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. A password change is required to log in. This is most likely due to an
#. expired password. Unfortunately the server is not able to modify the password.
#. An administrator will need to reset the password.
msgid "Unwilling to perform password change"
msgstr "不愿意执行密码更改"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The URL requested was not found. Please verify that the URL is correct
#. and try again. If the problem persists, ask an administrator to check the URL.
msgid "Invalid host entry. Please re-enter."
msgstr "无效的主机条目。请重新输入。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. This error indicates the secure gateway has validated the certificate
#. provided by the client, however, it was not authorized for the selected
#. tunnel group. The certificate may be valid for another tunnel group on the
#. secure gateway.
msgid "Your certificate is invalid for the selected group"
msgstr "您的证书对所选组无效"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. Access to the secure gateway requires use of a full tunnel client such
#. as AnyConnect.
msgid "Clientless (browser) SSL VPN access is not allowed."
msgstr "不允许无客户端（浏览器）SSL VPN访问。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The secure gateway encountered an internal error such as low memory.
msgid "VPN Server internal error."
msgstr "VPN Server内部错误。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The authentication ticket was removed before the user responded. Try
#. logging on again.
msgid "Invalid authentication handle."
msgstr "无效的身份验证句柄。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The secure gateway could not parse the request sent by the VPN client.
msgid "VPN Server could not parse request."
msgstr "VPN Server无法解析请求。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The secure gateway configuration was changed between when AnyConnect
#. first contacted the secure gateway and now. The change requires AnyConnect
#. to start the connection process over again.
msgid "The configuration of the VPN Server has changed. Please try again."
msgstr "VPN服务器的配置已更改。请再试一遍。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The session cookie is invalid and cannot be used to request parameters
#. needed to establish a VPN tunnel. Try connecting again.
msgid "Invalid session/bad session parameters while processing Config Request"
msgstr "处理配置请求时无效的会话/无效的会话参数"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA. The username from certificate feature is configured to fallback to CSD
#. host scan data when a certificate is unavailable. The secure gateway failed
#. to get the username from the host scan data in the absence of a certificate.
msgid "Error retrieving username from CSD data."
msgstr "从CSD数据检索用户名时出错。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA.
msgid "Error retrieving AAA attributes to decode EAP MPPE keys"
msgstr "检索AAA属性以解码EAP MPPE密钥时出错"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA.
msgid "Your browser will launch to complete the authentication process."
msgstr "您的浏览器将启动以完成身份验证过程。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA.
msgid "Single sign-on URL generation failure"
msgstr "单点登录URL生成失败"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA.
msgid "Single sign-on hash verification failure"
msgstr "单点登录哈希验证失败"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA.
msgid "Authentication attempt timed out"
msgstr "身份验证尝试超时"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA.
msgid "Your AnyConnect version does not support the requested authentication type."
msgstr "您的AnyConnect版本不支持请求的身份验证类型。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA.
msgid "Single sign-on AnyConnect token verification failure."
msgstr "单一登录AnyConnect令牌验证失败。"

#. Doc: Message originated from the ASA.
msgid "Please complete the authentication process in the AnyConnect Login window."
msgstr "请在“ AnyConnect登录”窗口中完成身份验证过程。"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect VPN Client"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect VPN客户端"

#. Doc: The client is configured for Always On. The client does not support connecting
#. through a proxy in Always On mode.
msgid "Connecting via a proxy is not supported with Always On."
msgstr "Always On不支持通过代理连接。"

#. Doc: The client is configured for Always On. The client does not support connecting
#. through a proxy in Always On mode.
msgid "It may be necessary to connect via a proxy, which is not supported with Always On."
msgstr "可能有必要通过代理进行连接，而“永远在线”不支持该代理。"

#. Doc: The client is configured to not allow VPN connections via a proxy that is also
#. running on the end-point device (local proxy). Because the VPN connection must be
#. made via a local proxy, the VPN connection was not allowed.
msgid "The VPN connection is not allowed via a local proxy. This can be changed through AnyConnect profile settings."
msgstr "不允许通过本地代理进行VPN连接。可以通过AnyConnect配置文件设置更改。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to contact the Secure Gateway due to name
#. resolution failure.
msgid "The VPN connection failed due to unsuccessful domain name resolution."
msgstr "由于域名解析失败，导致VPN连接失败。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to connect to the selected Secure Gateway. Reason:
#. The connection was attempted via IPv6, whereas the IPProtocolSupport profile
#. preference mandates IPv4.
msgid "The IPProtocolSupport profile setting for the specified secure gateway requires an IPv4 connection, but the secure gateway could only be resolved to an IPv6 address."
msgstr "指定的安全网关的IPProtocolSupport配置文件设置需要IPv4连接，但是安全网关只能解析为IPv6地址。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to connect to the selected Secure Gateway. Reason:
#. The connection was attempted via IPv4, whereas the IPProtocolSupport profile
#. preference mandates IPv6.
msgid "The IPProtocolSupport profile setting for the specified secure gateway requires an IPv6 connection, but the secure gateway could only be resolved to an IPv4 address."
msgstr "指定的安全网关的IPProtocolSupport配置文件设置需要IPv6连接，但是安全网关只能解析为IPv4地址。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to connect to the selected Secure Gateway. Reason:
#. The IPProtocolSupport profile preference includes just IPv6, but either IPv6 is disabled
#. on the client's operating system or an IPv6 connection is not supported by AnyConnnect
#. on the client's operating system.
msgid "The IPProtocolSupport profile setting for the selected secure gateway requires an IPv6 connection, which is not supported on this operating system."
msgstr "所选安全网关的IPProtocolSupport配置文件设置需要IPv6连接，此操作系统不支持该连接。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to connect to the selected Secure Gateway due to an unexpected
#. internal error.
msgid "The VPN connection failed due to an unexpected internal error encountered by the VPN client."
msgstr "由于VPN客户端遇到意外的内部错误，导致VPN连接失败。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to connect to the selected Secure Gateway. Reason:
#. This connection requires an IPv4 address, but there is no acceptable source
#. address available.
msgid "The VPN connection to the selected secure gateway requires a routable IPv4 physical adapter address. Please move to an IPv4 network and retry the connection or select a different secure gateway."
msgstr "与所选安全网关的VPN连接需要可路由的IPv4物理适配器地址。请移至IPv4网络并重试连接，或选择其他安全网关。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to connect to the selected Secure Gateway. Reason:
#. This connection requires an IPv6 address, but there is no acceptable source
#. address available.Note that a VPN connection via a 6-in-4 tunnel interface
#. (e.g. ISATAP, Teredo, 6to4) is not supported.
msgid "The VPN connection to the selected secure gateway requires a routable IPv6 physical adapter address. Please move to an IPv6 network and retry the connection or select a different secure gateway."
msgstr "与所选安全网关的VPN连接需要可路由的IPv6物理适配器地址。请移至IPv6网络并重试连接，或选择其他安全网关。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to connect to the selected Secure Gateway. Reason:
#. This connection requires either an IPv4 or IPv6 address, but there is no
#. acceptable source address available.
msgid "The VPN connection to the selected secure gateway requires a routable IPv4 or IPv6 physical adapter address."
msgstr "与所选安全网关的VPN连接需要可路由的IPv4或IPv6物理适配器地址。"

#. Doc: The VPN connection is not allowed as another VPN connection is already pending.
msgid "Another connection is already pending, the VPN connection is not possible at this time."
msgstr "另一个连接已经挂起，此时无法进行VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client is configured for Federal Information Processing Standards (FIPS)
#. compliance.  The server certificate received from the secure gateway or a
#. certificate in the server certificate's chain is not FIPS compliant, so the
#. VPN connection was disconnected to ensure FIPS compliance. The administrator
#. of the secure gateway should verify the secure gateway's server certificate
#. uses the FIPS required minimum RSA public key length and a FIPS compliant
#. signature algorithm.  This also may occur because Strict Certificate Trust
#. is enabled.
msgid "The server certificate received or its chain does not meet the requirements based on the configuration. A VPN connection will not be established."
msgstr "收到的服务器证书或其链不符合基于配置的要求。无法建立VPN连接。"

#. Doc: The client service is unable to successfully validate the secure gateway's
#. server certificate. The two most likely causes are:
#. * A device between the end-point and the secure gateway is attempting to
#. intercept the VPN connection data (man-in-the-middle attack). Moving to a
#. different network may avoid the problem.
#. * The secure gateway was not properly provisioned with a valid server
#. certificate. If strict-mode is configured on the secure gateway, this will
#. occur for all remote access users. The secure gateway must be provisioned
#. with a valid server certificate from a proper certificate authority.
msgid "AnyConnect cannot confirm it is connected to your secure gateway.  The local network may not be trustworthy.  Please try another network."
msgstr "AnyConnect无法确认它已连接到您的安全网关。本地网络可能不可信。请尝试其他网络。"

#. Doc: Certificate Pinning preference is enabled in the profile. SubjectPublicKeyInfo hash of the certificates
#. in the chain did not match with any pins in the profile for the connecting host.
msgid "The VPN connection attempt was aborted due to server certificate pin verification failure. Please contact your network administrator."
msgstr "由于服务器证书引脚验证失败，VPN连接尝试被中止。请与您的网络管理员联系。"

#. Doc: A VPN connection cannot be established because a captive portal is restricting access to the secure gateway in the trusted network.
#. A second message will specify what actions can be taken to remediate the situation.
msgid "The service provider in your current location is restricting access to the secure gateway. "
msgstr "您当前位置的服务提供商正在限制对安全网关的访问。"

#. Doc: A VPN connection cannot be established because a captive portal is restricting access to the secure gateway.
#. A second message will specify what actions can be taken to remediate the situation.
msgid "The service provider in your current location is restricting access to the Internet. "
msgstr "您当前位置的服务提供商正在限制对Internet的访问。"

#. Doc: The user may be located at a coffee shop, airport or hotel, where a captive portal is restricting access to the Internet. In order to be able to establish a VPN connection, the user needs to
#. open a browser and accept the conditions of access.
msgid "You need to log on with the service provider before you can establish a VPN session. You can try this by visiting any website with your browser."
msgstr "建立VPN会话之前，需要先登录服务提供商。您可以通过使用浏览器访问任何网站来进行尝试。"

#. Doc: The user may be located at a coffee shop, airport or hotel, where a captive portal is restricting access to the Internet. In order to be able to establish a VPN connection, the user needs to
#. open the AnyConnect browser and accept the conditions of access. This message is shown when a VPN connection is already active or when Always On access restrictions are in place.
#. This message is applicable to platforms supporting enhanced captive portal remediation.
msgid "You need to log on with the service provider before you can establish a VPN session, using the AnyConnect browser."
msgstr "您需要先使用服务提供商登录，然后才能使用AnyConnect浏览器建立VPN会话。"

#. Doc: The user may be located at a coffee shop, airport or hotel, where a captive portal is restricting access to the Internet. In order to be able to establish a VPN connection, the user needs to
#. open a browser and accept the conditions of access. This message is shown when a VPN connection is already active or when Always On access restrictions are in place, and only after the captive
#. portal remediation via the AnyConnect browser was unsuccessful or has been canceled by user.
#. This message is applicable to platforms supporting enhanced captive portal remediation.
msgid "Please retry logging on with the service provider to regain access access to the Internet, by visiting any website with your browser."
msgstr "请通过使用浏览器访问任何网站，重试与服务提供商一起登录以重新获得对Internet的访问权限。"

#. Doc: The user may be located at a coffee shop, airport or hotel, where a captive portal is restricting access to the Internet. A VPN connection cannot be established because the Always On feature is enabled
#. with a Closed ConnectFailurePolicy and captive portal remediation is not allowed.
msgid "The AnyConnect protection settings must be lowered for you to log on with the service provider. Your current enterprise security policy does not allow this."
msgstr "必须降低AnyConnect保护设置，才能使用服务提供商登录。您当前的企业安全策略不允许这样做。"

#. Doc: The client was unable to contact the Secure Gateway.  This
#. is a generic error indicating a failure to establish a network
#. connection.  This may be due to a lack of network connectivity to
#. the Secure Gateway, connecting to the wrong server hostname or IP
#. address, or problems with the secure gateway.  Please check that
#. other applications, such as a web-browser or ping tool are able to
#. contact the Secure Gateway.
msgid "Could not connect to server.  Please verify Internet connectivity and server address."
msgstr "无法连接到服务器。请验证Internet连接和服务器地址。"

#. Doc: The AnyConnect package file could not be located on the secure gateway. The network administrator needs to check to make
#. sure that an AnyConnect package file exists for the operating system that the user is trying to connect with. This error
#. can also occur if there are network connectivity issues.
msgid "The AnyConnect package on the secure gateway could not be located. You may be experiencing network connectivity issues. Please try connecting again."
msgstr "找不到安全网关上的AnyConnect软件包。您可能遇到网络连接问题。请尝试重新连接。"

msgid "Establishing VPN session..."
msgstr "正在建立VPN会话..."

#. Doc: The Secure Gateway is configured with an AnyConnect
#. XML profile.  The client is configured to skip profile
#. updates, and cannot update to this version of the profile.
#. Because the profile can contain security policy, the client
#. will not be able to establish a connection.  The most
#. common cause of this condition is connecting to a
#. Security Gateway with a version of the client that does
#. not support profile update (such as the Palm Pre), or
#. connecting with a client with the BypassDownloader
#. setting configured in the local policy file.
msgid "Automatic profile updates are disabled and the local VPN profile does not match the secure gateway VPN profile.  Contact your system administrator."
msgstr "自动配置文件更新被禁用，并且本地VPN配置文件与安全网关VPN配置文件不匹配。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "Processing "
msgstr "处理中"

msgid "Starting up DART Engine..."
msgstr "正在启动DART Engine ..."

msgid "Internal Error: no valid configuration XML found..."
msgstr "内部错误：找不到有效的配置XML ..."

msgid "DART has finished... "
msgstr "DART已完成..."

msgid "Parsing request and configuration XMLs..."
msgstr "解析请求和配置XML ..."

msgid "Internal Error: DART has encountered an error..."
msgstr "内部错误：DART遇到错误..."

msgid "Internal Error: invalid request XML, please contact your administrator, or run in default mode"
msgstr "内部错误：无效的请求XML，请与您的管理员联系，或者以默认模式运行"

msgid "Internal Error: failed to create temporary working folder..."
msgstr "内部错误：无法创建临时工作文件夹..."

msgid "Reading instructions ..."
msgstr "阅读说明..."

msgid "Internal Error: all configs failed..."
msgstr "内部错误：所有配置失败..."

msgid "Zipping the bundle, please wait..."
msgstr "正在压缩捆绑包，请稍候..."

msgid "Internal Error: failed to zip the bundle..."
msgstr "内部错误：无法压缩捆绑包..."

msgid "Clearing "
msgstr "清除中"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect DART"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect DART"

msgid 
"Copyright (c) 2008 - 2019 Cisco Systems, Inc.\n"
"All Rights Reserved."
msgstr 
"版权所有（c）2008-2019思科系统公司\n"
"版权所有。"
msgid "Run"
msgstr "跑"

msgid "Next"
msgstr "下一个"

msgid "Finish"
msgstr "完"

msgid "Welcome to the Cisco Diagnostic and Reporting Tool (DART)."
msgstr "欢迎使用思科诊断和报告工具（DART）。"

msgid "DART is a tool that helps to bundle the appropriate log files and diagnostic information that can be used for analyzing and debugging the AnyConnect client connections."
msgstr "DART是一种工具，可帮助捆绑适当的日志文件和诊断信息，这些日志文件和诊断信息可用于分析和调试AnyConnect客户端连接。"

msgid "This wizard will guide you through the steps required to create the diagnostic bundle.  To continue, click Next."
msgstr "该向导将指导您完成创建诊断包所需的步骤。要继续，请单击下一步。"

msgid "Cisco AnyConnect Diagnostic and Reporting Tool (DART)"
msgstr "思科AnyConnect诊断和报告工具（DART）"

msgid "Bundle Creation Option"
msgstr "捆绑包创建选项"

msgid "Select a bundle option."
msgstr "选择一个捆绑选项。"

msgid "Select \"Default\" to include the typical log files and diagnostic information in the bundle.  Select \"Custom\" to choose the list of log files and diagnostic information to be included in the bundle."
msgstr "选择\“ Default \”将典型的日志文件和诊断信息包含在捆绑软件中。选择\“ Custom \”以选择要包含在捆绑软件中的日志文件和诊断信息的列表。"

msgid "Typical log files and diagnostic information will be included in the bundle. (Bundle will be saved to Desktop)"
msgstr "捆绑软件中将包含典型的日志文件和诊断信息。 （捆绑包将保存到桌面）"

msgid "Choose which log files and diagnostic information to be included in the bundle."
msgstr "选择要包含在捆绑软件中的日志文件和诊断信息。"

msgid "Default (Bundle will be saved to Desktop)"
msgstr "默认值（捆绑包将保存到桌面）"

msgid "Custom"
msgstr "自订"

msgid "Typical"
msgstr "典型"

msgid "DART requires administrative privileges to clear AnyConnect logs."
msgstr "DART需要管理权限才能清除AnyConnect日志。"

msgid "Clear All Logs"
msgstr "清除所有日志"

msgid "Bundle Encryption Option"
msgstr "捆绑加密选项"

msgid "Enable Bundle Encryption"
msgstr "启用捆绑加密"

msgid "Encryption Password"
msgstr "加密密码"

msgid "Confirm Password"
msgstr "确认密码"

msgid "Passwords entered do not match"
msgstr "输入的密码不匹配"

msgid "Please enter a password for the bundle or unselect the \"Enable Bundle Encryption\" option"
msgstr "请输入捆绑软件的密码或取消选择“启用捆绑软件加密”选项"

msgid "Mask Password"
msgstr "掩码密码"

msgid "File Selection"
msgstr "文件选择"

msgid "Select the files to be collected."
msgstr "选择要收集的文件。"

msgid "Log File Selection"
msgstr "日志文件选择"

msgid "Please be patient while the wizard is populating the list of log files available for selection..."
msgstr "在向导填充可供选择的日志文件列表时，请耐心等待..."

msgid "Check the log files that you want to be included in the bundle and uncheck the files that you don't want to be included."
msgstr "选中您要包含在捆绑软件中的日志文件，然后取消选中您不希望包含在日志文件中的文件。"

msgid "Restore Default"
msgstr "恢复默认"

msgid "Target Bundle Location and Comments"
msgstr "目标捆绑包位置和注释"

msgid "Enter any comments for the bundle."
msgstr "输入捆绑商品的任何评论。"

msgid "Select target bundle location."
msgstr "选择目标捆绑包位置。"

msgid "Browse..."
msgstr "浏览..."

msgid "Bundle Creation Progress"
msgstr "捆绑包创建进度"

msgid "Please be patient while DART is creating the bundle.  This may take several minutes..."
msgstr "在DART创建捆绑包时，请耐心等待。这可能会需要几分钟..."

msgid "Please be patient while DART is clearing AnyConnect logs..."
msgstr "DART正在清除AnyConnect日志时，请耐心等待..."

msgid "Bundle Creation Result"
msgstr "捆绑创建结果"

msgid "Your default email client is not configured properly to use this feature. Please contact your system administrator to reconfigure."
msgstr "您的默认电子邮件客户端未正确配置为使用此功能。请与系统管理员联系以重新配置。"

msgid "Email Your Bundle"
msgstr "通过电子邮件发送捆绑"

msgid "Email Bundle"
msgstr "电子邮件捆绑"

msgid "Email Address(es): "
msgstr "电子邮件地址）："

msgid "Include Message In Email (optional):"
msgstr "在电子邮件中包含消息（可选）："

msgid "Customer Case # (optional):"
msgstr "客户案例编号（可选）："

msgid "The email feature is loading . . . Please wait"
msgstr "电子邮件功能正在加载。 。 。请耐心等待"

msgid "Please enter a valid email address to email your DART!"
msgstr "请输入有效的电子邮件地址，以电子邮件发送给DART！"

msgid "Please wait while your email is sent . . ."
msgstr "在发送电子邮件时请稍候。 。 。"

msgid "Your email was successfully sent."
msgstr "您的电子邮件已成功发送。"

msgid "There was an error sending your email.  Please send manually."
msgstr "发送您的电子邮件时出错。请手动发送。"

msgid "(Semicolon-separated list)"
msgstr "（用分号分隔的列表）"

msgid "WARNING: A DART bundle contains confidential system information, the user accepts all responsibility for emailing this information."
msgstr "警告：DART捆绑包包含机密系统信息，用户承担通过电子邮件发送此信息的所有责任。"

#, c-format
msgid "The bundle was created successfully in %s."
msgstr "该捆绑软件已在%s中成功创建。"

msgid "The bundle was created successfully on your Desktop."
msgstr "该捆绑软件已在您的桌面上成功创建。"

#, c-format
msgid "The bundle cannot be saved in the location \"%s\".  Please specify another location and try again."
msgstr "捆绑包无法保存在\"%s\"位置。请指定其他位置，然后重试。"

msgid "The bundle cannot be saved on your Desktop.  Please try again later."
msgstr "该捆绑包无法保存在您的桌面上。请稍后再试。"

#. Doc: Creation of the DART bundle failed due to an internal processing error. Running DART again with the default bundle selection may remedy the problem.
msgid "An internal error occurred while creating the DART bundle.  Please try again later."
msgstr "创建DART捆绑包时发生内部错误。请稍后再试。"

#. Doc: Creation of the DART bundle failed. Common causes may include failure to write, read, or move a file, possibly due to restricted user access to that file.
msgid "An unknown error occurred while creating the DART bundle, possibly due to restricted file permissions.  Please try again later."
msgstr "创建DART捆绑包时发生未知错误，可能是由于文件权限受限所致。请稍后再试。"

msgid "Warning"
msgstr "警告"

#, c-format
msgid "Your comments is  %d characters long, which exceeds the maximum limit of  %d characters.  Please enter comments within the maximum limit."
msgstr "您的注释长度为 %d个字符，超过了 %d个字符的最大限制。请在最大限制内输入评论。"

msgid "DART Wizard has encountered a problem and needs to close."
msgstr "DART向导遇到问题，需要关闭。"

msgid "Please specify a target bundle location."
msgstr "请指定目标捆绑包位置。"

msgid "Please specify a correct location path."
msgstr "请指定正确的位置路径。"

msgid "DART requires administrative privileges to clear AnyConnect logs. Please relaunch DART with administrative privileges and try again."
msgstr "DART需要管理权限才能清除AnyConnect日志。请使用管理权限重新启动DART，然后重试。"

msgid "No files are currently selected.  Are you sure you want to continue?"
msgstr "当前未选择文件。你确定你要继续吗？"

msgid "Existing bundle file will be overwritten."
msgstr "现有的捆绑文件将被覆盖。"

msgid "Please select at least one log module."
msgstr "请至少选择一个日志模块。"

msgid "Are you sure you want to permanently delete AnyConnect logs?"
msgstr "您确定要永久删除AnyConnect日志吗？"

msgid "DART will only collect partial diagnostic information. For a complete log collection, authenticate as an administrator."
msgstr "DART仅收集部分诊断信息。要收集完整的日志，请以管理员身份进行身份验证。"

msgid "AnyConnect DART requires administrative access to collect complete diagnostic information."
msgstr "AnyConnect DART需要管理访问权限才能收集完整的诊断信息。"

msgid "AnyConnect logs have been cleared. Please reproduce your issue before continuing with log collection."
msgstr "AnyConnect日志已经清除。在继续收集日志之前，请重现您的问题。"

msgid "About DART"
msgstr "关于DART"

msgid "Hide DART"
msgstr "隐藏DART"

msgid "Quit DART"
msgstr "退出DART"

msgid "AMP Enabler install logs"
msgstr "AMP启动器安装日志"

msgid "AMP Enabler application logs"
msgstr "AMP启动器应用程序日志"

msgid "AMP Connector installation logs"
msgstr "AMP连接器安装日志"

msgid "AmpEnabler Profile"
msgstr "AmpEnabler配置文件"

msgid "AnyConnect install logs"
msgstr "AnyConnect安装日志"

msgid "Start Before Logon install logs"
msgstr "登录之前开始安装日志"

msgid "Start Before Logon runtime logs"
msgstr "在登录运行时日志之前开始"

msgid "Virtual Adapter runtime logs"
msgstr "虚拟适配器运行时日志"

msgid "AnyConnect Global Preferences"
msgstr "AnyConnect全局首选项"

msgid "AnyConnect User Preferences"
msgstr "AnyConnect用户首选项"

msgid "AnyConnect Profile"
msgstr "AnyConnect配置文件"

msgid "System Information (extensive)"
msgstr "系统信息（广泛）"

msgid "Filter Configuration"
msgstr "过滤器配置"

msgid "Interface Configuration"
msgstr "接口配置"

msgid "Network Connectivity Test"
msgstr "网络连接测试"

msgid "System logs"
msgstr "系统日志"

msgid "Old system logs (Linux/macOS only)"
msgstr "旧系统日志（仅Linux / macOS）"

msgid "Application logs"
msgstr "应用日志"

msgid "DART Logs"
msgstr "DART日志"

msgid "ISE Posture install logs"
msgstr "ISE姿势安装日志"

msgid "ISE Posture application logs"
msgstr "ISE姿势应用程序日志"

msgid "ISE Posture Dump Files"
msgstr "ISE姿态转储文件"

msgid "NAM install logs"
msgstr "NAM安装日志"

msgid "NAM Profile"
msgstr "NAM个人资料"

msgid "NAM Program Dump Files"
msgstr "NAM程序转储文件"

msgid "NAM application logs"
msgstr "NAM应用程序日志"

msgid "NAM FIPS"
msgstr "NAM FIPS"

msgid "NVM install logs"
msgstr "NVM安装日志"

msgid "Network Visibility dump files"
msgstr "网络可见性转储文件"

msgid "Network Visibility application logs"
msgstr "网络可见性应用程序日志"

msgid "Network Visibility Profile"
msgstr "网络可见性配置文件"

msgid "Posture install logs"
msgstr "姿势安装日志"

msgid "Posture application logs"
msgstr "姿势申请日志"

msgid "Roaming Security install logs"
msgstr "漫游安全安装日志"

msgid "Roaming Security dump files"
msgstr "漫游安全性转储文件"

msgid "Roaming Security application logs"
msgstr "漫游安全应用程序日志"

msgid "Roaming Security Profile"
msgstr "漫游安全配置文件"

msgid "WebSecurity install logs"
msgstr "WebSecurity安装日志"

msgid "Stopped"
msgstr "已停止"

msgid "Limited Connectivity"
msgstr "连接受限"

msgid "Waiting for Network Connection...."
msgstr "正在等待网络连接。"

msgid "Attempting Connection"
msgstr "尝试连接"

msgid "Your password has expired. Please enter a new password"
msgstr "您的密码已过期。请输入新密码"

msgid "Change Password failed (check password complexity requirement). Try again"
msgstr "更改密码失败（检查密码复杂性要求）。再试一次"

msgid "Confirm Password:"
msgstr "确认密码："

msgid "Input Language:"
msgstr "输入语言："

msgid "New password does not match confirmation."
msgstr "新密码与确认不符。"

msgid "Data entry error"
msgstr "数据输入错误"

#, c-format
msgid 
"Only one user session is allowed.\n"
" %s is already logged onto this machine.\n"
"\n"
" This user must log off of this machine before you can log on."
msgstr 
"仅允许一个用户会话。\n"
" %s已登录到该计算机。\n"
"\n"
" 该用户必须先注销该计算机，然后才能登录。"
msgid "Another user"
msgstr "另一个使用者"

msgid "Logon Denied"
msgstr "登录被拒绝"

msgid "DummyMessageToForceMessageCatalogSetup"
msgstr "DummyMessageToForceMessageCatalogSetup"

msgid "New Configuration"
msgstr "新配置"

msgid "detected"
msgstr "检测到"

msgid "New Configuration detected"
msgstr "检测到新配置"

msgid ", changes require restart but encountered errors"
msgstr "，更改需要重新启动，但遇到错误"

msgid ", changes applied but encountered errors"
msgstr "，已应用更改但遇到错误"

msgid ", encountered errors"
msgstr "，遇到错误"

msgid ", requires restart"
msgstr "，需要重新启动"

msgid " and applied"
msgstr " 并应用"

msgid "loaded"
msgstr "已加载"

msgid "Profile loaded"
msgstr "个人资料已加载"

#. Doc: The license key is either invalid, expired or is not defined in the profile.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Unable to verify the license key"
msgstr "无法验证许可证密钥"

#. Doc: A connection to the proxy servers could not be established, this could be
#. due to network connectivity problems or because the proxy servers are unavailable.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Could not establish a connection"
msgstr "无法建立连接"

#. Doc: A secure connection to the proxy servers could not be established.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Could not establish a secure connection"
msgstr "无法建立安全连接"

#. Doc: The server certificate failed validation. This could be due to the
#. presence of a login page that requires payment or acknowledgment of
#. the terms of service for Internet access.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Unable to verify the identity of the peer"
msgstr "无法验证对等方的身份"

#. Doc: An unexpected response was received from a proxy server.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Invalid response received from the proxy server"
msgstr "从代理服务器收到无效的响应"

#. Doc: The connection to the proxy server failed.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Unable to connect to the proxy server"
msgstr "无法连接到代理服务器"

#. Doc: The Tower certificate is invalid or don't exist so fail closing.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "WebsecurityCert.cfg file missing or invalid"
msgstr "WebsecurityCert.cfg文件丢失或无效"

#. Doc: Public proxy credentials are not provided or wrong.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Please provide the proxy credentials in AnyConnect Web Security"
msgstr "请在AnyConnect网络安全中提供代理凭据"

msgid "Connection Failure"
msgstr "连接失败"

msgid "The requested connection cannot be established and the policy is to close any failed connections."
msgstr "无法建立请求的连接，并且该策略将关闭所有失败的连接。"

msgid "The requested connection cannot be established."
msgstr "无法建立请求的连接。"

msgid "Reason"
msgstr "原因"

msgid "Hostscan state idle"
msgstr "主机扫描状态空闲"

msgid "Hostscan is waiting for the next scan"
msgstr "Hostscan正在等待下一次扫描"

msgid "Hostscan is performing prelogin"
msgstr "Hostscan正在执行预登录"

msgid "Hostscan is performing system scan"
msgstr "Hostscan正在执行系统扫描"

msgid "Hostscan is performing software scan"
msgstr "Hostscan正在执行软件扫描"

msgid "Hostscan is scanning device parameters"
msgstr "Hostscan正在扫描设备参数"

msgid "Hostscan is updating device parameters"
msgstr "Hostscan正在更新设备参数"

msgid "Hostscan mission complete"
msgstr "Hostscan任务完成"

msgid "Cisco Network Setup Assistant"
msgstr "思科网络设置助手"

msgid "Network Setup Assistant"
msgstr "网络设置助手"

msgid "(c) 2014-2019 Cisco Systems, Inc. Cisco, Cisco Systems and Cisco Systems logo are registered trademarks of Cisco Systems, Inc and/or its affiliates in the U.S. and certain other countries."
msgstr "（c）2014-2019年Cisco Systems，Inc. Cisco，Cisco Systems和Cisco Systems徽标是Cisco Systems，Inc.和/或其分支机构在美国和某些其他国家的注册商标。"

msgid "Downloading Cisco AnyConnect Secure Mobility Client..."
msgstr "正在下载Cisco AnyConnect安全移动客户端..."

msgid 
"Security Warning: \n"
"Untrusted Security Certificate"
msgstr 
"安全警告：\n"
"不受信任的安全证书"
#, c-format
msgid 
"Your computer is attempting to securely connect to\n"
"\n"
"    %s\n"
"\n"
"that presents a certificate that cannot be verified."
msgstr 
"您的计算机正在尝试安全地连接到\n"
"\n"
"     %s \n"
"\n"
"提出无法验证的证书。"
msgid "Connecting to this server may result in a severe security compromise."
msgstr "连接到该服务器可能会严重危害安全性。"

msgid "Trusted and Secure Connection"
msgstr "可信且安全的连接"

#, c-format
msgid 
"You are connected to \n"
"\n"
"    %s\n"
"\n"
"whose identity has been certified. Your connection to this website is encrypted."
msgstr 
"您已连接到\n"
"\n"
"     %s \n"
"\n"
"其身份已被认证。您与该网站的连接已加密。"
msgid 
"Couldn't connect to the server. \n"
"\n"
"Please contact your administrator for more information."
msgstr 
"无法连接到服务器。 \n"
"\n"
"请与您的管理员联系以获取更多信息。"
msgid "Downloading remote package..."
msgstr "正在下载远程软件包..."

msgid "Running AnyConnect Downloader..."
msgstr "正在运行AnyConnect下载器..."

msgid "Installation is completed."
msgstr "安装完成。"

msgid 
"Unable to install AnyConnect Secure Mobility Client. \n"
"\n"
"Please contact your administrator for more information."
msgstr 
"无法安装AnyConnect安全移动客户端。 \n"
"\n"
"请与您的管理员联系以获取更多信息。"
msgid "Failed to verify the signature of the package."
msgstr "无法验证包的签名。"

msgid "Failed to launch Cisco AnyConnect Secure Mobility Client Downloader."
msgstr "无法启动Cisco AnyConnect安全移动客户端下载器。"

msgid "Failed to download Cisco AnyConnect Secure Mobility Client Downloader."
msgstr "无法下载Cisco AnyConnect安全移动客户端下载器。"

msgid "IT policy prohibits the use of USB storage devices."
msgstr "IT策略禁止使用USB存储设备。"

msgid "The file that has been requested could not be launched either because it could not be found or there was a problem launching it.  Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "请求的文件无法启动，因为找不到该文件或启动它存在问题。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "There has been a network error, please try the remediation again.  If this message continues to be seen contact your system administrator."
msgstr "发生网络错误，请重试修复。如果仍然看到此消息，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are trying to do can not be accomplished at your user level.  Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "您尝试执行的修复无法在用户级别完成。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The file that is trying to be downloaded has an incorrect URL. Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "尝试下载的文件具有错误的URL。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The AV/AS update has failed.  Please try again and if this message continues to display contact your system administrator."
msgstr "AV / AS更新失败。请重试，如果此消息继续显示，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The AV/AS update failed due to a networking issue. Please try again and if this message continues to display contact your system administrator."
msgstr "由于网络问题，AV / AS更新失败。请重试，如果此消息继续显示，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The location for the file to be saved to can not be written.  Please choose a different location."
msgstr "无法保存文件的位置。请选择其他位置。"

msgid "The WSUS search failed.  This is probably due to a network issue.  Please try again and if this message continues to display contact your system administrator."
msgstr "WSUS搜索失败。这可能是由于网络问题。请重试，如果此消息继续显示，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The size of the downloaded file does not match the package! Please discard downloaded file and check with your administrator."
msgstr "下载的文件大小与软件包不符！请丢弃下载的文件，并与管理员联系。"

msgid "The file that has been requested was not digitally signed.  Please try again and if this message continues to display contact your system administrator."
msgstr "所请求的文件未进行数字签名。请重试，如果此消息继续显示，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting requires elevation. Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "您尝试的补救措施需要提升。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting has failed with an internal error. Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "您尝试的修复失败，并出现内部错误。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting has timed out waiting for the operation to finish.  If this continues please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "您正在尝试的修复已超时，等待操作完成。如果这种情况仍然存在，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting is reporting an access denied error. This is usually due to a privilege issue. Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "您正在尝试的修复报告了拒绝访问错误。这通常是由于特权问题所致。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting is not supported for this product. Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "此产品不支持您尝试的补救措施。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting has reported an internal error.  If this problem persists please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "您尝试的补救措施报告了内部错误。如果此问题仍然存在，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting is not implemented for this product. Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "您尝试的补救措施尚未针对该产品实施。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting had a failure. If the problem persists contact your system administrator."
msgstr "您尝试的修复失败。如果问题仍然存在，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The requested application has not been qualified for launching.  Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "所请求的应用程序不具备启动资格。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "Remediation couldn't be attempted since the required product was not found on the system. If the problem persists contact your system administrator."
msgstr "由于系统上找不到所需的产品，因此无法尝试修复。如果问题仍然存在，请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "You need to reboot your system in order for the changes to take effect."
msgstr "您需要重新引导系统才能使更改生效。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting had a failure to open the URL from the default internet browser."
msgstr "您尝试的补救措施无法从默认的Internet浏览器打开URL。"

msgid "The requirement cannot be evaluated since you are connected to an untrusted server. Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "由于您已连接到不受信任的服务器，因此无法评估该要求。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "The remediation you are attempting cannot be done as you are connected to an untrusted server. Please contact your system administrator."
msgstr "连接到不受信任的服务器后，您无法尝试修复。请与系统管理员联系。"

msgid "Unable to remediate particular requirement."
msgstr "无法修复特定要求。"

msgid "Can't access Certificate Revocation List."
msgstr "无法访问证书吊销列表。"

msgid "Certificate is invalid."
msgstr "证书无效。"

msgid "Certificate is revoked."
msgstr "证书被吊销。"

msgid "Certificate is not trusted."
msgstr "证书不受信任。"

msgid "Certificate Name mismatched."
msgstr "证书名称不匹配。"

msgid "Certificate is expired or not yet valid."
msgstr "证书已过期或尚未生效。"

msgid "Certificate has wrong usage."
msgstr "证书用法有误。"

msgid "Error loading SSL libraries."
msgstr "加载SSL库时出错。"

msgid "System scan not required on current Wi-Fi."
msgstr "当前Wi-Fi不需要系统扫描。"

msgid "Limited or no connectivity."
msgstr "连接受限或无连接。"

msgid 
"Bypassing AnyConnect scan.\n"
"Your network is configured to use Cisco NAC Agent."
msgstr 
"绕过AnyConnect扫描。\n"
"您的网络配置为使用Cisco NAC代理。"
msgid 
"Bypassing AnyConnect scan.\n"
"Your network is configured to use Cisco Temporal Agent."
msgstr 
"绕过AnyConnect扫描。\n"
"您的网络配置为使用Cisco Temporal代理。"
msgid 
"Unauthorized policy server.\n"
"Limited or no network access."
msgstr 
"未经授权的策略服务器。\n"
"受限或无网络访问。"
msgid "Not Found"
msgstr "未找到"

msgid "Untrusted Policy Server"
msgstr "不受信任的策略服务器"

msgid "Change Settings..."
msgstr "更改设置..."

msgid "Cancelled by the user."
msgstr "被用户取消。"

msgid "Action is required to enable access."
msgstr "需要采取措施才能启用访问权限。"

msgid "Your computer requires updates before it can join the network."
msgstr "您的计算机需要更新才能加入网络。"

msgid "Your endpoint is not compliant, and the limited time period for full network access has expired. Please fix the identified problem and then click Scan Again to access the network."
msgstr "您的端点不符合要求，并且完全网络访问的有限时间段已到期。请解决所确定的问题，然后单击再次扫描以访问网络。"

msgid "Compliant."
msgstr "合规。"

msgid "Network access allowed."
msgstr "允许网络访问。"

msgid "Not Compliant."
msgstr "不合规。"

msgid "Update time expired."
msgstr "更新时间已过期。"

msgid "To access the network, you must fix the identified problem. Then click Scan Again to proceed with a security check of your device."
msgstr "要访问网络，必须解决已确定的问题。然后，单击再次扫描以继续对设备进行安全检查。"

msgid "Cancelled by user"
msgstr "已被用户取消"

msgid "PRA Logoff."
msgstr "PRA注销。"

msgid "Scanning system ..."
msgstr "扫描系统..."

msgid "Checking for network compliance..."
msgstr "正在检查网络合规性..."

msgid "Update your system."
msgstr "更新您的系统。"

msgid "Checking requirement..."
msgstr "检查要求..."

#, c-format
msgid "Checking requirement  %d of  %d."
msgstr "正在检查 %d的要求 %d。"

#, c-format
msgid "Applying optional update  %d."
msgstr "应用可选更新 %d。"

#, c-format
msgid "Updating requirement  %d of  %d."
msgstr "正在更新 %d的要求 %d。"

msgid "Failed to save report."
msgstr "保存报告失败。"

msgid "Report saved at "
msgstr "报告保存在"

msgid "Retry"
msgstr "重试"

msgid "Would you like to retry?"
msgstr "您想重试吗？"

msgid "Prepare posture report ..."
msgstr "准备姿势报告..."

msgid "Network Acceptable Use Policy"
msgstr "网络可接受使用政策"

msgid "Updating network settings ..."
msgstr "更新网络设置..."

msgid "Failed to refresh IP"
msgstr "刷新IP失败"

msgid "Declined Network Acceptable Use Policy"
msgstr "网络拒绝使用政策"

msgid "Restricted network access"
msgstr "限制网络访问"

msgid "Reassessment failed"
msgstr "重新评估失败"

msgid "Posture interrupted due to network change"
msgstr "姿势因网络变化而中断"

msgid "Failed to contact policy server"
msgstr "无法联系策略服务器"

msgid "Failed to contact secure policy server"
msgstr "无法联系安全策略服务器"

msgid "Posture failed due to server issues"
msgstr "由于服务器问题，姿势失败"

msgid "Agent service is down"
msgstr "代理服务已关闭"

msgid "Failed to update network settings"
msgstr "无法更新网络设置"

msgid "Failed to load compliance module."
msgstr "无法加载合规性模块。"

msgid "The operating system is not supported by the server."
msgstr "服务器不支持该操作系统。"

msgid "This client version is incompatible with the server."
msgstr "此客户端版本与服务器不兼容。"

msgid "Please contact your system administrator to update to a newer version."
msgstr "请与系统管理员联系以更新到较新的版本。"

msgid "Client incompatible with old policy server version."
msgstr "客户端与旧的策略服务器版本不兼容。"

msgid "Internal system error."
msgstr "内部系统错误。"

msgid "Posture interrupted by network status change"
msgstr "状态因网络状态更改而中断"

msgid "Please reboot to finish the remediation process."
msgstr "请重新启动以完成修复过程。"

msgid "Downloading file ..."
msgstr "正在下载文件..."

#, c-format
msgid "Less than  %d minutes left to make updates."
msgstr "还剩不到 %d分钟即可进行更新。"

msgid "Update your system. Please click Re-scan button after remediation."
msgstr "更新您的系统。修复后，请单击重新扫描按钮。"

msgid "In grace period."
msgstr "在宽限期。"

msgid "Your grace period is about to expire.  Please remediate your system and click on the Scan Again button to continue your network access."
msgstr "您的宽限期即将到期。请修复您的系统，然后单击“再次扫描”按钮以继续您的网络访问。"

msgid "Network access allowed for limited period."
msgstr "在有限的时间内允许网络访问。"

msgid "Searching for policy server."
msgstr "搜索策略服务器。"

msgid "This could take up to 30 seconds."
msgstr "这最多可能需要30秒。"

msgid "Failed to load downloader plugin."
msgstr "无法加载下载器插件。"

msgid "Failed to invoke downloader plugin."
msgstr "无法调用下载器插件。"

msgid "Update complete."
msgstr "更新完成。"

msgid "Failed to launch downloader."
msgstr "无法启动下载器。"

msgid "Failed to retrieve file."
msgstr "检索文件失败。"

msgid "Cancelled by the user"
msgstr "被用户取消"

msgid "Second instance of downloader detected."
msgstr "检测到下载器的第二个实例。"

msgid "Marking download as complete."
msgstr "将下载标记为已完成。"

msgid "Failed to retrieve downloader from policy server"
msgstr "无法从策略服务器检索下载器"

msgid "Contact your administrator"
msgstr "与您的管理员联系"

msgid "Failed to retrieve downloader from secure policy server"
msgstr "无法从安全策略服务器检索下载器"

msgid "No policy server detected."
msgstr "未检测到策略服务器。"

msgid "Default network access is in effect."
msgstr "默认网络访问已生效。"

#. Doc: The license key is either invalid, expired or is not defined in the profile.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Unable to verify the license key."
msgstr "无法验证许可证密钥。"

#. Doc: A connection to the proxy servers could not be established, this could be
#. due to network connectivity problems or because the proxy servers are unavailable.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Could not establish a connection."
msgstr "无法建立连接。"

#. Doc: A secure connection to the proxy servers could not be established.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Could not establish a secure connection."
msgstr "无法建立安全连接。"

#. Doc: The server certificate failed validation. This could be due to the
#. presence of a login page that requires payment or acknowledgment of
#. the terms of service for Internet access.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Unable to verify the identity of the peer."
msgstr "无法验证对等方的身份。"

#. Doc: An unexpected response was received from a proxy server.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Invalid response received from the proxy server."
msgstr "从代理服务器收到无效的响应。"

#. Doc: The connection to the proxy server failed.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Unable to connect to the proxy server."
msgstr "无法连接到代理服务器。"

#. Doc: Public proxy credentials are not provided or wrong.
#. The policy is to fail close. This message will be displayed in a browser.
msgid "Please provide the proxy credentials in AnyConnect Web Security."
msgstr "请在AnyConnect网络安全中提供代理凭据。"

msgid "Fail open policy set."
msgstr "打开策略集失败。"

msgid "Fail close policy set."
msgstr "失败关闭策略集。"
